Awighnam astu

C.NṄNTO 1

-

ngautia - -- |-w-ṭw-wlawclwwwlwwwl-w-ls

1 tunggal mala ni tattwa ning kalĕngĕngan sinamaya paramârthadurla
lumra sedran anakṣma ring daśadigantara tinuduh i lĕnglĕng ing hiḍ |
lot pinrakṛta'ring karas rinacanâstuti kakawin amūrti ng akṣara ]
manggĕh sādhana sang kawīśwara n asadhya kalĕpasan i sandhi nin

mangö

2 milw âbhyasa mara ngwang amrih amutĕr tanah atakî-tañî pralapita | 2
de ning jñana kĕdö jugâmalar anĕmwakĕna rasa rahasya ning mangö
nahan karaṇa ni nghulun cumaṭakā manam-anama kathârjunātmaja
mon cĕnggana padenya don ika silunglunga ning umulihêng Smarālḍya

3 śrrbhūpala Jayākṛta prabhu wiśeṣa tuhu-tuhu bhaṭāra Raśawa
khyatr n Kṛṣṇa sirêki ngôni muwah angdadi pinakasurakṣa ning jag
wet ning duhkha ri śīrna ning bhuwana tan hana phala ni gawe

Prajapati |]
hyang Rudrâmralayākĕn ing kapana yan tcn aradina ya tan sirâsiha

b mani n: H khyâĕti ng,
d -âmralayakîn: ñ pralayakĕn.

May there be no hindrance

CANT 1

1 One only is the origin of the essence of beauty, which is sought in

meditation and is truly difficult to find:

It spreads roundabout and pervades every corner of the world in a
subtle form, and is d³scerned when the mind is in a state of trance;

Constantly it is given form on the poet¹s writing tablet, is composed as
songs of praise in the form of kakawin, and takes visible shape as the
letters, :

The ready vehicle of master poets when they set their hearts on release
from the world through the mysteries of the muse.

2 I toojjoin in the practice and strive to wield the pen with a poem as my

exercise -

It is a work of the intellect, but I just do my best ta seek out the secret
nuances of poetic sentiment.

Such is the reason for me to make bold to weave together the tale of
Arjuna¹s son -

Bven if it should be scorned, then so be it: its aim is to be a means of
carrying rne safely home to Smara¹s abcde.

a Mis Majesty King Jayakṛta, that distinguished king, is in very truth Lord

Keśawa:

It is well known that he was once Kṛṣṇa, and has again taken on human
form to serve as an able guardian of men,

As he was distressed that the world was being destroyed and the
Creator's work would come to nought -

For when the god Rudra annihilates it, how could it not be swept clean
away, if he did not take pity on i.²


Ṭext, Canto 1

wyaktinya ng kalanârurĕk paḍa silih têwĕk arĕbut ulah kaduṣkṛtan |4
nāhan marma bhatāra Wiṣṇu mangadĕg ratu rumawas ikang durātmalk a
manggêh kīrti nirân Mapañji Madaharṣa maluyakĕn ikang jagatkrta
yajña mwang yaśa dâna śāstra winiweka muwah awungu sang hyans|
āgama |

c jagatkrta: Ŋjagattraya.

towi pwân sama len Wṛhaspati pangajyan ira nipuna śastrapâraga

sakṣmâtindriya dūradarśy anupamĕêng guṇa paramawidagaha nīîm
nāhan karaṇa ning jagat praṇata bhakti ri haji musuh awri sak hilang
apan śakti narendra sagni dinulur ning angin i hana sang yatīśwara

a towi pud-: A tawipra.
b daradarśy: AāF dara dady;ĕ dara darjya.

c hilang:ö tllang.

nora pwânukĕra ng manah narapati n huwus aradin ikang

parangmukha Ñ
lnânggöng kalangĕn sirâmijahakĕn kawi sinawunḍ irêng pral ĕpita
ngwang sinwī kinĕdö nira wruha matangya k angikĕt i kathârjunātm:
ndah śrr Kṛṣṇa ta tâtĕn ing carita tulya haji gati nirâdimanggala

a -nukârī C -nukĕrū narapati H nika pati
d tatatîn ing: A ta tat, B ta tutnṭ C ta tut ning.

āl

2NNNNuĕĕN

Ṭ–aaaa .ṛ .

Ṭranslation, Canto 1 29

The proof of this was that the troublemakers were brawling and
stabbing at each other, vying in deeds of villainy,

And such is the reason that Lord Wiṣṇu arose as a king to root out the
evildoers.

His meritorious acts as Mapañji Madaharṣa are sure, restoring the world
to a state of prosperity:

Śacrifices and works of charity, gifts and the scriptures are given pride
of place once more, and the Holy Lore awakes.

Moreover, his teacher is the same us the sage Wṛhaspati, an expert and
learned in the scriptures, ;
Deeply spiritual, beyond the grasp of the senses, a seer, incomparable in
good gualities, utterly learned and eminent in political wisdom.

TṬhis is the reason that the world is submissive and devoted to the king,
and his enemies have fed in disorder and disappeared,

For the royal might is like fire fanned by the wind in the presence of this
prince of sages.

'There is nothing that might trouble His Majesty¹s mind, mow that his
foes have been swept away,

And at his ease he devotes himselś to the arts, to the joy of the poets
whom hejoins in composing poetry.

He is pressing and urging me to undertake it, and this is why I am
composing the tale of Arjuna¹s son -

But it is the illustrious Kṛṣṇa who should be followed in the story, as his
actions are comparable to the king¹s, as its most eminent patron.


CANTO 2

śaraawwinwit - - - ¹ ww |w-wlww-l--wla-awls

1 nganīkala Yudhiṣṭhirâlah anitâtoh rajya len kaprabhun
kalap de nṛpa Koraweśwara tĕkêng wastrâdi sampun hawis
nahan karaṇa Pañca-Paṇḍawa layat munggw ing halas durgama
mant dwadaśawarṣa na samaya ning ramyâ muwah ring purī

a -âtoh:C -âto.
d wanlî: E manta.

2 byatnan sira ring wanâśrama rĕngĕn pang ning katha warṇanĕn
wwantĕn putra Ŋhanañjaya pwa saphalânwam śakti śarêng raṇa
prajñânindya warâbhimanyu pangaran khyātî prajāmaṇḍala
sakṣat Manmatha māwak apti tuladĕn ring rūpa tan popama

a pang ning: pang ui.

3 ngani n dug hana ring bapâparimitâtyantêki gĕng ning sukha
wah bhogânupama ng bhinukti sakatön kewalya tan kawaran .
mangke pwa n kari de Dhanañjeya kumöl tan kram lanângāsyas
solah ning masalah swadeśa sahajângungsî purā ning waneh

a gong ning: F gani.
b wah: ĒF weh; kâwaran: Ĕ kaparan.
d salak: Ĕ leh; sahajâ-: Ĕ ajai -ngungsî: A -ngungĕir.

CANTO 2

1 In former times when Yudhīṣthira lost at dice and staked his kingdom

and crown,

They were seized by the Korawa king, down to the last of his fine
clothes.

So this is why the five Paṇḍawas departed for the depths of the forest,

And would wait there for twelve years - that was the appointed time
before they would again enjoy life in the palace.

We need not tell what befell them in their forest hermitage, but offer a
branch of the tale for your ears:

There was a son of Dhanañjaya, suitably young, strong and heroic,

Knowledgeable and blameless, who went by the name of the excellent
Abhimanyu among people far and wide -

It was as if the God of Love had assumed his body, desiring to be taken
as a model for an incomparable appearance.

While he was still with his father, the extent of his happiness had been
limitless:

He enjoyed an uneḍualled abundance of pleasurcs, and his heart's desire
was there for the taking.

But now that Arjuna had left him, he was withdrawn and lustreless,
always behawing pitifully -

As a result of having resigned their bwn country, he simply had to take
refuge in the palace of another.


-

Translation, Canto 2 33
to 2
a Ṭext, Can

Now there was a peerless royal court, exceedingly lovely and pleasing in
every wayṅ

The wall entwining the fort was an embodiment of the divine serpent
Anantabhoga,
And the carved gate was the churnwstaff of the gods, Mount Mandara,

Its ine peak a white parasol of ñery gems that blaged as if about to set it
on ñre.

4 wwantên rajyasabhâdwitya linĕwih ring râmya sarwahalp .
pâwak sang hyang Anantabhoga kari kang bapramilkr weluk
takwan tang gupurênukir pamutĕr ing hyang ring gunung Man
puñcaknyârja payung putih manik apuy lwir muntabânunwanṅa
b pauak: D pawat; kwrikang: karika; baprâ- Ĕ pra; ring kuta: A ing kuta.

d puñcaknyâṇî-: puṅcaknyâjies -arja payunḍ: C arjâpayunṣ.

s All the buildings as far as the great suare and all those in the palace

rd

i kabe courtya

5 sakweh ning wangunan tĕkêng alun-alun mwang rinē wansuṅtr Had roofs sparkling with diamonds, shining and tall like a gathering of
minggar hra hatĕpnya kumram aruhur sakṣat pahöm ning gunung mountains -

astam tang batu len pangastryanan aparwâkokiran kadbhuta

extraordinary and bore amaaing reliefs;

The pinnadle of the treasury was fearsome: an image of Garuḍa when he
was devouring people!

b minggar hta: B minggahira, Ck minggâhira, Ĕ minggar ira.
c asium taug: B astam bang; batu:ĕ (vdṛī¹s (b) batu. H batu.

6 In the interior the pañcubale and the rice-barns were both arranged in
rows of two, as well as fine and proper resthouses;
. The trees were blooming in the yard and their young shoots gleamed as
they swayed softly in the wind.
The bees were humming sweetly, answered by the preludes of the
peacocks in the inner apartments -

It was as if they were summoning the divine musicians, their cries were
a yasârjthalṭp: ö tigâīahal²p. so lovely and melodious.

6 ri jro pañcabale durung paḍa susun rwā mwang yasasahalp
kaywanyâsĕkar ing natar saha sâwönyâbhrângĕlh kangina aa
kumbangnyânghrĕng aram tinūt i pangawat ning uak dng an³ p
kady âsyang-syanga dewa kinnara panawwangnyâlalĕh sus

7 As for the garden, its whole layout was the ultimate in dim beauty,

faultless and other-worldly:
- âninditâmâānuṣa
7 ring taman wĕkas ing Ñââ a–– w atuban angde löngēng The deep chasms with ravines, water-spouts, a pool and a stream were
grong singgrong aparunĕ ê i stry angaring enchanting.
maālas puṣpa maparwatâkĕnas D –wawwcan : It had a forest of flowers and a mountain with tame deer that frolicked in
kstis nghing surakanyakâsring anilib p pairs,
a ingCning c But was desarted except for the heavenly maidens who often came there
b grang: Cjrong; singgrong: F singrong; aparu¹ō: A anarung; -taban: F tubny;arar secretly on their wanderings.
îranw.

c matas: malĕs, C malap; sering: Ĕ soring.


34

Ṭext, Canto 2

8 ngkanê Dwarawatī ngaranya tuhu sākṣāt swargalokânurun

10

1

-

apan sang prabhu wastu Wiṣṇu subhaga śrī Kṛṣna ling ning sarāt
têkwan rwang siki reh nirân hana kakângekaprabhâwâdbhuta
khyatr n śrr Baladewanâma majajar kang râjya kapwâhalĕp

d khyarn D dyati, Ĕ khyating, H khyâti n.

ngka tôngwan prawarâbhimanyu n umusap jbng Krṣṇa dewaprabhu

marmasih ri sirân hatur pahulunan sakṣat anak tan waneh

apan rena nira prakāśita Subhadrâri pwa de bhopati

nâng sambandha tinūt nirân marĕk angungṣir solah ing sewaka

b sirân: D sira; anak: H hanak.

d nâng sambandha: C nang sĕmbandha, F nyan sambandha, H sinambhanda; angungsir:
angunṣsi.

nistanyêki wineh akuwwa hinaris ning rena len kadyahan
astam tang bala-kośa-wāhana yathāyogyâ rumakṣ² sira

solah sang para rājaputra panitah śrī Krṣna tātan pahi

ndātan lwâmbĕk irân hatur pangalasan de ning marĕk nityaśa
a hinaris: D hiniris.

c panih:B pinatah, C pinatih.

d ira:Ĕ ara.

byattan rwawĕlas tahun tuwuh ira ngkā ndah sĕḍĕng yowana
abha ning smara mandĕl ing mata ya tângdānî manis ning wulat
ndin tan dadya karasikan sĕmu ni ram ning śabda māmbö tilam
ṅĕpâĕp ning manah ing kapāna tiki yan tan wĕtwa gītâñĕñĕr

b tâdngdanṅ A tângdadî, CF -angdânî.

Ṭranslation, Canto 2 3ö

8 The place was called Dwarawatī, indeed a very heaven come down to

earth,

For the king was in truth Wiṣṇu, known as the illustrious Kṛṣṇa in the
mouths of men.

Further, it was arranged as two, as there was also his elder brother, one
with him in fearsome might,

Known as the illustrious Baladewa; their two courts lay side by side,
egually fine.

| 9 This, then, was where the excellent Abhimanyu served humbly at the
feet of the divine king Kṛṣṇa;
The reason that he was kindly disposed was that, as a nephew, he was as
if none other than his own son,
For his mother was the renowned Subhadra, a younger sister to the king,
5o this was the family bond that hc followed in coming to pay his
respects and taking refuge there in the role of a servant.

| 10 Yet even though he was allowed to have his own guarters, and was

¹ tended fondly by his mother and the corps of pages,

l Not to mention the soldiery, who watched over him in every proper
way,

In the manner of the other royal princes, as Kṛṣṇa had decreed, without
distinction,

He was still not at his ease, as like a herald he had to be in constant
attendance at court.

11 In short, he had reached the age of twelve years, and then was just

turning into a young man.

The signs of amorous thoughts resided in his eyes, and these lent
sweetness to his glances.

How could the hint of charm in his speech not turn to feelings of love,
redolent of the bedroomī

And how could the rapture of the heart not fail to bring forth a pretty
song²î

as Ṭext, Canto 2 Ṭranslation, Canto 2 ṣy

12 swang asring makire tinangtang awicârê raśmi ning rāsika -
| lobhânunggalakĕn manis kaliliran sangkê narāryârjuna
nahan hetu nirêki rakwa kilalan kang de ning oghângarang

12 On the other hand he plotted to be challenged to a lawsuit for the
pleasures of love,

As he was greedy to claim sole ownership of the sweetness inherited

dandan ring lara harṣa talyana wiragâwĕtwa ram ning jinĕm ! from the noble Arjuna.
So naturally this was the reason he had to be taxed for love by the pining
a sudng: Ĕ swangyai maṅire: akire; tinangtang: Ṭ tinatang ladies,

b sangk² C mangke laltered to sangke).

agi-ö tan yan awiraga Would be fined for pains and delights, and would be bound with the
P] d talyana wirâgâ-: !

wirdga vine in order to pay up the pleasures of the bedroom.

13 Many were the deeds of the lovely ladies who were longing for guilty
passion with him,

Willing to come and steal a look at him, approaching his sleeping-place.

And this is why they would whet the line of their sharp teeth, already
freshly tempered,

As a means of renewing the assault on his broad, handsome chest, so
that it could be stabbed by their breasts and touch his heart.

13 akweh de ning arūm paḍângayam-ayam hyun duṣṭa kangnyê sira
manggâ yan ḍatĕngâmaling-malinga ring tinghal marêng wiii
hetunyân pangasah sipat waja singî sâmpun winahwan sĕpu
pangladê wĕlar ing jajârja tawĕkĕn ring santĕn angras hati


-- -w w ww|awalv
Jagaanata - - - | w w - l w - v | - | l

1

r CaNTO ĕ

-

tangeh yan ucapĕn rimang ning angajap ri sira wijah atunggalan lulut -

kasewakan irê narendra Harimĕrti rĕsĕp angani nâla ning hati
matangnya tan angel sirângaji kaśaktin inahalan i singhit ing manah
pisan wĕkas ikang hiner nira îurung puput i wĕkas ikânganugraha

b kasewakan: BF pasewakary angani: D angĕni.
c anga¹ Binge; inahalan: irahalan.

tuwin hana manah narendra makamantwa ri sira winunî dalêm hati
ikang kawĕdi lokikāgama ya kāraṇa nira tan atsn amidhyeni
kunang yadin atĕmwa tan pawarahâpuputa wĕlinĕn ing parākrama
ika karika ng enakê hiḍĕp irân wruhi raras ing ulah walat smara

a tuwin: D towin; makamantwa: ADBFH pakamantwai winunṅ Bē winurśng.

b takikdgama: A lokikaśama, H lokikâsama. -

c kunang: BD kunĕng; ntîmum lan pawarahâpuputa wâlinĕn ing parakrama: Bē atĕmwa
rakṣasawiwaha puputa wĕlining parakrama.

d enakâ: F enakêng.

kunang hajĕng ira ng narendraduhita luput ing angĕn-angĕn rinūpaks

pilih wĕkas i buddhi sang hyang agawe wwang ahayu ta kunĕng
hinĕntyakĕn

pangas-ngas ira yan luput lĕkas irâsisinawu magawe Tilottamâ

iki pwa kawaśā lĕmêh ta sira ring wĕkasan ing apa len hana muwah

a kunang hajêng ira ng: ĕkunĕng ayu ni sang, C kunĕng hajĕng ira ng, D kunĕng hajĕnḍ

kunĕng hajĕng irâng. – .
b agawe: B adamĕṭ; kunĕng hin²ntyakân: A kunang ng inĕntyakên.
c pangas-ugas: A pangangsngas, C pangacngasira.
d apalen: B apa yan.

1

CANTO 3

It would take too long to tell of the heartache of the women who longed
for him, each affected by her own kind of attachment.

His service to King Harimarti was deeply pleasing, affecting the core of
his heart;

For this reason he never tired of studying the texts, and their power was
appropriated through the natural leaning of his mind -

He was awaiting one fnal lesson, as the highest of royal favours was not
yet complete.

Moreover the king had a mind to make him his son-in-law, but kept this
hidden in his heart.

What he feared was the generally accepted custom, so this is why he was
not willing to decree it.

However, if they should come together without being told to, and he
should end up buying her with a deed of heroism,

Then *Would that not be bestî¹ he thought, as he understood the charm
of using force to win love.

Now the beauty of the princess was beyond imagining and could not be
depicted,

Or perhaps the last resources of the gods for creating a lovely woman
had been used up.

Out of fear of failure they went ahead and practised by making
TṬilottamā:

If this should be battered, then finally they would be reluctant to go on -
how could there possibly be anotherî


Ṭext, Canto 3 Ṭranslation, Canto 3 a

The beauties uf the garden were troubled by her charms when she had
adorned her uncovered boady:

The fâowers cf the mangunâng fell in worry and embarrassment, afraid
they might be used to add to the fragrance of her hair;

Ṭhe leaves of the imba could be seen frowning, concerned that her
eyebrows might want to attack them,

And even the lotus wilted, thinking it might be driven mad by looking at
her eyes.

arĕs lĕngĕng i ramya ning taman i rum nira ri huwus irâhyas angligā

sâkarnya mangunĕng rurū prihatin epw awĕdi pamapasa mrik ing
gĕlung –é

katon arĕngu ron ing imba niki nāgata ri halis irâhyun amranga

tĕkêng sarasijâlume tĕngi-tĕngin kagalakana tuminghal ing mata

b mangunĕng: Ĕ mangunang; mrik ing: B mrik ning.

c ron p– unba: B ron ṭ mimba; ri halls: ṅ dng alis; amranga: Aē apranga, Camwangṅ.
changgd to aprangĕ.

d tngitmgin: Bngît-ingĕtn. F tanga-têngan; tuminghal: B lumihat.

How could the shoots of the kayu manis tree make the least impression
on her lips as she looked coyly away when offered homage²

Ṭhe resolve of the bees was to fhy away, fearful of the flash of her teeth
when shown in a smile;

The nuts of the ivory betel-palm were too contused to look around at her
breasts when claimed as kangsi gongs for playing the music of lave,

After the failure of the tender shoots to bear fruit, constantly swaying
languidly in attendance on her slender waist.

ndin anggarita sinwam ing kayu manis ri lati nira n inge sinewaka
umara mara pakṣa ning bhramara nâgata ri larap i kengis ing waja
pucang gaḍing alök anoliha ri santĕn ira n inaku kangsya rinĕ smara

ri tan paphala ning sĕwö satata kanglihan angiring i pambĕt ing tĕngahñ

a inge: Ĕine.
b nḍgata ri larap i kengis ing waja: B nagata lara mita nan
c aak anolka: B alĕk manohha.

d paptats: F saphala; sāu³: sawöh: pamb²t: B mambĕt.

gis ing waja.

And the pliant tendrils of the gaḍung vine were far from being able to
entwine the arms of the princess,

Viewing the buds of the wakung turning pale when humbly coming into
the presence of her fingers, although they never touched.

Ĕven the fragrant pandanus-buds waiting respectfully knew they should
be apprehensive and were hesitant to be brought into contact with her
calves -

For it was the nature of her beauty to.be noble, passionate and proud to

be superior in loveliness.

lawan lĕmĕs i lunggah ing gaḍunē adoh milĕta ri lungayan suputrikâ Ṭâ
tumon i kucup ing wakung kaputihan marĕk i jariji tan hanângēne
iwrī tuwi wruh anahâgigu harasakĕnê wĕtis nira

ak mrik as
ṅ n adikāra ring langö

apan purih i rum nirâpangus arājasa puji

a tgmös: ö lbmĕg, F lĕmas.

b wakung: B bakung. Ṭ
c nsṅui tuwi wrul: B asawita tan wruh, Ĕ| kasiwit-siwi.

CANTO 4

wgaai - - - ṭ --¹cwlwwclwwalawwl-w-ls³

1 akweh yan caritan kawarnaṇani rapa nira tuhu lĕwih sakêng Ratih
nda dewr Kṣiti Sundarī subhaga nāma nira saphala katwang in purī
ndan rakwêki rimang-rimang sira tĕkâpti mahas-mahasa ramya lalan
lunghânut kalangên manah nira tinuntun i patuduh i lunggah ing

gadung
a kwuurgauan i râpa wir tuhu lâwih: B kawargaan i rupa niranaka lêwih; tuhu: Ĕ tuhun.
b ada: Fti ndah; Kṣiti È Ṣiti; saphala: B pinaka.
c rimang-rimany: B siran rimang.

2 têkwan tang masa Karttikângarahakĕn lĕngĕng aluluy anamtam ing

mangö ā

darpâsyang-rsyang alon gĕrĕhnya tan arĕn pangaway i jaladanya
kanginan

matrângras larap ing kilat pangujiwatnya n anamayari
mangkatângḍusun

anggyakĕn sakulĕm patĕrnya n amisik-misiki lêyĕpa ring pacangkra

a tang: B pwang; anamtam ing mangö: B i tamtam ing mangṅ.

d auggyâak²n: B anggyatĕn.

a lwir agyā mara rāmya ning giriwanânranga ri hajĕng irân

parânglĕngĕng Ṭ-

sāmpun lambung ikâkilâpamulu campaka linuludan ing drĕs ing ja

mwang romanya ghanâhirĕng pinatah ara saha tali gĕlungnya
wangkawa –

kuntul mor atatâsusup-susup ikâpĕnĕd angapa kasor sakêng mĕnur

a twr A lwū agya Ĕ magyas -nglânṣlâng: ĔH -nglĕngö. R -nglêngana.

b sampun: B lampus; tambung: B lambing: adkila-: ö iki kiris, Ṭ ikâtilar; -pamulu cam|

om, linuludau: ō linudan.
d -âsusupsusup: A -âsusup: -âpĕnāt: A -âpĕnid.

a

CANTO 4

It would be too much to describe in full her appearance, for in truth she
excelled Ratih, the Goddess of Love.

She was knuwn by the name princess Kṣiti Sundarī, with good reason
held in high regard in the palace.

She was of course stirred by various emotions, and conceived a desire to
go roaming, happy and care*ree:

Her idea was to make a tour through the scenes of nature, led on by the
gaḍung tendrils pointing the way.

Moreover the month of Karttika was summoning up its beauties, eager
to devote itself to the muse:

Flated, the soft thunder kept calling constantly as a signal to the clouds
being blown along by the wind,

The âash of the lightning was guite moving as it gave a wink to fix a
time for leaving on a trip into the countryside,

And all night long the rolls of the thunder urged, as it whispered about
how lovely it would be to go on a journey.

It seemed that the charms of the wooded mountains were eager to vie
with her beauty when she came to revel there:

Already their slopes were gleaming with a creamy campaka complexion,
rubbed on by the heawy rain;

Their hair of dark clouds was nicely arranged, and their hair-band was
the rainbow;

The white herons fying in neat formation in and out of the cloud - how
could they be inferior to jasmine flowersî


|- € 00 z « 'l

=r³

44 Ṭext, Canto â

4 tĕkwan raśmi nikang śikhî mrak angaring jĕngĕr angawat i gĕntĕr ing ā

patĕr Ñ
lalityân patajug sĕwö mawida kĕmbang asana mapupur himânipis
panghrĕng ning bharamarângrubung kusuma kambang ika lĕngĕng

arumpukan wungū
tambirya n pasale-sale wĕlas-arĕp wruh araras asawit-sawit gaḍung

a ḍwurt BD siking.
b aṅuṣ:ö sĕwĕh, D tajug.
c kambang: B kĕmbang.

d tambirnya n pasale-: Bā gambirnya n asale, gambamyan pasale.

-

5 nahan lwrr ni langö nikang sakamatan winarahakĕn i gĕntĕr ing patĕ
yângde lĕnglĕng i buddhi sang dyah alangö lagi kajenĕkan angdĕlö
tawang |
ngkân pojar sira lalanân lali lumĕnghay alihangan i bahu ning kaka
yatnângraryanakĕn patĕr sĕmu nikang rĕmĕng angiring i rūm
nirângucap

a hutr nī AD lwīrî. :
d -dngraryanakân: ABH -âraryanakĕnu nikang rtmng: AŊH nikârêmĕng,

6 ndi ngganyâku n acangkrama kaka mahas-mahasa lĕngĕng atapya-

tapyana Ṭ
baddha ni ngwang aśoka tañjung inangit sinalisir abahirya pâdapa

bhasmangku hrĕbuk ing pudak minging asampĕta sĕmi sinalangsangṭ

ing gaḍung Ñ
santosânusupêng pasir wukir asangwa ñĕñĕr i manis ing gangan kap
a ndi ngganyâku n: B ndin ganyakun, ā ndi nggwanyakun, ñ ndin ngganya.

b baddha: AF bandhṅ; inangit: ñ iningin: sinalisir: panalisir.
c bhasmangku hrâuk; B bhasma tang hrĕbuk, H bhasmangku n hrĕbuk.
d manis: B minis.

Ṭranslation, Canto â 45

k4 Moreover the radiance of the plunues of the sporting peacocks was their

speechless response to the roll of the thunder;

Playfully the mountains wore shoots as aigrettes, with the âowers of the
asana as make-up and the thin mist as rice-powder.

The humming of the bees surrounling the Aowers was their enchanting
flower-ornament, putting wungu blooms in thcir hair,

And furthermore they wore as sale-sale the wĕlas-arĕp creeper, cunningly
matching with their cards of gaḍdung vine.

Such was the beauty of the scenes as related by the rolling thunder.

It enraptured the young lady who was day-dreaming, still absorbed in
gaaing skyward.

TṬhen she spoke carelessly, while absently leaning and resting on the arm
of her lady-in-waiting,

And the rainclouds seemed to be watchîul to silence the thunder while
waiting upon her sweet words:

I wonder how it will be when l go on my wanderings, ladies. I could
roam enchanted and lead the life of an anchoress:

My head-band will be the aśoka and tañjung twined and hemmed, and
my bahiri will be of branches.

Let my ash-mark be the pollen of the fragrant pandanus, and let me
wear as a sash youny, shoots threaded on a gaḍung vine;

With peace of mind I shall withdraw to the hills and shores, taking as
provision only the fresh, sweet vegetables of the ourth Month.


Ṭext, Canto 4

tan makweha dahat matêki ng anung enaka ning adulur angrarah
Ilḍâmupwa jamur lawan lalab amañcaka tan arks²hêng is ing rĕrĕb
lunglungan saha larwarlarwan ulihâkĕla-kĕlana ri tīra ning nadī
bhukti mwang nasi matra sotan iki n angliwĕ-liwĕta ri wungbung ing

pĕtung
makweha: COFR akweha; matâki: atîki.

ulua-;B ulih ing, D solihâ-; tīa ning: tirah ing.

a , Ā –, îĀ
b lalab: lalana; amañcakm A mañcuka; arĕsâhêng: B arusuhê; tis ing: C tis î.
c
d

bhukti muang: B bhuktin pwangṛ ikī n: D iking; ri wungbung: ni wungbung, D ṅ

wungwurṣ, thumbung:

nahan ling nṛpatiputrikânggyanṣ i manah ning iña kaka wawang

girahyasĕn

ḍa atyanta dahat wuwusta tuhan anglĕngĕnga mahasa ring wanān
singgih yadyapi söka ng antyasukha buktinĕn ing angĕpĕpê dalĕm p
moghâwarsih alĕh ya tan sinĕlangan lalĕha ning awilāśa lālana

a -ânggyang: Ĕ kang hyang.

b ḍa: BE ḍuh; anglrngânga mahas ring wanantaru: B angṭĕngĕrakĕn unĕng ing wanṣ ing

langö.

c söka ug anlya-: B söh tangantyai sukha: F saka; angêp²pê: B angĕpĕpênĕ.

sangsiptanya harêbu yogya tiki kĕdwakĕna ri haji haywa sangśaya
tuwy ātanggwana rena rakryan ing apa n wihanga sira katon ēirang
apan śrī parameśwarī satata langwan iki sira ng anāma Rukmiṇī

waswas têki tuhan lĕngĕng kaliliranta ngaran ira sakê

b tuwy: towyi rena: AD rêña.
d sakê ADE sakêng.

yayah bibi

ira

Ṭranslation, Canto 4 47

It will not take very much to make us a tasty meal as we go together
searching for young lâmpuyang leaves;

Contentedly we shall gather mushrooms and vegetables, and we shall
catch grasshoppers untroubled by the chilly rain.

Tendrils and fying ants will be what we get ta make a soup on the
banks of the river,

And as for food and a little rice, the thing to do would be to cook them
in tubes of bamboo.¹

This is what the princess said, trying to interest her nurses and ladies,
who were straight away overjoyed:

*Oh what you say is wonderul, madam, that we should go and enjoy
roaming the woods!

Indeed, even though many are the highest pleasures to be enjayed by
those who stay hidden within the palace walils,

Somehow one becomes surfeited and weary if they are not relieved by
relaxing on a pleasant trip.

In short, my lady, it would be best to persuade the King - have no
doubts about it.

And your mother can be relied on to support it - why should she refuseî
It is obvious she will be pleased.

For the ueen has always been a lover of beauty, she who has the name
of Rukmiṇîḍ;

Observe it, madam, in the longing for beauty which you have inherited
through the names of your father and mother.


CANTO ö

Maaraa: - - - ṭ - w- lwwwlcwclwwwlwacwlwwwls

mangkana lingnya tambay irika ta rakwa ya marê narendramahiṣr
majaraken paminta waraputrika mahas acangkramâmĕng-amĕnga
śrr parameśwarī kari sirâwarah ri haji tan wihang narapati

gönga ni tanggal ing wulan inanti ping rwawĕlasêki yan lumarisa

a marê BE marêng.

b -amĕnga: D -amĕngan.

e ri haji: A i haji; tan Èrtar.
d walan: Ĕ wul.

mayu nikâng alapkĕna wineh dadar sahana ning watĕk wwang i dalĕd Ñ

ring paricarikânapaha ring karaṇḍan iña len uwâta ng anĕngah
strī haji kapwa tan hana wineh mahirya tinapis kabeh sang anahil

sang tuna panghañar-hañar iniṇḍĕt ing pahutangan jugângumĕk-umĕj \

a mayu: OF mahyun, Ĕ payu; winek: É wineh tadhah.
b -ta ng anîngah: Ĕ tan anĕngah.

e kapua: B tapwa; mahirya: ĕ ahirya.

d inigḍa ing: A inindĕêr i BCDē inĕṇḍĕt ing.

nista nikân tan ewĕha ning arthasadhana pĕnuh ri sang narapati

nda yayan epu tan wring ulah ing lanâmaluyakĕn pasung nira dadar

ndan lĕwiha ng kinapryakĕn irêng lulut wiwala ning mahirya kataha
yan hĕnĕngê cala niki paran kunang kawĕdi tan kaweha ri sira

a nista nikân tan ewêhu: B nista ni tan anewĕha; -artku: D harsa, Ĕ arsa, F arsha.

b ulah: Ĕ alah; ing lanâ-: B angled.

c udan lâoiha ng kinapryakîn: B ndan lĕwîha ng kinaptyakêĕn, C ngdan lĕwiha ng
kinapryak²n, ÉH lĕwiha kinaryyakĕn.

d wiki: A ni; kunang: DŊFH kunĕng,.

CANTO ö

TṬhus they spoke, and so ārstly they went to the ueen

É And told her of the princess¹s reuest to go and enjoy herself on a

journey.

3 The ueen then informed the King, and he had no objection:
Ñ¹ They would wait till the moon was almost full - on the twelfth they

would set out.

Ahter the plan was agreed all the people of the interior were given gifts:

For the maid-servants a share to the value of one paha each, and for the
widows, wet-nurses and the aunts to the value of half of this;

The King's women were given no occasion to be envious, as they all got
just a little from the treasurer,

Or else those who went without payments for new clothes, held back
due to debt, just grumbled to themselves.

Although there would be no problem with the financial means, for the
King had an abundance,

Éven so they were embarrassed and bewildered at always having to
return the presents he gave;

i Ĕspedially those who had been favoured with his love were worried

about the displeasure the envious might show,
But if they should keep silent at their annoyance, might they not fear he
would give them nothing²


āŪ

Ṭext, Canto ö

³

len wwaya cetikâmalaku sambang ing bibi kakâri mitra ri yawā

mwang ri kakungnya motusan asung kupang muliha wastra mūlya
saphala

molih iking waneh kunang ikang mĕne n muliha kolih ing judi sawunḍ

yêka ng angĕmbĕk-ĕmbĕk amĕgöng tangisnya n apĕgâwĕdi n kawĕḍañĕ

b wmulika: mulaa.
c ikang: Bika. .
d angāmbâ-*mbâ: Ṭ angambĕk-ambĕk.

mwang para taṇda kapwa tiniban dadar sakatuduh kĕnoh angiringa
len para râjaputra Yaduwangśa Samba Gada sang kawidhyan atihang
ndah prawarâbhimanyu nguniweh ta rena nira yatna sāmpun akire

sangka ri kerangan kadurus ing hutang makajaga ng dadar dadi wira

a par: A wara; tiniban: Ĕ katiban; sakatuduh kawoh angiringa: B aahana ning lumampahaṬōĕñ
mĕne.
b from len to ndah katâan (6a): om. atilang: É ahiwang.

ndah katĕkan ikang samaya ning lumampaha mĕnêng kulĕm ḍawuh

lĕpas
wwang ri dalĕm saratri madamar paḍâsipatanâhyasângdani patah
akrak ikang waneh katujah ing sadak mata niki n kasinggul asipat

b sumanggraha ng: B sumanggrahêng; wĕngī B tuli.
c ri A ring; sarâtri madawar; B saratrin adamar; ahyas: B atyas.
d asipat: F apisan.

ḍ But having got it there were others who would return hawing lost it

Ṭranslation, Canto ō 5l

Ṭhere were also serving-girls who went and asked for a contribution
from their mothers, elder and younger sisters and friends outside the
palace,

And to their sweethearts they sent messages giving money to get clothes
fâne enough;

betting on the cockfights -

Ñî It was these whose eyes were hllea with tears as they tried not to cry, for

they were distressed and frightened they would be found out.

r¹ And the guardsmen were allotted presents, for as far as they were given

duties escorting the party,

îAnd the princes of the Yadus, Sāmba and Gada, who were instructed to

stand by.

Ṭhe excellent Abhimanyu and in particular his mother were on the alert
and had already made their plans,

Because they were embarrassed about getting too far into debt, and
counting on gifts would be shameful.

Whaen the appointed time to set out had arrived, later that night at the
sixth hour ṭĕ a.m.),

The elephants, chariots and horses were on hand and the sedan-chairs
were standing ready, and so the night sped by.

Tha people of the interior sat up by lamp-light all night long, to put on
eye-shadow, dress and arrange their hair;

Some shrieked when jabbed with an eye-shadow stick as someone
jostled their arm while they were applying it.

52

Ṭext, Canto ō

tocapa rapa rajaduhita sirân huwus abhnṣaṇâhyas asĕkar
ranḍi winarṇa ring kanaka cūrṇa siñjang ira kumram arja lumarap

canglwi samar lawan kukus ikang salampur ira sāndĕl ing hima sum²

ndi n kêḍapa ng rimang lumihatê sirâpan inuhanya mūñṣa hilanga

a tocapa: B toh apa; -ân huwus sira sabhaṣaṣâ-: BD -2dbhuta huwus abhṇṣaṇâ-, t -a
huwus abhḍṣaṇâr; arjs: A om.

Ī]

d tumihatê Ĕ lumihat; sirâpan inuhaya mukṣa hilanga: B siran pinênuhanya mĕtwa luhi
D sira paniduhanya. -

ndah syapa wânya rakwa mulatê sirân waśa panambhawanya tulaha É

tĕkwan ajöng nirân lagi rinakṣa pahyas ira towi tan sah apingit
tonĕn ikang wiraga milĕt ing gĕlung saha tajug matĕngran asana
lawan ikang susup-susup atingkah asrang angĕmit patah rinacana

a wanya rakwa mulatâ sirā unśa panambhawdnya tulaha: B ta mawanya mulatĕg sirâwasi
panambhawa ratu sura.

b ĕauan: | tang kwan; ajöng nirân lngi rinckṣa pahyas: B iking sarana giri rakwa pahyaṅ; ṭ

towiṅ F towin.
ton²ĕn: ĕ toban ṭv.d.¹. tanĕn); mil²t ing: F milĕtêng.

d lawan: Bb sawang.

a

byakta harĕng bhatara Madanâdine suwĕng irêka malya r rahi
len winangun mamaṇḍaga ginatrākĕn pamuni gandha ning pipi
minging ,
laṭ ri lambay angdani gĕsĕng mrik arja pamĕdinya duṣṭa turida
pamrih ikang sipat ri mata tan karâmanisi mogha tan kawulatan

a harâng: B harĕp; suuîng irâka: surati rekha, É suwĕng rirêka.

b mamuyḍagn ginatrakân pamunl: B mata ganara râga-râga murl .

c gâḍng mrik arja: B ati nwak aṛju pamauinya: B pawĕdinya, Fmamĕdinya.
d ri C ring; tan karâmauisi B tan lara manisi, F tan kara manisa.

cangtuî: BFR cawli; sawarī Ĕ sama; kukus: F tukus; salampur: B sasampaxrī sandâ: Ĕ sarḍ

Translation, Canto ö sa

Let us tell of the princess¹s appearance when she had finished putting on
her adornments and âowers:

Her dress was of raṇḍi silk coloured with gold dust, glowing and
glittering beautifully.

Her shawl was of Chauli cloth indistinguishable from vapour and as
solid as the spreading mist -

Hlow could an admirer afford to blink when looking at her, for he
supposed that she might fade away and disappear.

But who of course would dare to look at her, unless he insisted on
bringing a curse upon himself?

Further, her beauty was being guarded and even her adornments were
always out of bounds.

Just look at the wirdga creeper entwining her coiffure and the aigrettes
bearing the standard of the asana,

And the owers in her hair drawn up and competing to watch over the
arrangement of her hair-band.

Plainly it was the coals of the God of Love that had been made into her

noble suwêng on her forehead,

And formed as a mandaga, shaped as a means of hiding the scent of her

perfumed cheeks.

: The red paint on her lips caused a fine, fragrant scorching for scaring ott

the thieves of love,

ĕî¹ And the smarting of the kohl in her eyes undoubtedly made them
¹ sweeter, till somehow they could not be looked at.


ō4

10

11

12

Ṭex¹, Canko ō

ratna mahöm ika tuku-tukup nirângingĕt-ingĕt sumöng ri talinga
ndan asusun kalung-kalung irânĕngah ri susu tan paweh angarasa
sĕsran abheda rehnya milĕt ing tangan tan asarag lanâmĕlas-arĕp
simsim alĕh kapūhan i manis nirân amasa panggilisnya jariji ā .
matöm: C pagum: ika tuku-tukup: B tiking tuku-tukup; ri: C ring; talinga: ĕ talingan.

ndan: A ndah, ndan, É nda; paueh angarasa: kaweh kaharasa.

mitṅt ing: F milĕti.

aah: Ū alah: nirân amusa: A nirânama; simsim alâh kapâhan i manis nirân amasa

panggilisnya jariji B simsim iran kapuhan i manis nirânawangakĕn alis ri jariji.

a m c u

tan baribin kunang sira ri sök ni hambulungan ing tatur tali tapih
mangkana tang gĕlang nupura ring wĕtis kadi silih jrumâwara-wara
hmgan i yatna ning hyas apingit rumakṣa ri raras nirân lihatana
yadyapi kĕdwa rāgana ng akūng awas p²jaha sākṣanân katuridan

a kunang sira ri sĕk B siran kunĕng i sôk; ni hambutungan: A ning ambulungan, Ṭ ning
kambulungan.

b ring u²tis: D ri wĕts; silih: Ĕ salihu -âwam-uarak: C awararah.

e ning hyas: B ring hyas: lihatana © lihata, ĕ -nglihatana.

d rggana ng akang: È raga tan akung, C raga ni akung, * raga ning akung; awss: H ga

ndah tumiba ng ḍawuh nĕm irikân wijil haji lawan watak sang i dalöḍ lm

kapwa matunggalan śakata ta pwa de nira kabeh tĕkêng kakarkaka

gasjita sang huwus tinuduh unggwana ng turung anumpak akrak
anangis

kari lanâkĕdal-kĕdalan osah onĕk awĕdi n lumakw aḍarata

a irian: F irika; wijil haji lawan watĕ sang i dalâm: D miji apa lan watĕk wwangi dalṄḍ
b ta pwa: Bē kapwa.
c tinuduh unggwana ng turung anumpak: B ânuduhan nggwana n turung umunggaku

om.
d -Ākḍdal-kâdalan asah on²k awadi n lumakw aḍarata: -akrdal-kĕdal anolih onĕk awĕdi
kasep aḍarata; asak onâk D aras atanĕk, Ĕ osah onik.

Ṭranslation, Canto ō [3

Ñ;W The assembled jewels of her ear-cups¹ were attentively lighting up her

ears,

Ñ: While her necklaces were arranged across the middle of her breasts, and

would allow no one to kiss them.

Ñî: The wristlets varied in the ways they entwined her arms, calmly and

always as pitiful as the wêlas-arâp vine,

ḍ And her rings felt faint and exhausted by her sweetness as they tried to

resist the kneading of her fingers.

f 5he was not distracted, however, by the large number of plates in the

gold of her girdle,

And likewise the bandi of her calves seemed to be teasing each other as
they reported back and forth.

Such was the extent of the watch her ornaments kept over her beauties
lest they be seen,

But if a lover should insist on being stricken with passion, he would
certainly die on the spot with infatuation.

Ṭhen the sixth hour struck, and that was when the King and the inmates
of the palace emerged,

All of them with their own carriages, right down to the ladies-in-
waiting.

Those who had been allotted places were elated, but the ones who had
not yet mounted wept and wailed;

Left behind they constantly fluttered back and forth, restless and
downhearted, fearful they might have to go on foot.

-


se Ṭext, Canto ō Ṭranslation, Canto ō 57

h The departure need not be describeu - they travelled happily along,
ḍ looking at the districts they passed through:

î The trees could not yet be clearly seen, like wayang puppets, while the
Śh tuworg gracefully joined in with its charming songs.
gñ Finaly they had moved on and were overtaken by day on the edge of
the ñelds at the foot of the hills,
Ñ Whtre the jungle fowl merrily crowed, rivalled by the soft barking of the

13 tan huningan layat lari nirâlalĕh lumihat ing pradeśa kahawan
tapwan awās tahĕnya sawayang kuwongnya lalitâlalĕh mangidungi
ring wĕkasan lĕpas karahinan ri himbang i tĕgal ni jöng ing acala
ramya macanggiger ayam alasnya sinrang i pamangsul ing kidang aloā

lumihat ing: A lumihat i.

latitâlalĕṅ: lali tan mangĕ.

hâmbang i âgal ni jâng ing acala: B jöng mangacalanya ramya kasĕpĕr.
ramya macanggiger: A ramya paḍânggiger, B ri pacaginggar ing, Ŋ ramya macanggigḍ
B ramyan acanggiger. ³

a fṅ c t

14 towi paḍâkĕmul hima mara ng tahĕn hatur atis bĕsur kajawuhan
wyartha wijil hyang arka lagi tan katon katawĕngan ghanâtaratayan
len ika larwarlarwan amĕwĕh bangun kukus ing ambarângibĕki rt
marma ni tan katon i tuwuh ing jamur tuwin asong pangĕmbĕng ing

ĕbun

atis bâsur kajmuuhan: B atistis kajawĕhan.

wjjî: F gati; -âtaratayan: F -âtaraweyan.

ika: B iki.

ni tan: F nikan; jamurī A jamū; tuwin: D towin.

ĕḍ Éurther, the trees were wearing a blanket as if feeling the cold and sick

Ñ or being rained on,

ḍ ṭ And to no avail the holy Sun emerged, as it still could not be seen,

ā obscured by the straggling clouds.

|ā Apart from that, the âying ants appeared in ever greater numbaers like

É smokein the sky, flling the world,

And that is why the growth of the mushrooms could not be seen, even
though they carried an umbrella against the gathering dew.

a f a mw

ĕ Then the trippers descended from their carriages, excited and elated,

ḍ And competed in collecting mushrooms and young lrâmpuyang leaves,

ḍ¹ while others gathered lalab vegetables to their heart's content.

Others hunted for grasshoppers in the gardens, but were hard put and
perplexed by the swarms of âying ants,

Bi And see the ones who had not got anything, just failing about in an

. astounding way, confused and clumsy.

15 ngkân tumurun sakêng śakata sang macangkrama girahyasĕn wija-wî
asrang amet jamur saha ririh dudū tikang amet lalab sakatāngĕn
len tang amañcak ing haraṇan epu kemĕngan i pangjrah ing laru-laru
nya ng turung olih endah akĕdal-kĕdal juga hariñjangĕn salah ile

a ngkân: B ngka; sakêng: B saking. ḍ

b ririk F rarih; lalab: B gangam; sakatângĕn: B sakasĕnĕng, C sakatĕngĕt.

c amañcak ing haraṇan epu: B amet caking rana hadepun, carr. by v.d.T to amañcak ing
rana hanêpu.

d hariñjang²n: B (hjariñjangan. F arincangĕn.

–é³

Ṭranslation, Canto ō 59
5 Ṭext, Canto ō

ĕḍ Likewise the jewel of a princess also joined in their elation and felt guite
carried awayṅ
Her gait was very languid and slow, as she clung to her duenna¹s arm,

16 mangkana ratnarâjaduhitā muwah milu wijah ring ambĕk alangö
lampah irârdha kanglihan alon agĕgwan iña mar sapādapa lume

munggah amarga ḍampa yan angel hana n tĕka hana n turun mahas- 3 swaying like a wilting branch.
ahas -ñ She would mount a sedan-chair when she was tired - now she came,
ganjita ring kakângaturakĕn sĕkar sing angĕne wineh nira sĕrĕh Rî and now she got down to wander about;

c hana n:F hana. ĕḍ whichever took her fancy she gave them betel.
d -dngaturakân: C -ânghaturakĕn; sérâh: BF sĕpah. ¹


Tunaagati: - w w l w c w l wwwlwwlwwwlwwclw-wl*

1

CANTO ô

tucapa warâbhimanyu karĕhĕn sira saha pariwâra kadyahan
angurati ngani lampah ira hamham amungarana ramya ning gĕgĕr |
swang abasahan hañar-hañaraṅ aṇa sinalisir anekawarṇana j
narah apa n eñjuh angdadak apet ulah akĕmu-kĕmul gibah wulung '

a karâwn: B tumutur, Ĕ narĕhĕn.

b anguratiṅ B angulati; amungarana: B amukaraga.

c -hañaran arjm: B añar atarija.

d apa n eñjuh angdadak apet: B apat arjanângdadak ulat.

tuwi paḍa darśarīya ng angiring ruciragati tĕkêng apawwahan
sama-sama len anaṇḍangi sabuk nira lawan ikang anghawin karas
salukat akokiran walĕsan apnĕd aracana rinâkṣan ing rare

sira lalitâmasang papikat epu rumaras i panambĕr ing jarah

darâantya: A darśaṇlra; ruciragati: B rucitagati.

anghawin: A hawin, F angawin.

apn²d aracana: A pĕnid aracana, B apnĕd arawana, D apĕnĕd aracana.
lalitânasang: ê lali namasang (corr. by v.d.ī. to tâmasang), D lalita pasang; jarah:
rajah.

a m Ū –

tĕka mara ratnarâjaduhita lumihat i sira ñör ikang hati

ri gati nirêki sanak amisan tuhun atĕgĕg apan turung waśa
huwus apisan kunang sira sapocapana manawa ramya solaha
pinasahakĕn pwa de ning atuhâpuhara ta kadi len kamerangĕn

a ñör kang: B Ñĕr tikang.
b uaśṅ A waśsa.
c apisan: B sapisan, F amilsan; kunang: B kunĕng; manaua: B manapa.

CANTO 6

followers and the troupe of pages:

¹ He had guickened his pace, keen to be the first to enjoy the scenery of

the ridges.

j . Instead of wearing a brand-new ceremonial garment nicely bordered in

various colours,

P wWhat else should he do but playfully turn around and try to draw

attention by wrapping himself in a gibah of dark blue!

ĕ—î Further, eually worth seeing were those who accompanied him *with

charming gait¹, including the betel-set bearers,

Just the same as the one who carried his sash and the one who bore his
writing-tablet;

A salukat with carvings and walĕsan neatly arranged were guarded by a
boy,

. And he happily set decoys, but was perplexed and filled with emotion
when the wild birds swooped down.

| mhe jewel of a princess came and when she saw him she felt suddenly

moved,

i Being as he was her first cousin, but.even so she stopped short, as she
h! not yet properly acṇuainted.

ad they, however, talked together even once, perhaps they would have
behaved more freely,

Ññ lBut they had been kept apart by their parents, so that they were now like

strangers and felt embarrassed.

62

Ṭext, Canto ô . -
Ṭranslation, Canto ê 63

tuwi kataman wirang sira rikāna ri hana ning anagwarnagwakĕn
sumĕmangakĕn saraśmya nira ring lituhajĕng araras priyambada
bari-bari nora len inucap ing kaka-kaka pinakesi ring purī
iki mara waspadân tuhu wuwusnya ya tikang amangun manah dudū]

ḍ Further, she had been âlled with shyness formerly when in the presence
ḍî of someone who kept arousing amorous thoughts -

& It would be disturbing to share with him the delights of his charming
(] looks and kind wordes.

Ñā Éath day every lady-in-waiting in the palace spoke of nothing else:

wirang: BCD irang; rikâna: A om.
Ña ¹Ṣiĕiĕ plainly true¹, they said, and that is what made her suspicious.

a

b sumēmangakên: B sumĕmanakĕn; ring: ĕ ri.

c nara len: B tekl merang; pinakesi ring: B pakesl ning.

d ya tikasg amangun: B ya tikan amangun, D ya tika mamangun, k tika ya mangun.

inimur-imur nirêng twas i salah sĕmu ning angĕn-angĕn ndatan lipur
winungu ni pasrang ing kaka-kakângjawat i sira Dhanañjayatmaja
tuhan apa hetu ning layat aninggalakĕn atilar ingwang atpada
têdanĕn ikung karas patĕmu harṣa niy usun i langönta suswana

ā |.¹

B Śne tried to calm her heart because of the disordered state of her
â ¹ thoughts, but they were not to be soothed,

| 4 Aroused by the maids vying in making advances to Dhanañjaya¹s son:
¹% 'Śir, what is your reason for leaving home, abandoning us and leaving
î ushelpless?
éḍ I must beg that writing-tablet of yorirs, born of the marriage of my joy
with your heauty, to be suckled.'

a mim ng: BDā nirêng; ning angîn-angĕn: BE inangĕn-angên.
b winungu nṅ B winuwuhl.
c aninggalakên atilar ṅ B anilarakn i galing.

This is what they said, but he paid no heed, still completely absorbed in
considering the beauties of nature,

nahan iki lingnya tan wawarĕngĕh sira lali pijĕr anghiḍĕp langö
tuwi tan adoh dahat pwa sapamaṇḍĕm irika n inuhuh sakêng hĕnū
kahaliwatan matêki wĕkasan karakĕtan i gawe nirâpikat
nṛpaduhita pwa lagi kamatolihĕn adalihan asyang ing kaka

îō called out to him from the path.
k Finally they had passed him by, carried away with his activity of

a wawarâugṅ: Cāñ wawarĕngĕh; piîr: A pijaī anghiḍâp langt: B anglangö-langö.
decoying birds,

b irika: B sira; inuhuh: B inuwuh.

calling to her ladies.

lalu wĕkasan ḍatĕng ta naranātha sahana Yaduwangśa tan kasah
irika Dhanañjayatmaja marĕk humaturakĕn ulih nirâpikat

anginaki buddhi solah ira sewaka tumuluy amangku pawwahan r
lumawan i goṣthi sang prabhu tuwin hirĕng amacĕ-macĕh ginuywakĕ é

Ñfnd so Dhanañjaya¹s son approached and presented what he had

âl| caught.

ÑlṬhe way he served put one in a pleasant mood, and thereupon taking

ĕl| the betel-tray on his lap,

Bl He joined the King in conversation, and when he wittily jested his jokes
were greeted with laughter.

c anginaki B manginaki; amangku: B amangkwa.
d hir²ng: Ĕ arĕng.

sragahara - - - | w- l ṛwwlwwwlwcalwaalwn*

1

CANTO 7

a

lungha lampah narendrâhyun angusira pasir lalanâtat wanādri

tan warṇan reh nirâraryan amangan anginum ndângrĕrĕb yan
kawĕngyan

têkwan de ning lumampah tinĕbu-tĕbu nirêng pringga sĕngkan kini

sarwecchâsing katön ing hati juga tinĕkan sanukhanê suputrī

b ndângrarâṅ: B angrĕrĕb, Ĕ nangrîrĕb, F nda rĕrîb.
c tinâu-tâu: Ĕ tinĕngu-têngṅ: nirâng: b nirê.
d sdnukhanê: B sanukaning.

ndan dewī rakwa lênglĕng sira vrahu kataman rāga sakṣmângras i

tontonĕn ry Abhimanyu n kawulatan amangun ringrang erang
wirangrwang

ndah mangka Parthaputrârdha salah angĕn-angĕn mogha kāngĕn sa
adyah Ṭ-

ngkân tan ry amban lumampah pati lumaku sirân marchitâsring
kasaṇḍung

-nḍras: Ĕ ngrĕs.

*awulatan: Ĕ kahulatan; wirangwrang: Ĕ wirangrwa, Ṭ wirangwa.
mangkt: É mangkany; moghu kangân: F mogha n pangĕn.

ngkân: B ngka; sirâu: Ṭ sira.

a. rm –' –

tambing ning lwah-lwah ahning hawan ira sahajamungwakĕn kung
adyah

kriñcing ning wwe sakêng grong sapatakis i kale ning marâñidra ratī

asring mulyar larap ning kakul aniru liring ning wikampêng atangh

kumlab ryaknya n sasiñjang ri kĕtĕr i laku ning tan bisângöl raras twa

a kriñcing: Ĕ krincin, Ṭ krancing; wwe A we, ĕ wai; sakâ BC sakêng; -āidra: B -nidra.

c mulyar: D mulya; kaku aniru lining: ĕ kutul tka maniru ṭcorr. vd.T. kakul aniru
wikampêng: A sikampeng, ĕ wikalpeng, Ŋ wikampad.

d ryaknya: D ry awaknya; ri kâîr: B sakĕtĕr; bisangsl: B bhiṣânghel.

CANTO 7

ÑṬThe King went on his way, desiring to reach the shore, passing at his

Ṭh ease along the wooded hills.
ṭ Wĕ need not relate how he halted to eat and drink, and took his rest

Ñ | when overtaken by night.

ḍ

îî °Now the way he went was by short stages and it was the rugged and
r¹ śteep places he sought out,
B Aṅd completely at his ease he just did everything he wished for and at
the same time brought pleasure to the princess.

passion that moves the heart,

é And in her mind's eye she kept seeing Abṅimanyu as she had caught

¹ . sight of him, and this aroused feelings of bewilderment, shyness and
ḍ ḍ confusion.

| Partha¹s son too was very distracted and somehow kept being reminded

of the young lady,
And so in confusion he wandered about aimlessly, oblivious and

Ñ¹ stumbling from time to time.

banks of the clear rivers was where he went, and these naturally
i aroused his love for the lady:
ḍâe datter of the water from the cleîts in the rocks was like the clash of
|: the anklets of someone stealing in at night;
lRrom time to time the ash of the rwater-snails sparkled, imitating the


r

66 Ṭext, Canta 7

| | Ṭranslation, Canto 7 67

Ñ Its banks were neat, always well dressed, having shaved its eyebrows

. | and with crabs wying to serve as hairpins,

And its stones side by side were just like breasts, wearing moss, and

¹ | eḍen with shell-ñsh as nipples.

| Wâile the suhun bras fish put on oil, its sands were arranging bands in
ḍ their hair, all the more touching,

baḍ the water moved fast, knowing well how to 'foam¹, as it did not

bw in the same direction.

! 4 pinggirnyâpnĕd lanâhyas kari n apara-paras karkaṭâsrang masuksuk }
sakṣat santĕn watunyâpipit alumu-rlumut swâng akĕmbang susuhnyaṭ
lagy adīkṣa suhun bras tuwin apata-patah tang hĕnr mangkin angrĕs
ndân adrēs polah ing wwe wruh awĕrĕ-wĕrĕh an tan panunggal hilṭ

i
\

a kari n apara: B karika para; karkaiī-: kata; masuksuk: ADH asuksuk.

b -pipit: D mipṅ; suang: Ĕ awang; akânbang: matimbang.

c lagy adṣa: A lagyâdik pang-, B lagyârgdik sang, C lagyadiksa, D lagyadiksang ;
angras: Ĕ angras. - é:

é he morning the hills were merry, and the gathered trees put on

eñjng ramya ng wukir kaywan apupul asĕkar lwir sukhâwahya- bwers as if they were going to have a party:

wahyan hīle the Āping sang the songs others clapped to accompany the
lagy anggnâng ĕping len têpakan angiring ing kungkang ing grong ¢horuses of bullśrogs in the crevices.

abaṇḍung Ñ And the musical water-mills vied at clattering uninterruptedly,
mwang pasrang ning taluktak manguluṭak atarik suwarânrang ki competing with the melodious saluṇding;

saluṇḍing É It was extraordinary huw the peacocks responded to the cries of the

endah de ning mayarângawat i pasurak ing taban ahyā gumĕntĕr waterfalls roaring thunderously.

a -wahya-wahyan: ADH waywa-waywan, Ĕ waywarwayan.

b tâṭpakan: B tikapan; angiring ing: ÉH ikang iring: abauḍunṭ: Ĕ anyaṇḍung.

taluktak manguluṭak: B taluktaknya mangutak, Ĕ taluktak mangutak; saluṇḍng: D
| salondhing; ahya: B ahyang, F yhya.

Ī]]

l
! Ṭhe excited bees were intoxicated by the delicious taste of the honey
ḍ ¹ they drank from the whole forest of flowers,
ĕi And with closed eyes the bamboo dreamily nodded, leaning over, and
ṭ, without fail the birds shrieked.
Éĕṭ'he clouds burped and kept throwing up rain, and the ridges

Ñli¹ âbandoned the mist spreading at their feet,

Ñḍhê watchmen¹s huts staggered out to the fields, and the flowering

-l hras vine had to be led by the hand.

6 kumbang darpâwĕrö de ni rĕsĕp i madhu ning puṣpa sâlas bhinukti

mrĕm lolyângangguh-angguh pĕtung ika dumudul tan swang ang
manuknya É

meghâtwab lot mutah warṣa gĕgĕr atilar ing sanghub awrā ri jöngnyaāḍ

pangringgang-ringgung ing ranggwan amarĕki gagā jangga mĕmbanṬōñ
tinuntun

b loayângangguh-angguh: B kolyangangah-anggah: pâung: A pĕtang.

d ing ranggwan: AD i ranggwan, Ĕ irangwana; amarâī: B umarĕk i

Jagaauhiu: - - - | w wlwwlwwclwwwlwwwlaw-lws

1

CANTO ĕ

-

sangsiptan laku sang marêng pasisi tan huningan iki lawas nirêng hĕ
eñjing kongang ikang pasir tĕkap irân lari wahu tumurun sakêng gĕg
ceṭr kapwa rimang girahyasĕn aninghali pakusikan ing ryak omba
kady anungsunga garjitê tĕka sang anglĕngĕng angiring i nāthaputri
b urṅ Ĕlagi

c girahyas²n: Ĕ| girahyasĕna.
d tîa Ĕ taka.

ngkānêng lod hana nūṣa marwata katon wahu winĕḍar i teja ning ra

empĕn tapwan agöng dahat kadi dine ning Atanu sakatonan ing tulis

lwir prasada mangunggul endah apucak ranu mulutak angagra
jambangan

sorêsuk niyatân iki n parana ning hyang adulur arahup macamana

a ngkanâng: ngkânê; waruata: Bā parwata, C parwata, altered to marwata; ṅ C ing.

b empan: Ū epen.
c endah: D indah; mulutak: Ĕ mulat ikang, F mulu tikang.

tasanyâparĕpat mangertali tumĕmpuh ing udadhi sinungsung ing h

wwenyârok apagut kawantus i parungnya sumirat amangun kuwun
kuwung

lot saryâmĕtu hangsa-hangsa sumawur lumarap aputih anghulap-h

len tang mĕltuk ing antarala tan awās angĕḍap-ĕḍap anguntul
anglayang

a parĕpat: EF maröpat; tumĕmpuh: DE tumampah.

c -mîtu: Bb -wĕtu, C wĕtu changed to mĕtu.
d matuk: A mĕntuk, tṭ mlĕntuk; angâlaṛ : Ĕ mangĕdhap.

CANTO śĕ

-
Ñ êân be brief about their jourey to the seashore and tell no more
ut how long they took on the way.
śînoming they caught sight of the beach below as they proceeded
ṭ, having just descended îrom the ridges.
ṅid-servants were filled with longing and delight to see the tossing
waves as they broke,
Ñĕâṭ îh*hey were joyfully welcoming the arrival of those pursuing beauty
î the twain of he princess.
-
ĕîhere in the sea there was an island shaped like a mauntain that could
be seen, just revealed by the rays of the sun,
dj Ījompact and not very big, as if made by Atanu, as can be seen in
e n
ÑÑt was like a tower-temple soaring to an amaaing height, with a lake at
ñ its peak, gushing in the form of a crater-lake -
PmMorning and evening it was plain that this was where the divinities
ṭ wouud go in a band to wash their faces and rinse their mouths.

ṭ

– îh stream was divided into four parts, flowing as waterîalls into the sea

³ \ tand welcomed by the currenṭ;

he waters mingled as they met and were dashed against the rocks,

. lhending up spray that formed rainbows,

Ṅdsra tly producing white horses, spreading roundabout and shining

ha dazaling whiteness,

e rising into the air, no longer clearly visible and winking in the
îṭashion of Aying herons.

r- 0000zzz z é« | |l|

70

-- w-

Ṭext, Canto

honyêking kaparö muwah karang awarṇa siluman arĕcĕp kadînukir
astam tang kadi caṇḍya-caṇḍyan ajajar hana kadurus ajagjag ing bañj
len lwrr asrang ago hurang harama tan wawarĕngĕh ing alun pasanḍ

surud
asring molih agöng tikā kahiḍĕpanya n inuhuh i surak ning amp

a honyking: ADH honyêki; kaparś: D kaparĕk.

b ing bañuĕi bañu. .

c wauarêngâs C wawarĕngö, Ĕ wawarĕngāĕn.

d AH saut du même au même from kahiḍĕpanya to kahiḍĕpanya in öd.

tan tunggal tang aweh lĕngöng ning umulat nya ng amayang amibit
hanâmukĕt

lwa tan hana rĕsnya ring wway i dĕmit ni parahu nikî lad paḍâgalinḍ

mosyan himpĕr aburwarburwar anĕngah sakayapu kalilī n huwus Ñ

lwir mukṣêng tĕpi ning langit kahidĕpanya hilang anusup ing
ghanâhirĕng

amibit: A aminit, Ŋ amigit.

b hana rânya: É inapusnyai ring wway i ḍamit: A ring wwang i ḍêmit, Cē ri wway aḍḍ
D ring we yi ḍĕmiu uṅî Ĕ nika.

e aburwa-burwan: Ĕ aburwananang; sakayapu: D sakayamu, Ĕ sekayapu; huwus: Aĕ u
C hawus.

d mukṣêng: CDE mukṣê.

w

endahnyân hiḍĕpĕn langit rĕbah ikang jaladhi ḍawuh anungsanṣ iṇṭ
lĕmah

meghanya ng paranasa honya manukanya layar ing amayang
mangambara

sêmbur ning gajamma têki jawuhanya mĕlĕtuk i ruhur mawangka

ryak muntar lumarap winarṇa kilatanya n apatĕra gĕrĕh ning amp

a râan: ṅ têbah typoîṅ anungsang: ADÉ anungsung, B anungsung, corr. to anungs
b meghanyr BCF moghanya; paranūsa: B paranupa: manukanya: E mahumanya.
d ryak Ĕ ryuk; muntar: BF muncar; u pat²ra: Īi patĕra.

– ṭîow extraordinary it would be to imagine the sky collapsed and the sea
Ñ | falling upside-down on the earth:

h
Ṭ Ṭranslation, Canto 71

Ṣeawy this there were also reefs, looking mysterious and attractive as if

they had been carved,

éi
¹ Ñb

- Ñot to mention the ones like make-believe caṇḍis in a row - some had

â waded out too far into the water,
| And others seemed to be competing in graping for shrimps and harama

¹ ṭébs, paying no heed to the waves or the tides:

[fhâre were various things that enchanted the watchers: see, the people
ṭ1 âhing with trawl-nets, with hooks and others with seine-nets,

- Aîtheir ease, without fear of the water, seeing the slenderness of their
Ñi boats, all eṇually unsteady,
¹ī iBustling to and fro as if pursuing each other out to sea, like aḍuatic

fowers swept along by the current, for they were already well on their
way,

As if dissolving into the horizon, one wou'd think, disappearing into the
black clouds.

Ṭhe clouds are the other islands, and here are the birds - the sails of the
| fishing-boats reaching into the sky;

ṭîhe spouting of whales would be the rain, spreading high with

woname:- - wl ww-lw-wlwwualwcwlww

CANTO Y

-

tangeh yan ucapĕn lĕyĕp lĕngĕng i rāmya ning sakamatan
ḍatêng ta sang acangkramâsĕmu girang watĕk binihaji

makadi parameśwarī dumunung ing bale maparĕpat
pasanggraha lĕyĕp langönya n angungang wway ing tasik arĕs

c maparĕat: Ĕ marĕpat, pamarĕpat.

karaṇḍan iña len uwa wruh irikang sayogya panganĕn
ulih ning apikat mamañcak amibit kabeh rinatĕngan
aneka mara pawwat ing juru samā tĕka sapasisi

sĕsök pĕnuh ikang bhinukti tuna raśmi têki wĕkasan

e mara: AH para.
d raśmi: Ĕ rasi.

narendraduhitâmisah sira hanêng mahantĕn alangö
aninggilis i dunghus ing karang anungku-nungkuli pasr
jengor sira pinangku ning kaka lali n mangö kadi rakĕt
huwa juga manah nirā mulati sagarâtĕpi langit

a misah: É pisah. -
c jḍngör: A ñjör; pinangku: A panangku. –
d huua juga manah nira: Ŋ uwa panajugan ira, F tuwa juga manah nira

aneka mara ceṭika nira widagdha ring kalĕngĕngan
lumālana manah nirân lumawanî sirângucap-ucap
duda ng wijah amukti sarwakusuma muik angjrah asinang
lawan tikang amet karang-karangan ing pasir sakaharĕp

b lumauwant Élumawaning.

c duda ng: DOF dudu.

CANTO ṣ

It would take too long to speak of the dim beauty of the scenery to be
ṭen there-

ê travellers arrived, and the King¹s wives looked pleased,

pecially the ḍueen, who took up lodging in a four-sided pawilion
Īch stood ready to offer enchanting beauty, as it overlooked the
âesome waters of the sea.

ĕḍ The widows of the household, duennas and aunts knew about what it

ḍ. was proper to eat:

Ñ The bag from catching birds, hunting grasshoppers and fishing was all
Ñ¹ cookeu.

B Various items were offered by the village chiefs and even the local folk,

;, ÑÉ And what was consumed was so abundant that in the end it began to
. Ṣḍ
. ḍ pall.

¹ The princess withdrew to be alone in a lovely pavilion

Ñ Ṭerched high on the top of the cliff looking down over the shore.

- Speechless she lay in the lap of her lady-in-waiting, absorbed in musing,
Ñĕ as still as a mask,

| Ā ā And her thoughts just roamed free as she gaed at the sea stretching as
ĕ. far as the horixon.

'
ṭ
Jarious of her handmaidenis, skilled in the arts,
, PDiverted her mind by engaging her in conversation,
;While others excitedly enjoyed ali the kinds of fragrant flowers that
- ] glowed roundabout,

R*Ṅâs well as the ones who went looking for karang-karangan on the beach
É¹ to their hearts¹ content.


-* |1 l

74

Ṭext, Canto Ṣ

nihan tang arurĕk silih galah arok jĕmur kawigaran
tĕwĕknya kusumâjurit-juritan ing hĕnīsilih usī

larut ng asana śrrṇa hĕnti tinutuh ranginya n arukĕt
wuluh gaḍing ikang watang rinawisanya pādapa lume
a kawigaran: A kawiragan.

b tâwĕk- H tuwĕk.

silih tĕbah amaṇḍĕm ing sumanasângduk ing puḍak arūm
sinambi niki n adyus asrang amapag ryak anggyat angasut
hanâtilar i ken ikângumak-amik yayângumĕk-umĕk

tan erang i cacadnya rambiḍan ikang wilut pwa kutilĕn

a tâah: DF tângah, -duk: F -lek.
b amapag: D apapag.

ṭ | Ṭranslation, Canto Ṣ 75

is is how those who grappled and speared each other came to grips in

Ṭ a boisterous melee:

Ṭheir daggers were fowers as they played soldiers on the sands
| jpursuing each other,
rṬhe asana flowers were gone and ruined - they had lopped them all as
¹ lshields as they fought,

d they had adorned their lances of ivory bamboo with tassels of the
! h branches.

ḍrhey failed each other, pelted each other with sumanasa Aowers and
§ lstabbed each other with fragrant pandanus buds,

ṭ ind at the same time they bathed and vied in going to meet the waves

| that unexpectedly washed over them -
Śame abandoned their dresses and muttered as if grumbling to

â |
|

ā | Ñemsaes

nashamed of their defects - they were pock-marked and the bent ones
suffered from warts.


CANTO 10

ĕasantatiaka: - - w l - v w l w - w l w - w l = ī

1 byauta rehnya huningan gati sang narendra
lalwya lalana ri sor ning aśoka mĕmbang
Pradyumna Samba Gada taṇḍa kabeh asewa
tan sah Dhanañjayasutâmawa pawwahan mĕs

2 swecchân pamukti sakatön rasa pâna matsya
twak ring gĕḍah sumaji len taḍah adwittya
asring tika cinarik ing bala mantri mukhya
mowah mĕne tĕka mĕne sing apūrwarpūrwa
a pamuktiṅ B pamukti ng.

b adwitiya: F adwitya.
c cinarik: A cinarak.

3 gmâmṛdangga karĕngö lalitângrĕsi twas
mwang goṣthi lalana sareh ning aguwyan-guywan
kintw mg abhaṇḍagiṇa yêka hanêng kadohan
tontonĕn ing sapasisi n t²ĕka sök arampak

b aguywa-guywan:ī A agūyu-guywan.
c kintw g: B kintang; hanêng: B han².

4 nā reh nareśwara tuhun prawarâbhimanyu
amwit sirân sumĕlangâmĕng-amĕng marêng doh
wwantĕn gihâlĕnglĕng anungkuli sāgarâjro
lwir pañcuran wway umijil ri dungus-dunusnya
a tuhun: Ĕ tun.

b amwit: mamwit.
c anungkuli: B angungkuli.

d tontanâu: B tontonan; sgwsisi n: sapasisen; sk: D sak; arampak: Bē marampak.

CANTO 1

pass over what they did; let us find out what the king was doing:
was gracefully relaxing beneath the flowering aśoka trees,
dyumna, Samba, Gada and all the officers were waiting on him,
Dhanañjaya¹s son was constantly there, bearing the golden betel-

hh ease he enjoyed all he desired of the fAavours of drink and meat,
Palmwine in porcelain was served, and foods without peer.

lāiom time to time they were taken away to be consumed by the troops
fl and leading ministers,

¹ Nbw changing, now coming, whatever was without precedent.

Ñ !|

ṅ

ḍ Éongs with drums could be heard, gently moving the heart,

Ñ Ās well as relaxed conversation and all manner of jesting together.
îBut as for the actors, they were at a distance,

o be watched by the local people, who came in throngs.

ēî li
é
Bîṭ |

was with the King; the worthy Abhimanyu, however,

ed leave to take time off and go for a walk far away.

âere was a lovely cave looking down on the deep ocean,
d like fountains the water emerged from thc cliffs.

y> 0ll

78

Ṭext, Canto 10

ngkanê ruhurnya paranganya ṅamut mangunggul

wwenyân pangertali tumampuh i tūban ing grong

sök sarwapuṣpa ri hiringnya mĕnur śikantĕn

pandan wwang anglih alangö n lumigê puḍaknya

b wwenyn ns A wenyâ-, Cāf wwainyam -pangertali: BD mangertali; tumampuh i:
tumĕmpuh a-.

c śikant²n: Ĕ sakanten. .
d anglihalangö n lumige: A angîh alangĕn lumige, anglah alangö lumiga.

marmaâsĕgĕh lwir i langönya ri sang suputra
sungsung-guyunya winĕḍar ni girang-girangnya

na padapângaway akon jĕnĕkêng śilâpnĕd
syungnyângaka mpu wuwus ing trĕguka paḍângling
a -sĕgâh: F nĕgĕh.

c ada: BF nyang.

d -ugaka mpu: ĕ -ngakan pwa: trĕgukū: D trĕgutw. F trĕkuku.

ngkân lalanâpuḍa-puḍay wara Parthaputra
Punta Praśanta dumulur sira len Jurudyah
rāgī n panon ryak anikĕl sapatah ning adyah
wör ning gurundaya lĕyĕp sahalis gumiñcang
a -puday: A -paḍay.

b urudyah: ī Juradya.

c ragī n: B râgan, Ĕ raging.

ngkân mar tĕñuh twas ira rañca rimang prapañca
edan tĕkângĕn-angĕn ri hajĕng sudewī

elik sirê hati nirân kataman smarângras

kung duṣṭa kengĕr i kadangnya mĕne n adoha

b sudeuî: Bsuputri.

c aik: f elin; sirê ĕ irang; smarângras: ĕ amarĕstra.
d i kadangnya: B ika danya; adoha: anohan, adoh ya.

Ṭranslation, Canto 10 79

4 e on the heights the crags were dimly visible towering upwards,

Ñ the water in thin streams pourad down into the torrents in the gaps
Ñthe rocks.

Râ ḍ* the 'man¹ pandanus felt weak with poetic emotion as it laid bare its

Ñas.

sungsung-guyu ('receive with a smile') plant was open in its high
ts,
ĕ too the young branches waved, telling him to make himself at home
Ñĕḍ¹ dmong the shapely rocks,
ḍ6nṅd the mynah went 'Kaka¹', and ‘Mpu¹' said the dove, both talking to

c ?hen the worthy son of Partha went paddling at his ease;
Punta and Praśanta were with him, as well as Jurudyah.

ṭte was flled with passion to see the waves rippling, like the lines in a
h girl's hair,

j h d the fight of the cliff-swallows was as lovely as the ḍuivering of her
ṭ, eyebrows.

l

ā ing and doub*t, -

Ñśn to distraction as he kept thinking of the princess's beauty.
Ñlsliked being affected by disturbing feelings of love,

ṭ how wicked attachment would be diverted to his cousin even when

e was far away.

r--r-: z « @zll @-- -.

³) Ṭext, Canto 10

9 kepwan sirângimur-imur kĕtĕr ing raras twas
kong lalanân panalukat saha gīta rāmya
akweh ulah nira hanân pangikĕt sĕkar mrik

t len ciṇḍagânak-anakan tinulis ṭikâpnĕd

| b kong: AD ko, C kong changed to ko, Ĕ ngkan, H ngkā; ramya: B somya.

Ñ

Ṭranslation, Canto 10 3]

l
âso relaxed by playing the salukat together with some merry songs.

were the things he did, such as making a garland of fragrant

cc –--

CANT 11

b4

kusumawiasita: - w w l - w - l ww wlcwwlwwwlwawla-

1 kala nirâlangö mangĕn-angĕn ri hajĕng ira narendraputrikā
mogha ḍatĕng sang adyah i harĕp nira kadi paśarīra ning Ratih
ngkân paḍa kagyat epu kamatĕnggĕngĕn apa tan i rāt hiḍĕp nira
tan wruh ing enakângujara len ulaha kawĕgĕgĕn kamerangĕn

d kww~ḍṭḍṣ²r: É kawĕgĕgan.

2 ndân iki rakwa rajaduhita muwah akusikan epu ring gati
mogha salah smarâway-awayĕn lumihat iri Dhanañjayātmaja
marma nirâmahânglipu-lipur kĕtĕr i hati nirân salah sĕmu
bhrānta rimang-rimang saparan ing suku lumaku jugân tinūtakĕn

mwuah: C humah.

-uayĕn: Ĕ wayang.

-lipu-: È -lipur-.

ing: ñ i; lumaku: F lumakur-laku.

a m a o

3 ndân kahaḍang larut sahana ning kaka-kaka wijah adyus ing tasik

nghing kari kāsi-kāsih ira tan sah i sira mangaran Sudarpaṇā
lalana kârwa wungkuk arĕjâng angiring amawa pawwahan tatur
prâpta nirêkihĕn kadi dine kawawa ri kahanan sang anglĕngöng

b kasi-kasih ira: A kasih ira, É kakasih nira; tan: Ṭ ya tan.
d kawauu: F kawadha; aṇglâng²âng: Ĕ anglĕngö.

CANTD 11

h Ratih, the Goddess of Love.
ey were eḍually surprised, bewildered and speechless, as they could
f | not believe their eyes;

| dumbfounded and overcome with shyness.

ḍ îNow the princess of course had also been restless and confused as to
what course to follow.
Ñ She suddenly felt an amorous impulse but was lost for words at seeing
ĕḍ Dhanañjayatmaja.

Ñ And so she had done her best to calm her heart that trembled in such a
strange way,
And perplexed and wistful she simply followed wherever her feet took
kher.

Bñ Now it happened that all her ladies had gone away and were excitedly

ĕ bathingin the sea,

¹ !And the only one left was her favourite who was never parted from her,
by the name of Sudarpaṇa.

Ṭhey wandered together and anattractive hunchback attended them to

| carry the golden betel-tray,

l1lAnd her arrival was as if decreed by Fate, as it brought them to where

Ñ¹ the one roaming in search of beauty was.

-
-!
|

Ṭext Canto 11 Translation, Canto Ṭ1

k low weak and helpless she was, filled with embarrassment, feeling it
lwould be better to die,

ĕ thhis wish of hers was in vain - forthwith her legs began once more to
âlrembie.

Pks a result of her desire to lean on her lady-in-waiting their progress

! was only slow,

nd they were not very far away when she sank in exhaustion and sat
îḍdled on a ñat stone.

ndah tĕka mar gupe sira kasökan irang arasa matya ng enaka
nirwa harĕp nirêki tumuluy maluya kakĕtĕran tikang suku
antuk ing ambĕk amrih atĕkĕn kaka lari nira tan wawang lĕpas
tapwan adoh dahat pwa sira n anglĕlĕh akiḍupuh ing śilatala

a tña A tâka.
b nirua: F nir pwa; tumuluy: É tumulwîṅ; kakĕtâran: A akĕtĕran; tikang: CD ikang, H rî
d sira n: Ĕ sirang.

x

Ṭ - dered, she tried to understand the odd behaviour of her heart, but
bhranta sirângrase salah ile ni manah ira luput linakṣaṇan uld not be deñned,

de ni hiwag nirâsuway atōn lumihata d Dhanañjayatmaja Ñ h¹ se of the strange fact that she had long been wanting to look at
ndah katĕkan pwa mogha ta dinagdha ning irang anĕñuh twas angl fĕ ayatmaja.

ndâpa kunang kalīmgan iki ling nira n angangĕn-angĕn mĕngĕn-mö Bĕbḍnow ṭat it had happened suddenly she was burnt with shame,

iwhich painfully melted her heart -
Wāat could be the meaning of this be²?¹ she thought to herself,
| 'perplexed.

i|

c ta diṅagdha ning: D kadinagdha, Ĕ dinagdaning.
d m A om, mĕng²n-: F amĕngĕn.

ise Parthaputra: he imagined that the princess's arrival there was a

mangkana Parthaputra siluman hiḍĕp ira ri ḍatĕng suputrikâ piece of magic -

lwrr ulih ing samādhi marikânggĕh ira saphala yogya marmanĕn
ndân wiphalâpa tan wĕnang anantwa ngunirnguni n amangkwa haḍ
wastu marêki sânak amisan sira tuhun awirang turung waśa

b h: Ĕ ulah; marmanĕn: Ṭ karmanĕn.
c -ngunṅ: R -yuni.

ĕÑrwality she was his frst cousin, but even so they were shy and not yet
operly acuainted.

paṇā came to him, leaving the princess¹s side;

ĕḍidea was to form an opinion of them both, to see whether they
Ñṅred an abundance of passion.

wished to have a clear understanding of them later, if they should

8veal the perturbation of their hearts.

ch was her wish in coming to search for the signs that might be subtly

luded to, in their words.

prâpta Sudarpaṇā ri sira sah ri lari nira narendraputrikā

ambĕk ikânahā ri sira kārwa n angalihana râgasañcaya

hyunya ri waspadā nira mĕne n paḍa mamĕḍara rañca ning hati
nâpti niki n marângdudula ring smita sĕmu-sĕmunĕnya ring wuwu

a sah ri B sah.
e mane n paḍa: F menen adha.
d nâpti: D i apti; ring: AC ri; C jumps to ri hyun in Śd, as also does .


ṬRBBBBBBB-

8êâ

lingny

10

11

Ṭext, Canto 11

marma nirâri rakryan angĕnĕs tumuturakĕn i mâsku n anglĕngêng
ri hyun irâtĕrĕn mahas-ahas lĕpasa layĕp amukṣa-mukṣana

a leuĕs: Ĕlĕwas.
b langleng: Clĕlĕng.
c angenâ: Ĕ angĕnĕsa; anḍlĕngērṣ: ā anglĕêngö.

ś

ndân tĕka kerangan tiki sirâki mapa tuhan anehakĕn manah
duryaśa sānak ing kapana masku wĕnanga palarĕn pangēbana
sis pĕjaha pwa sang prabhu mapêki sirirakĕna ning samîraṇa
toh syapa tânglingê sira katon kasihana nira tan wring ungṣsirĕn

c sirimk²na: Ṭ siringakĕna.
a kasihana: D kasih harĕp ira; tan: |tar; ungsirêu: usirĕn.

nista nipun lĕpas tiśaya rakryan i sira sira kĕdwa tan saha
cihna kahundangêku tanayanta bapa rasiki Caṅcu-Ciṇḍaga
moliha puṣpa campaka wirāga .ĕsĕpakĕna kung nirê bibi
matat ika sirân anaka karwana punih ing ulah katunggalan

a tâps: Ĕ\ĕs; sira kâtum: Ĕ yan akĕdwa; tn saha: A tan hana.

b tanayanta: ÉH tabhayanta; sikṅ: D risiki.
d matat ika sirân karwaua purih ing ulah katunggalan: F matut i karwan epu ring ulah

katunggal-tunggalarṣ sirân anaka: E sira sanaka.

mangkana lingnya Pârthaputra sasmita sumahur awor ngrĕs ing h²

ḍn kaka ring kapana kari tan giranga nini yadi n kasanmata
yadyapi tuhwa śuddhya yayi hinrĕtan iki ri pingit nareĕwara
duryaśa tâku sānak amisan kunang awirang apan sinehakĕn
b kasaumata: AE kasanmatan.

c hinrâan: B inrĕtan, H n nrĕtan.
d tâku: | takwa; kunang: B tuna ng.

a lêwĕs tuhan lalĕh i māsku n amĕng-amĕng angingkis angḍ
langlêng anatakĕn manah apet kalĕngêngan amagantakĕn langö

Ṭranslation, Canto 11 8y

edly followîng your inclination in search of natural beauty,

ing to achieve poetic inspiration.

that is why your younger sister unobserved has followed you,
ear, while you roam,

er desire to be accompanied on her wanderings, to go on ahead
be lost in ecstacy.

w she is overcome with shame - how could you turn your back
erî

bvide protectiun²î
ĕñê! If the King should die, how could he be blown away by the wind²
Ī=ĕome, who would care about her²? It is evident that she would be

âhd as proof let that child of yours be invited to come, this noble Ciñcu-
iṇḍaga.
ḍét it get the flowers of the campaka and wirḍga so that its love for its
Ñî Inother may be felt more deeply,
âhd it follows śrom this that it will be a child to be shared, as is the

é s she spoke. Partha¹s son replied with a knowing smile mingled with
Ñeelings of pain:
€ l elder sister, how could I not be delighted, lady, if received with

eĕpen if it is true that my younger sister should be willing, she is held
ḍback by the King¹s restriction;
ÑUt I am indeed of small service as a ñrst cousin, and feel ashamed at

ocssssm

ga Text, Canto 11 Ṭranslation, Canto 11

12 mangkana ling nirâmĕlas-arĕp rumĕsĕp i hati ning Sudarpaṇā
ndah irika jurudyah angucap muwah ibu huningan tiking gati
ndin tan agĕnga harṣa ning asewaka wĕlasana ning sinewaka
apan awās manah nira tuhan marĕk amalar i śuddhya putrikâ

hd he spoke pitifully, his words touching Śudarpaṇâ²'s heart.
éeâjuruayaṅ spoke again, 'Lady, you should know that this is the way

a -mâus-arḍp Ĕ -mĕlasakĕn.

b ndah:ĕ ndaṭ, tikiny: Ṭ tikang. R Ñ â idea, madam, is clearly to come before the princess, in the hope
c agânga: A agîng, B aganga; wñlasana ningī D kawĕlasaning. ; âhnaing favour with her.
d tuhan: Ṭ tuwanm. ē | h

13 ndah ya tikā nimitta nira mār kapĕnĕtan i ḍatĕng nṛpâtmajā
wani nirângĕnĕs mapa nimitta nira lumaku tan parākṣaka
śanya niking paran manawa durjana mangalas-alas kanāgata

chawali aki duwah atang ira tumulya mantuka bourage in going out unattended - why does she go about without a
pucchawali syapêki duwahagya m

'protectorî

a mâr:ö mā. i 3
c paran:D awan. Ṭ ! koaming the forest!
- | 4doesn't matter who these are - they might be low workmen! śo let her

d duwahagyn B duthahagya.
go straight home¹'
14 nata sahur jurudyah amuhun lumarisa gati ning Sudarpaṇā

campaka len wirĕga winawâpuḍak anak-anakan pĕnuh tikā
prapta nikî narendraduhita marêk añulu-ñuluh priyambada

us spoke Jurudyah, and Sudarpaṇā took leave to go on her way,
âking the campaka and wiraga flowers with the puḍak doll covered in

ṭdrawings.
solih-ulihnya kasrah i kisapwan ira wiphala tan sinambrama Ābming - the princess, she approached and addressed her with words
b winwud- BF winawarg. | |jof endearment,
ÑéĕWhṅd the presents she had received she put on her lap - but to no avail, as
ṭ|they were not accepted.
15 lingnya tuhan paran karaṇa ning humĕnĕng i tĕka Cañcu-Ciṇḍaga Ñéĕĕhe said, 'Madam, what is reason for keeping silent on the arrival of
wet ni lulut nirâbibi nimitta nira kasah i pangkwan ing yayah ĕîCaṅcu-Cindaga²

tan huninga pwa masku mapa len karika sira sakê kitêng smara
sungsungĕn ing smitârĕkana kenaka nira pĕkulĕnta ĕmbanĕn

Ñścause of his attachment to his mother, that is why he has left the lap of
îhis father.

a humanrng:Ĕ amanang. ] t you pay him no heed - how could he be any different from you in
b nirabi: Cāñ nirang bibṭ, D rirê bibi.
c sakr ÉH sakêng.

d kenaka nira: Ṭ tanaka nira.

3 reet him with a smile! It would be best to kiss him; you should


90

16

17

18

Ṭext, Canto 11

nā wacananya mangkin akĕtêr hṛdaya sang anahĕn smarānala
lagi salah sahur mucap i ngel nira lumaku ri doh nikang paran
mĕngg²p apelawâpi rĕngu sinrahan anak-anakan lawan sĕkar
ndan lêwu göng i garjita nirê hati bangun inanugrahan hurip
a wacananya: AĕCF wacananta; akâtrr: C kinakĕtĕr.

a gong ii Ŋ gĕng ni.

-

ring wĕkasan tĕkâng midĕr amet ri sira mamawa ḍdampa kañcana

ngkân alaris mulih ḍatĕng i rena nira tuhun alĕk manah nira
tan huningê watĕk binihaji n panayub anapuk arja sasmita

tan panginang sirân lali sumungkĕm ing iña sahajângdalih pucang

a amet: ŪBH apet; mamaua: pamawa.
c huningê Ṭ huningêng; binikṇji Cbibi haji n panayubi ñ pinayub.
d sirâm: Ṭsira.

mangkana tâbhimanyu kabharan muwah akĕtĕr i nâla ning hati
amrih asara-sāra marikâ sira n umulih i jöng nareśwara
prapta nirêki yatna marĕk angharĕpakĕna larih mapet siwi

Ṭranslation, Canto 11 91

Ṭhese were her words, and the heart of the one enduring the res of love
| trembled even more;

konce again sha gave an evasive answer, mentioning her fatigue with
fwalking because of the distance ot the journey.

ĕhe feigned indifference aṅd pretended to be annoyed at being handed

| the doll and the flowers,

Bĕut the joy in her heart was very great, as if she had been granted the

| gift otite.

. inally the people who had been going about in search of her arrived
| bringing a golden palanḍuin,
ând then she set off to go back to her mother, despite feelings of
i reluctance.
ĕĕhe paid no heed to the King¹'s wives as they drank palm-wine and
played tapuk with pretty smiles.
ĕWithout chewing betel she lay lost in thought on her duenna¹s lap,
| naturally taking her for the betel nuts.

Likewise Abhimanyu was oppressed and again trembled deep in his
¹ḍ heart;

He did his best to gather up his strength to return to the feet of the King.
en he arrived he attentively came into the presence in order to

Ṅ| present the refreshments, seeking to be of service,

kong agamĕl mṛdangga hana n angras angawat angidung pakon hṣj lṭhie at the same time he played the drum, or else sang a deeply

c angharâpakîna: F angarĕpakĕna
d kong: Ṭ ken

. ṣṢ]

lmoving introduction to the songs the King ordered.
|
l


CANTO 12

Jagaaahita: - - - l ww - l wcwlww-lwwwlwwwl-wa-lwx

1 apnĕd solah irâbhimanyu n akire rĕsĕpa ni sukha sang naradhipa
asrang mwang para râjaputra kunang ing kapana wĕnang angungṣ
sira .
prapta ng rātri lĕpas hyang arka kapangulwan angayati sumīlĕmênṭ
tasik
lea ning teja sinimpĕnan kinĕkĕsan ri hati ning anahĕn smarâtura

c angayatiṅ C angatita.
d tn:É leran.

2 angde harṣa katon i golaka nirâmirah i wahu nirân tĕkêng bañu
tan pendah kadi padmaraga makahĕmbana pamapag ing ryak omöj
lampus tan kamatolihĕn tĕḍun irêng jaladhi sinaput ing lamad-lan
angras praṇa turah ni söng ira salaṭi ning asĕmu guyu n wineh sĕpṅ

walu: C wawu (corr. to watu, or wahuî).
ing: Ci (ng added).

kamatalihĕu: D pakatolihĕn.

angras: C angrĕs curr. to angras); tural ui sāng: P turanisĕnĕng; wing: C ṭing; ni ñḍ

a. m u

3 rap lumra rumahab tikang timira himpĕr amĕtu-mĕtu rĕssa ning jaḍ

tstis tang manuk ing wwahan mari humung bhramara surud i sâri
sĕkar

lwir glanânangisa ng cucur taḍahasih bangun angisĕk-isĕk nirāśray

angde trasa pamangsul ing kidang areh sakukulan ing ananghya-
nanghyakĕn

a rdp:Cv.dī. lees rōp¹; rĕssa: ABDEH rĕsa.

e glanânangis: C glânângis: -sa ng: D sang: niraśraya: B nirâśaya.
d trasa: F urasṅ ing: F i; sakukulan: B kakulan; ananghya-nanghyakēn: F ananggya-

nanggyakĕn.

CANTO 12

s conduct was exemplary as he considered how to make the
sure as deep as possible;
Ŋîî the princes, but how could he succeed in taking refuge

Ā

el, and the holy Sun sank in the west, preparing to dive into

htpf its red sphere as it just reached the water was delightful,
Int from a lotus-hued ruby that might have as its setting the
âṭ waves that came to meet it.

ithout further ado, not stopping to look back, and descended into

îe remnants of its brightness mowed one¹s heart, like the red lips of
ne who smiles when given a betel guid.

harking of the deer aroused fear, sounding in order like the
â-drum of someone trying to rouse sleepers in time of danger.


-

94

Ṭext, Canto 12

meh śanya ng bhuwanânaha bhaya kunang sahana sumĕmu lampyj
amrĕma
sih sang hyang śaśacihna marma ni girangnya wĕkasan i wijil nirâlaḍ
tandwânghtt i dalem gihâng pĕtĕng arĕs rinarah anusup ing wanârṭ
ndin wanyâmapagân katinghalana mingkus angĕnĕs angusir tawĕnḍ
tawĕng

sumĕmu: A om.; lnupus: A lampur; anrâma: CāF amḍta.
twijit: C ing wiju, Ŋ awljil

gihâng: Ĕ giha; arês: Ĕ irĕs.
-mapagâu: Ŋ -papagan; mingkus: A mangkus, Ĕ mingkĕs; tauêng-truâng: D tawing-
tawing.

a n – w

śobha sangśaya miṇḍuhur lari bhaṭara śaśadhara sĕḍĕng prabhāswḍ
tan pendah ghata ratna parṇa pĕnuh amṛta makara-karân katon i hḍ
lra ning teja ya bañwa singyakĕna ring bhuwana ya talagā mapangḍ

d

lunghā ning timirêlya kombak umarêng sukĕt anĕsĕli patra ning ta

a sangśnya Ṭ sangka ya; minḍuhur: mingḍuhur.
c ya: A om, singyakâna: Ĕ| sinyukĕna; bhuwana: R bhawana; talagâ: A talāga.
d lungha: Ṭ lungga.

ngkân sampun magawe rĕrĕb nagara puṣpa haji salĕngĕng ing
Smaralaya

mangkin kabhinawâlangö saracananya sinuluhan. teja ning wulan ṭ

sakweh sang Yaduwangśa taṇḍa sakaparcaya pinakapikandĕl akraṇ

kumram sarwa sĕkar minging sahana ning kuwu sinahaja cihna ninḍ

mangö

b saracananya: AB saracanadya.

ngkā sweccâmĕng-ramĕng sirâlĕbu-lĕbuh kajĕnĕkan i hĕnī nikang pḍ ḍ
lĕnglĕng tang paricārikâkĕla-kĕlan harama snrisipan sahing-sahing
dudw abhāṣa hanângucap carita len kidung ulih-ulihan winarṇana |
akweh raga ni panghiḍĕpnya ri manis ni wuwus iki jĕngĕr silih pĕ

a -amḍng: F om.; -lîbuh: ÉH lĕbu; kérī: D hĕning.
c ulih-ulihan: Ĕ ulihan.

Translation, Canto 12 95

l| The world was almost deserted, suspecting danger, or else everything
-l appeared to have gone off to bed.

JṬÑlṬhe pity felt by the holy Moon was a reason for the world to be glad
ṬÑ–| when ânally it emerged in its beauty.

h|Īmmediately ihe fearful darkness hid deep in a cave, and when pursued
headed into the woods.

ḍ | How could it dare to meet lest it be seenī - Cowering unobserved it
sought refuge under cover.

l

h| In high spirits the Lord Moon rose higher and higher, shining his

ṭ No different from a brimming jeweled pot filled with nectar, shedding

Ṭi beams visible on the outside.

§ (Ṭhe spreading light might be the water to be melted and poured out on
É¹ |the world, which might be a pool with lotuses,

ḍ| And the departing darkness might be the current, washing up into the

grass and nestling among the leaves of the trees.

Then when they had made as resting-place a ‘city of owers¹ for the
Ñl| King as lovely as Smara¹s abode,

î| ts layout was all the more amaxingly beautiful when lit by the light of
| themoon.
All the Yadu race and the most trusted guardsmen formed the defensive
î| wall in proper order,

| All kinds of fragrant owers gleamed and the whole camp was supplied
with the signs of the muse.
Then at his ease he went out for a walk and strolled up and down
oblivious along the sands of the shore,

|Where the servants were happily entranced in boiling harama crabs,
ĕl. oysters and red crabs.
ĕ¹Others sang bhḍṣa, some recited tales and songs and described their
experiences,

d so much was the passion of how they felt at the sweetness of these
words that in rapture they hugged each other.


Ṭext, Canto î2 Translation, Canto 12 97
€Xî, r2î0

len aganty acayârĕjângawatakĕn saragi ri pagamĕl warātmaja
peng-gang-pong-gang aram katönya hana taṇḍak amilihi sakāpti nj

manah
onĕk tang cala hewa tan kahuningā ng pamalaku kaharĕp-harĕp y
nā ragîri sirâlaris pamahuginya sĕrĕh arum aleśya dumpilan

Ĕ beat of the noble youth:
Ñĕṭ The soft peng-gang-pong-gang was what they loved, while some danced
ḍ choosing whatever way they fancied.
ĕḍ Those who fell short were downhearted, disappointed that their reuest
ḍ for the songs they wanted went unheeded,
ḍ And thus infatuated with him they went ahead with their gifts of tasty
[î1 betel on the pretext of having participated in the dance.

a-d E om.

a -drḍa-: D -jra-; peng-gang: pong-gang, F pangga. ]

c tang: DF ta; kahuninga ng: Ŋ kahuningan, F kahuninga; pamalaku: D malaku; kiduṇ
kidung nika.

d aram aleśyn: B aramai leâya.


CANTO 13

wangsastha: - - - l - - w l w - w l a w=

1 tangeh yadin warṇan ulah nareśwara
lanânĕkakĕn lĕngĕng ing manah mangö
hana pwa dewī lagi tan katinghalan
tuwîki kājar sira n agring atyaya

c katinghalan: F kawastana; kḍjr: B karja.

2 ya tâmangun rañca ri buddhi sang prabhu
matang nirân yatna madân n umantuka
rathâśwa ḍampârja huwus dinandanan
kalalwan ing ratri jugân hinerakūn

d kaialwan: A kalāwan, C kalakwan.

3 byatīta lunghā lari ning niśâkara
mangulwan angrĕgrĕg ing astap.rwata
pilih tumolih ri sang ogha marchita
rikân katirwan mulat ing mukhâwĕnĕs

a lungha: Ĕ lunghang.

4 hyang arka meh mĕtwa mapangṅarĕp sĕnö
kadi pwa manggyakĕn akon umantuka
narendra mangkat saha wāhanâkrama
huwus lĕpas tan huningan sirêng hĕna

ikang pasir kari bangun kamânuṣan
watunya rĕngkângarang angligā limut
lumuh ririsnya ng kayu cāmarângure
hĕnīnya kangrĕs-ngrĕs ĕping lanânangis

b angligñ-: A angligê.
c -nya ng: Ĕ nyeng.

CANTO 13

If would take too long to describe what the King did,
|Constantly making himself enraptured as he mused.
[The princess, however, was still not to be seen,

And now he was informed that she was exceedingly ill.

hṬhis caused the King to be troubled,

h And that is why he was solicitous for her and made ready to return.
ḍīhe āne carriages, horses and palanuins were prepared

hAnd the passing of night was all he awaited.

! îa the west and jerked to a halt on the sunset mountain.
ḍ Perhaps it was looking back at the languishing lady,
nd was then affected by looking at the palour of her face.

holy Sun was about to rise and was sending its light on ahead,
ḍâṭAs if urging haste and telling them to leave for home.
ĕ[The King departed with the vehicles in due order
And was well on his way - we need not pay him attention on the road.

Ñīhe shore left behind seemed overwhelmed by emotion:
ÑĪhe rocks cracked with longing and bared their mosses,

f îhe rain had tears in its eyes, the casuarina let dawn its hair,
-ñ e sands felt sharp pain, and the *ping went nn wecping.

100

10

Ṭext, Canto 13

ikang rĕrĕb kĕmbang alum paḍâlume
natarnya tistis ri dalĕm nikâsĕpi

turah-turah ning lati kāri len sĕpah
sukĕtnya laywan mangunĕng sakêng gĕlung

c turah-turah: Ĕ turuh-turuh.
d angun²ng: C angranĕng; sakêag: AB sakĕ.

pilih pirang ratri narendra ring hawan
ḍatĕng kamantyan ri samIpa ning pura
tuhun mahâa maṇḍĕg araryan ing yaśa

umantyakĕn rĕmma ni teja ning rawi

d râmma: ABDH rĕma.

sirang watĕk Wṛṣṇi sakāri pūrwaka
ḍatĕng makering Baladewa sambhrama
anungsung ing bhoga supathya ṣaḍrasa
mṛdangga ghorâtri hatur girahyasĕn

e anungsung: E manungsung; supathya: H sapathya.
d -âtrṅ F om.

siram pwa sang hyang rawi meh tĕkâng kulĕm
rikan lumampah sira munggah ing ratha
ḍatĕng nirêng rajya n alampa-lampahan
dinandanan sāhalĕpa n tininghalan

a sirâm: Csira.

b munggak: f mungguh.
c nirêng: H sirĕng.

narendraputrī sira parwa ning laku
lĕngêng hanêng ḍampa tatur pajöng pagut
kilî harĕp len paricârikângiring

hatur sakêng swarga lĕkas nirâlangö

c kitr Ĕ kiling; sakêng: B sakê.

Ṭranslation, Canto 13

Ñemnants of lip-paint were left, as well as betel guids,

Jnd in the grass were faded mangunâng fowers from ladies¹ hair.

And in due time arrived on the outskirts of the capital.
Bven so he purposely halted to rest in a pawilion,
Waiting till the heat of the sun should diminish.

e Wṛṣṇis who had been left behind before
Ñame escorting Baladewa to greet him.
ṬṬhey received him with delicious foods of the six flavours,
ând feartully loud drumming, as if carried away with delight.

101

F

102 Text, Canto 13 Translation, Canto 13 103

Ñhe King¹s wives were in fine carriages
éh1d the troupe of princes rode horses,
Ṣ ut the two kings were mounted on great elephants,

|
! Ṅheir manner that of Hara in company with Hari.

11 kunang para strī haji ring rathâhalĕp
watĕk suputra prasamâhawan kuda
narendra kalih pwa gajendrawāhana
Harâdulur mwang Hari kapwa reh nira

b suputra: B susuputra.
d Harâdulur: F taradulu.

ḍṬhe arrangement of the procession was in contingents,
arated by orchestras, perfectly sweet-sounding.
e armed Yadu warriors vied to bn first in attending them,
âs if returning from wiping out an enemy.

12 apaṇṭa-paṇṭan ta matiṅgkah ing laku
paḍâhĕlĕt gĕṇḍing anindya suswara
Yaduprawīrâsrang asañjatângiring
bangun mulih sampun anirṇakĕn musuh

a -pagtan: Ĕ paṇṭa; ta matingîah: D ta patingkah, É sapatingkah.

–>--

[ñ
ā
ā
2
c
w
î
[3
ṭ
b3
â
[
³d
°w
lal
¹
3d
ê.
ā
ō
–
f
c.
Ṅō]
ĕ
āl

13 ikang paniñjon wĕki ratnakanyakâ
duda ng malayw āwĕdi sepa rakwa ya
! alon tĕmahnyân katibâtri tang surak
ri sak ni siñjangnya paran kunang katon

ile others ran in fear of being too late.
fhey ended up being slow when thuy fell, shouting loudly,

a pamiñjon: D paninjwana.
c tîmnhayân: D tĕmahnya.
d -nya: D -nyan; kunang: ñ kunĕng. h
Ñhose outside were tightly packed and jostled together:

l4 ikang ri heng kapwa sēsĕk siih pēdēk ose who could see were happy, but those who only had hopes were

sukhâng anon sing kajagan jugâputĕk
matanya manggā ñ cukilĕn ta pwa ya
palar wĕnang jungjungĕn ing galah-galah

15 byatna lungha haliwat nirêng lĕbuh

tĕkêng dalĕm rajya tuwin tĕkâng kulĕm
samângiring kapwa luwar madum paran
mulih marêng swalaya ramya sasmita

a haliwat: A liwat.
b takâug: CDF tĕkĕ.

ś dejected.

ey would willingly have had their eyes put out,
that they could raise them high on long poles.

-

ĕḍḍe pass over how they moved and passed by the public suare;
Īhey arrived within the palace and night arrived too.

e escort broke up and went their ways,

etuming to their own homes with cheerîul smiles.


-- zz' «

104 Ṭext, Canto 13

16 sirâng tĕkê jro pura rañca kānglihan
rapuh sinungsung purih ing hañar datĕng
sawet ni ngelnyân kadi tan pajiwita
rikân paḍâmrĕm bilalâlupêng hulĕs

a sirâng tñê: É sira ttkêng; kângliwan: Ŋ kalihan.
c nṅ DF ning; bilalâlupêng: D kalĕĕpêng, bilalanglaleng.

wTa––mm

–=

Ṭranslation, Canto 13 105

ose who had arrived within the palace were troubled and exhausted,
nd wearily were greeted in the ways natural for ones who have just

Ñ come.

Pĕecause of their tiredness they seemed to be lifeless,

And then went to sleep, so deep that they forgot abaut sheets.


CANTO 14

-

Jagatpramudita: - w w | - w w l wwwlcwlww-

1 kala mapêki śanya ri kĕjĕp nikang sanagara
mangkin amânuṣânupama lênglĕng ing pura lĕyĕp
mrak juga lot atanghi saha kokilângalik-alik Ñ
lwrr anguhuh ri tan kaḍata ning śaśangka mijila

a kḍêp: Ṭ kadhap.

b langlîng: Ĕ lĕlĕng.

c -alik-l: A -alihralik.

d anguhuh: AF anguwuhi kḍat ningī Ĕ kadatang ing.

2 tandwa mĕtu ng wulan lĕngĕng asong ghanâtaratayan
lwīr angungang sakêng udayaparwatângaling-aling
nāgata yan katanghyana tĕkap ning adyah araras
sugyan apanghadā mukha n asampayângarahana

a asong: Ĕ asĕng.

b angungang: B mangungang; ling: E -alingan. |

c katanghyaum: Ṭ tatanghyana.

3a nora marânghawĕr laku lĕpas ring ambaratula
bhaswara yan widhayaka ri gandha ning sĕkar arūm
nā pwa n umah samrraṇa mirir marê wwang alangö
donya n ananghya lĕnglĕng atagĕn manuṇḍanga karas

a -nghau²r: Ĕ -ngawĕör.
c nd pua ng: A nâ pwan nē; mirir: C milir.
d manguydḍanga: ABCR manuṇḍanga.

4 ngka ta Sudarpaṇân wijil angingkis ing natar anis
kepwan i tan kapanggih i wingit narendraduhitā
sing tĕka sambhramânulunga tang dinohakĕn ira
nora wĕnang waśânulunga yan tikĕl halis ira

d waśṭ- C gawa, corr. to waśa, Ṭ waga.

CANTO 14

eōome time after this when it was silent and the whole city was asleep,
ṭ e dim beauties of the palace were all the more otherworldly and
incomparable.

only the peacocks were still awake, together with the cuckoos calling
ḍ high and dear,

if calling the moon not to be slow in coming up.

™ithout fail the moon emerged, bearing a lovely parasol of trailing
klouds,

ĕu if looking down from the eastern mountain and hiding behind it.
ṭ³ was anxious lest it be suddenly aroused by a charming lady,

Who might happen to be depending on her face and call out to it in
Ñ contempt.

Ṭîowever, nothing could impede its course across the firmament,
ĕhining so brightly that it was empowered to bring out the perfśume of
R śweet Āowers.

Ppikewise it was the home of the wind blowing soîty in the direction of

p śomeone enraptured by beauty,

th the aim of arousing his enchantment and being forced to call up
he 'writing tablet.

ÑṄen Sudarpaṇâa went out secretly into the courtyard all alone,

é plexed at not finding the cause of the princess¹s sullen mood.

3 lyone who came eager to assist her she sent away,

ĕhd they were unable to get close enough to help her when she
bâurrowed her brow.


Ṭext, Canto 14

nâ karaṇanya n anglipu-lipur putĕknya ri hati
kong lali lalanângidung-idung pĕgat-pĕgat arūm
len pangajapnya wikwa pĕjahêng wanādri layata
wet ni rusuhnya tan rahat asewakânaḍah asih

a -lipu-: Ĕ -lipur-; putâknya: F tĕkanya.

b kong: BCko.

d rahat: C rahan, corr. to rahat.

ndan twas irâng narendraduhitângrĕngö kadi linad
towi turung mrĕm osah angĕsah mĕhah makusikan
marma nirân wijil tumuturêriyânglih akĕtĕr
lĕnglĕng umIr hulĕs nira gĕlung lukar tan iniwö

-ngrângîö: B rĕngĕ.

wiji: Ṭ mijil.
umtr: D upir.

a U m

lwIr amilang tapak lari nirân sasinwam alume

tan saralânginang lali tuminghal ing tawang adoh
prapta nirâkisapwan añuluh manguntali sĕḍah
liśya n atis matang nira n atön asanghulunana

a amilang: E namilang; sasinwam: Ĕ sainwam, saralâ-: Ĕ saratâ-.
d matang nira: B mata nlra.

tandwa Sudarpaṇâsĕgĕh amakpakângarih-arih
ḍuh ibu bhagya masku maṇik i nghulun kita tuhan
toh aparan tikung lara paran kunang panulunga
jīwita ni nghulun dyah ari sādhananta warasa

a amakpak: B amaksa; -ngharih: B -ngariṅ.
c lam parau: Ṭ larapana.

towi: A tuwî; mrĕm: E mram; angĕsah: F angasah; makusikan: D akusikan.

Ṭranslation, Canto 14 109

RṬhis is why Sudarpaṇā tried to saothe her feelings of dejection,

While distracting herself by singing snatches of sweet songs,

'Or else of her longing to be a hermit and die in the mountain forests far
away,

f Because she was tired of not having success in offering her services or

î receiving ¹avour.

Now when the princess heard this she felt deeply pained,

f And moreover was not yet asleep, restlessly sighing and tossing to and
f So it was that she went out in arder to join her, weak and trembling,

I As if in a trance she trailed her bed-sheet, and her hair was loose and
unkempt.

lāhe moved as if counting her footsteps, like a languid tendril,

Ñ And feeling weak she chewed betel, absently gaaing into the far sky.

ḍ '!Coming there, she sat on her lap, swoke kindly and passed her a betel-
Ñguid,

ḍ| And on the pretext of being chilled she desircd to put her head on her

â1 lap.

ḍ| Śtraight away Sudarpaṇa welcomed her with soothing words and tried
R| to console her:

Oh my dear, how lucky it ist You are my treasure, my lady.

ĕ|Come, what kind of sadness of yours is this³ Or what can be done to
cure it²

My life, my dear little sister, will be the means of making you well¹


110

9

10

11

12

13

Ṭaxt, Canto 14

ah kaka tan wring enaka jugâku nora ng arasâ
muala niking larâlangu ri gandha ning sĕkar aram
len kĕtĕr ing patĕr saha gĕrĕh ning ampuhan arĕs
yêki dume ng manah rĕngĕ-rĕngön datan palipuran

b wata: Ĕ mala; nikiny: D niki.
d dume ug: ŪāFñt dumch; -râugön datan: AB -rĕngöna tan, D -rêngĕn ndatar.

doh ibu wīṣṭi tan lara pasir hiḍĕp ny usun iku

gringta tuhan lara wwanganakĕn ngaranya biṣama
nghing tiki jampya yan buratĕn ing kadang pwa ng inaka
nyama warasta masku linalâāna wehana sĕpah

a hiḍâp: H iḍĕp: usun: A usus, B asun, D asus, Ĕ sum, H usum.
b wwwny-: Ŋ pwang.

c jampym AB jamya; buratîn ing: A burate ning (typoî), BC burat ning, F buratanin. Ñ

ndan hiḍĕp i nghulun sĕpah irâbhimanyu saphala
towy amisan rahadyan angĕnoh sira n jalu-jalu
tan parasa tiki n kawĕḍarê pingit ning atuha
marma nirêki sakṣmanĕn angingkisê wĕngi jĕmah

d angingkisê. E angingkisa.

mangkana lingnya sang dyah iki tan sahur mapi turū
kong ginupinya ring nakha tinanghi tan wawarĕngöh
ring wĕkasan sirângadĕg angun-ngun asyang iri ya
munggaha ring grhâmrĕma rikân tinuntun inamĕr

b ring nakha: B ri nangka; wararângök: ABR wawa rĕngĕ.
d rikân: A rikā.

prāpta nirêng tilam pwa tinurūa-turū kinĕmulan
wahu kĕjĕp sirâmrĕm ulih ing lanângupuk-upuk
kepi ta rakwa Phalguṇasutâculuh mangarĕki
mogha tinanghi de ni wijah ing manuk mawurahan

U Ṭranslation, Canto 14 11

-

1 elder sister, I do not know what would be best, nothing is any good.
ÑWîe root of my malady is that I am sickened by the scent of sweet

k lâowers,

ṭs well as the rumble of the thunder and roar of the dreadful breakers,
ḍ k ese make me keep hearing things in my mind, without any soothing

Ṭĕḍ'Ūh, my dear, this is serious! It is not ‘beach-sickness¹ that you have, in
f my opinion.

Évour illness is what is called cousin-disease¹ - an exceptional case.

b e only medicine for it is to take a cosmetic oil from a cousin - that

ḍ would make it better.

î 'ou would without doubt be cured, my dear, by being consoled and

* .given a betel-uid.

- low in my opinion the betel-ḍuid of Abhimanyu would be effective -
ĕMoreover he is your first cousin, so he is suitable to be your man.

Ṭaut this would not work if it were revealed while you are in seclusion by
l order of your parents,

RAnd so this has to be done secretly, under cover of night, later on.'

is is what Sudarpaṇṅa said, but the young lady did not reply, feigning
sleep,
ile she nudged her with her nails and tuied to wake her, but she took
Ṅṭ no notice.

ĕinally she stood up in deep thought and called her

go up into the house and sleep, and then led her tenderly up.

en they reached her bed Sudarpaṇa lulled her to sleep and covered
Ñ her with ablanket.
Râs soon as she had closed her eyes she went to sleep as a result of her
ĕĕĕut of course she dreamed it was Phalguṇasuta fondly kissing her,

h îll suddenly she was awakened by the birds making an excited clamour
ḍ together.

ṭ

5

CANT 15

-
Girsaiw w w l wwwl--lcacwlwvwwls

1 lalu rahina kamantyan söng sang hyang rawi sumĕnö
lwir amanasana kingking ning śokâmuni turida
sang ahayu jĕnĕk amrĕm lĕnglĕng tan wawang awungū
twas ira rumaras osah tan śobhâ kĕtĕ-kĕtĕgĕn

b amanasana: Ṭ apanasana.

c jwacFiwnĕk

2 irikan amungu marmâmakpak sang kaka mangamĕr
ibu mijila tuhankw aḍamw āhyasa maluluda
wida kusuma pupur mrik dīkṣā len lati sumaji
iṅa puyang uwa ceti yatnâsewa paḍa marĕk

b ibu mjjita R i umijlla; maluluda: D maluludana.
c dnṣa: É adiksa.

a taham ibu kadi mangkin tibra reh i lara tuhau:
pangawihikana ni ngwang hīs ning luh adarawayan
hana wĕnanga panamban ndan rakryan juga humĕnĕng
yadi pĕjaha tuhankw ī roga ndah wiphala dahat

a reh i lara: EH reha nira.
d yadi: yayî; ¹ Ĕing.

4 kaka mapa karikânung ltngangkwêrikang arasā
ngwang awĕdi tuwin erang sugyan têki tiśayana
hana mara sih ira ndan ring swapnânĕmĕni lulut
nghing ika pinalar i ngwang ndân ambĕk kawĕkas ika
a karikânung: F kari kunĕng; -rikang arasa: Ĕ ri kita.

b tdk tiśayana: Ĕ teky atisayana.

Ā CANTO 15

bay came and before long the glow of the holy Sun was bright,
h As if heating the heartache of one grieving, concealing her love.

ĕ Ṭhe lovely lady was still deep in sleep and did not get up immediately;
Ñ Hler heart was deeply moved, she was restless, dejected and her pulse

beat fast.

Then it was that her lady roused her with gentle words of affection:

*My dear, come out, my lady, and wash, dress and rub on your
¹ ointment;

ĪThe flower make-up, the fragrant powder, oil and lip-stick are ready,

And the duennas ṭiña), puyang, uwa (aunts) and ceṭi (hand-maidens) are
in attendance and ready to serve.

ÑḍNo, my lady, itis not as if the course of your malady isbecomingworse -
ÑîMy means of knowing it would be a Aow of streaming tears.

here is something that can be a cure, but you just keep silent.
ṄWf you were to die of this illness, what a waste that would be.'

ster, what should I think of as the best thing to doî
m afraid and also shy, lest I should be ignored.
wever, there was his love for me in my dreams, showing his

ḍ attachment for me was true -
ĕrhat is the only thing I wish for - that it should be his ultimate
ś

intention.'


CANTO 16

mrargsa - - - l ww- lwawlwvwclwawlwwwls

1

ling dewī ri Sudarpaṇa sukha manah rasiki n inubhayan
ndâdan ṛeha nikî ḍdawuh pitu mĕne ling ika lumarisa

sang dyah yatna mijil sirâṭḍamu mahâniga-nigakĕn ulah

rĕs ning sambhawanĕn yan oruka yayâ ta sira rĕngĕ-rĕngön
a rṅ Ūki Ṭsi.

b ndadan: B ndan, F nda nda; nikî A nikâ.

c mipjl sid-: D sira miji; mahâ-: C waha.

d sambhauanḍn: Ṭ samjawanen; yan: È anyan; rârg²rîngön: ñ rĕnga-rĕngan.

ndah sangsipta huwus taḍah prathama sang kaka n angapi sĕrĕh
lawan tang kakawin wilâparasa sambat ing anangis akung
lingsir pwa ng rawi śīghra lampah iki kārwa kawula mangĕnĕs
ndah prapta ry alayâbhimanyu ri dalĕm grha kapamĕgĕtan

a udah: D ndan; prathama: Ṭ prasama.

c iki: F ani; knwula: Ĕ kahula.

d ry: Byy: alaw ñ asang; grha: D graha.

ndan rakwêki Dhanañjayatmaja hanêng taman angimur unĕng
tistis nora wĕnang marĕk ri sira nagata ri purik ira

tan ryamban hana yan mahângikĕt ujar tangis ira n angarang
wwitan têki turung tulus winaca lāgi winalu-waluyan

a wuâng: A unang;
e ujar: E mujar.

CANTD 16

îrhis is what the princess said to Sudarpaṇa, and she was pleased that

-¹ she assented,

l/And now made ready to arrange it - this meant that at the seventh hour

it would go ahead.
| Ṭhe princess cautiously came out and washed, trying to cheer herself up,

Ñ 'The fear she might be considered dismal was as if echoing in her ears.

în short, having eaten the first thing her maid-servant did was prepare

betel,

ḍ As well as the verse in kakawin form containing the lament of one

weeping with longing.

ÉlWhen the sun was slanting in the west she uickly set off with a servant,
R! going unseen,

ĕlAnd then arrived at the dwelling of Abhimanyu within the residence of
Ri the Pamĕgĕt.

Now of course the son of Dhanañjaya was in the garden trying to soothe
ā¹ his longing,
âilt was deserted as no one would dare to come before him, feartul of his

bad mood.

flln bewilderment he would endeavour to compose the words of his

lament, lost in thought.

Ṭhe opening lines of this were not yet finished when he went back and

read it over and over.


Soktamargana: - - w l w - wl - wwl wcwlwwwlwwalwaw

1

©17 CANTO 17

ḍ
h

w w Ñ

Rdy lady, are you not being far too aloof toward me in my attachment to
youî
Ṅou tum aside when I suek you out to ask for help - being ñrst cousins
is a shameful thing if we are not allowed to love.
– j his is why in death I do not desire to be related to you - the charm of
ṬÑ family is fruitless.
ṭ would be happier to keep a mynah bird as a pet - I could care for it in
ḍ the hope of having the pleasure of being called a kaka.

ibu tuhan i nghulun yayi lĕwĕs ta kari tiśaya rakryan ingwang alulut
mingay inusir paraśrayana duryaśa ng amisan aringku tan wĕnang ḍṭ
matangipun ing paratra tak atön jamura wiphala raśmi ning
pakadangan

sukha ng angiwö manuk syung amĕrĕn palarĕn asĕḍĕpa n panĕnggañ
kaka ¹

kari tiśaya: katiśaya.

mingay: F pingay; duryaśa: Ĕ om.; amisan aringku: D amisadangku.
ing: Ū eng; jamura: A jamur.

angṅwĕ: B angĕwĕ; palarân: D om.

ḍl
ṅ
é

a Mm w w

y o, Iwas wrong to imagine that I could succeed by daily worship ot
ĕîManasija,

With as fruit your approval that Īshould be able to steal a glance filled
– with the signs of passion;

ĕĕlṭostered the hope that you would come out to roam and would wander

- – the shore,

taha winalingku moliha kakanta sari-sari mangarcanêng Manasija
makaphala sanmatanta wĕnangângahalana liring esya cihna ning akḍ
hana pinalar hiḍĕpku ri wijita mahas-ahas acangkramân pamasisi

maluy i dalĕm puri pwa kita sis kadi maṇik inuray muwah kinĕkĕsa

c wjjlta: A wijila, Ĕ wii pamasisiī A pamasasi, Bt pamanasl.
é rawkAmaṅ. ĕlit you went back inside the palace, alas - like a jewel once loosened

ĕlṭrom its string and then stored safely away once more.

hana hiḍĕp i nghulun muwah i māsku kita kĕñar i tanggal ing śaśad

amĕnuhi harṣa ning rimang arusi panas i hati ning kĕnêng Smaraśara

wahu kahiḍĕp raras twas ing aninghali bungah i mukhanta kumram
alangö

lalu ri yulihta ring nagara kari pĕtĕng apĕga citta ning salahasa

ĕhere is another image I have of you: that you are the light of the waxing
Rlmoon,

hat fills the world with the joy of thoughts of love and cools the heat of
Ñh heart smitten by the arrows of Smara;

lad just pictured the emotions of someone looking at the brightness of
Rlour face glowing with beauty,

ĕht when you returned home to the city only darkness was left and

Ā espairing thoughts of disappointment-¹

b anws: F aningsi; śara: Ṭ -gara.
d ring:Crī.


Jagatpramudita: - - - l - v - l w w w l - w - l v w -

CANTDO 18

-

1 kāla nirângrasê tangis irân winimba kakawin

prāpta Sudarpaṇâsĕmu guyu n panĕmbah i sira
twas nira kagyat ojar apa donta bhâagya ta kaka
lwir tan i rat hiḍĕpku ri kitâṇ ḍatĕng kadi dine

b panñmbah: B panambah.

ngwang mata nityaśâpti ri kahundanganta ḍatĕnga
piwruhanâta gĕng i putĕk ing twas i ngwang ahuyang
rehku nirāśrayângusira sewakê narapati

nghing yayi kapwa sangkana ni sanmatā haji jĕmah

b pṅwruhanâta: É piwruhanta; ahuyang: ĒH awuyung.

ḍa bapa haywa mangkana tuhanku ta pwa pinalar
māsiha rākṣakā mawĕlasê narendraduhita

wrṛtta nirêki pāywakĕna len Suyodhanasuta
ndātan atön ri Lakṣaṇakumāra yâmĕnuhi rĕs

a tuhanku ta: Ṭ tuhan kita.
b rakṣakr: Ĕ raksakan.
c paywakrna: BH paywakĕni.

marma nirâri rakryan angutus tumuly awaraha
reha nirân marā ri kita māskw aminta kĕmitĕn
yapwan adoh sihanta bapa tan wĕnanga śaraṇā
byakta pĕjah nirâtĕwĕk awet ni langghana nira
b mâsku aminta: Ŋ masku minta.

c wânanga: all Mĕ thus, but should be wĕnangnga for the metre.
d -tâwâk: H -tuwĕk.

CANTO 18

ile he was thinking over the lament which he was shaping in the

ĕ form of kakawin,

ĕudarpaṇa arrived and with a knowing smile she paid her respects.
âe was startled and said: 'What brings you² You are welcome, sister -
Ñteel out of this world, for your coming is as if foreordained.

--

ś
Éo that you could be infarmed of the depth of my dejection, restlessly

. waiting.

ḍut only my younger sister will be the cause of a favourable reception
hfrom the king in the future.'

Ñphe news is that she is to be matched with the son of Suyodhana,
¹ṭ L she does not like this Lakṣaṇakumara - he fills her with dread.

is is why your little sister has sent me to go straight and tell you
Ñow she would come to yau, my dear, to ask to be watched over.


120 Ṭext, Canto 18

yan kahiḍĕp tangis nira ri māsku yogya lawadĕn
prāpta mĕnêng kulĕm tuhan anīsa tan katĕngĕra
haywa jugâywa tan rasa-rasângrase lara nira
sugya tuhanku sepa ri pĕjah nirân tiśayana

c rasa-rasâng: Ĕ ya sara sang.

6 ndah wwaya cihna sĕmbah ira ring wilāpa sinuwĕng
luh nira ring pusuh ri kucup ing mĕnur susu-susup
len sĕrĕh arja sakṣma n adulur sipat burat aram
nā pamucang-mucang nira kĕdö n paminta tulungĕn

a ndak: Ĕ nda; sĕnbah ira: E sĕmbaha nira.
c sĕrĕu F sapa.
d pamucang-: Ĕ mnucang; n: Ĕ om, tulung²n: D tulunge, Ĕ tulunga.

7 nāhan ujarnya tandwa lĕwu gaṛjitâryatanaya

harṣa n umangkwakĕn sapakirim narendraduhita
mangkana tang wilâpa tumuluy minarma winaca
kong dinĕlö rinĕngwan anĕñuh twas angras angani

b sapakirim: Ĕ sakirim.

c tumuluy: F tumulwi.
d anâñuh: ĔH atêñuh.

ḍ|

Translation, Canto 18 121

|1f you consider her appeal to you, it is proper to go and help her.
|When night has fallen you should go unattended and without being

t

¹ recogniaed.

|Do not fail to reâect and to think of her pain,
f For you might be too late and she will die if you ignore her.

ḍ Now here is a proof of her respect, expressed in a poem rolled up like an

ear-plug,

ĕ Her tears on the âower-buds of the closed jasmine fowers that she put

in her hair,

hAs well as betel leaf of subtle aavours, to accompany her eye-shadow
ḍ and fragrant unguent -
JSuch are her gifts in order to press her reuest to be helped.

ṬŚuch were her words, and immediately the noble youth was highly

elated,

Ñând joyfully he placed on his lap a¹l the things that the princess had

î sent.

ÑLikewise the poem he then tenderly caressed and read;

' Phile looking at it and hearing the words his heart melted, it moved
him so deeply:


CANTO 19

Katangangan: v v - l w - w l ww c l www lwwwlow–lws

1

kaka sĕmbah i ngwang amalar sih umusira wĕlasta rākṣakā
agĕmĕn ngwang atpada sacampaka turung amaraśrayêng kapö
tinahâng madhubrata sakâmbĕkan iki wuwusĕn kanāgata

yadi tan kahat-hata sarinya niyata ni puputnya laywana

a amalar: B amala.

b agâmḍu: R magĕman.
d -hata: Ĕ gata.

CANTO 19

Ñ 'ālder brother, my respectful obeisance, hoping for your favour and to

Ṭ seek the shelter of your pity as my protector:

É Let my humble self be held in your hand like a campaka fower that has

f not yet sought refuge behind someone¹s ear -

| Ithad imagined that the bee and all it is inclined to do should be spoken
h of as something to be feared,

Butif its pollen is left untouched then it will plainly just end up falling
and fading away.


°2 CANTO 20

śaraatawwriita: - - - | w w - l v -w lww-laawlacwls

1 yan tan rĕngwakĕnângrĕs ing taḍahasih nityânangis kāsihan Ṭ–
mwang yan dohana lunggah ing gaḍung atön prāptê pupus ning iñ
nglih ning padapa tan kawarṣana lanângantî rarab ning rĕrĕb
mawas matya ri panglwang ing śaśadharânat aṇḍĕh ing toyadhi

éx you do not listen to the heartrending call of the taḍahasih bird,

h constantly lamenting pitifully,

lAnd if you push off the tendrils of the gaḍung vino that desires to reach

. out for the young leaves of the liung palm,

J And if the wilting leaves are not blessed with rain while constantly
awaiting the soft showers,

Then without doubt I will die at the waning of the moon and will follow
â¹ the ebb of the ocean¹

a ing:Di.
b pmapt² D prapta, H prapta; pupus: Ĕ puput.
d panghuang ing: A panglwang ṭ, B palwang ing; auḍâṅ: ; akandĕh.

CANTO 21 CANTO 21

wargsustta: - - - l - - w l w - w l - w x
śuch was her humble reguest in the form of a swest letter,

âêut Dhanañjayangśa was very confused and embarrassed;
RMeeting her was his ultimate desire,

JThough it would mean turning his back on his respect for the king.

1 nahan tikang sĕmbah arūm pralāpita
Dhanañjayângśârdha wirangrwa kemĕngan
putus katĕmw rki kaharṣa ning manah
tuhun minge ri twang irê nareśwara

b -ardhm É -nda; wirugwru: F wirangrwang; kemângan: H ngemĕngan.
c katâmwr: D katumw; tuang: F twas.

Bf ra– ---

he replied: 'l am exceedingly happy, elder sister,

Ṭhat she feels deeply that I may be of some use to her.

owever, your instruction to go and help her - come, consider!
Wy respect for the king is simply too great.

2 sahur nirâtyanta girangkw ikī kaka

ri denya marmâpakĕnangkwi de yayi
ā kunang pakontânglawadêki toh rase
agĕng juga twangku ri jöng nareśwara
b kwi: É kwa; murmñpakêna-: h marmâ¹ĕn-.
c pakontâ-: F pukon; toh: È to.
Īlence my wish to die fighting fiercely in battle;
ḍhis life of mine is proñtless, if Iam not master of it,
Ṭn the hope of finding the fruits of victory over an enemy,
ĕo that I might obtain whatever I wish for as a reward.¹

3 matangnya k ahyun pĕjahâmukêng raṇa
iki ng hurip wyartha ya tan widhāyakā
palar katĕmwa ng phala yan jayêng musuh
umangguha ng wastu sakāpti gañjaran
c yan: Dyar.
d wwangguha: E numangguha.
ḍOh, my lord, do nat give up your life without good reason.
b eath without any result - what good would that do²?
îhis should be what you bring for successfully completing a task,

4 uḍa tuhan haywa barang lĕgêng hurip
ikang pati n tan paphalâ ndin enaka
tuwîki sangwâ ning aniddhakĕn gawe
kunang pwa harĕn tang alot mwang enggala

b pati m: Ĕ pati. y
d alot: ABC alok.


MMrccdcdddd

128

Ṭext, Canto 21

yadin tahan durgama ning marê dalĕm

ndi n ewĕhâng sakṣmanĕn ing naya prihĕn

sakewĕh ing karya kasiddha ta pwa ya
ikang kadhIran juga sādhanêrika

a marê: EF marĕng.
d ikang: Ĕ tikang.

kunang mĕne yan hana rakwa wādhaka
samangkanângungsira mātya mapranga
sukha ng pĕjah yan śaraṇâśrayêng gati
tuwîki dewī tuhu milw apatrĕma

d apatrāma: Ṭ apatĕma.

nahan wuwus ning mangaran Sudarpaṇa
nda tandwa kengĕr manah Arjunâtmaja
ri göng i kingking nira tan wĕnang kinas
ya hetu ning lampus asangwa jīwita

b kengar. A kengṣ.

c ṅ Ĕ ni.

tuwi n lanâ rakwa wuwus nareśwara
umastutîng wīra n akūng walat smara
kadiwyaning strr wĕlin ing parâkrama
kaniṣṭa yadyan pakasādhana ng dhana

a lanī: Flalana.

b wumastutîng: AB umastutî Ĕ n umastutîng; wîa n: D winaran.

matang nirâptî pitutur Sudarpaṇa
lanā pigögĕn ri tan adwa ning wuwus
siwil ta ring candra kapin tigâlwanga

si kāladeśâhayu ta pwa ng ungsirĕn

c taring: D kari.

Ṭranslation, Canto 21 129

ḍas for the difficulty of entering the palace, though,

ḍWhat is the problem if something is done secretly and with careful
planning²

lAny problem in what you undertake can be avercame -
lPersistence is the unly means for doing it.

t

i
.However, if later on there is of course an obstadle,

ṭsuen will be the time to seek death by waging war.

ṭŪeath will be pleasant if it is a refuge and support in what you do,
JiAnd then the princess will certainly join you by stabbing herself.
ṭ
[These were the words spoken by the one called Sudarpaṇa,
ṭAnd immediately Arjunatmaja felt moved,

ṭAt the depth of his longing, which could not be escaped.
And this is why he resigned himself, and would risk his life.

eāḍMoreover the king had of course often said
îīhat he praised the hero whois so in love that he seires his beloved by
force.

Ṭor these reasons he accepted Sudarpaṇâ's advice,

Ñând was determined not to be untrue to his word.

ĕḍt was agreed that the third day of the waning moon

Would be the favourable time and place¹ for them to look for.


ff

] Translation, Canto 21 131
When they had settled the agreement to this effect,
[lSudarpana took leave to go back inio the palace.
'Wiraga and ciṇḍaga flowers formed as a doll

'Were what she took home, together with kakawin verses of love.

130 Ṭext, Canto 21

10 huwus pajöng tang samayê samangkana
Sudarpaṇâmwit mulihê dalĕm purī
wiraga len ciṇḍaga putra-putrana
ulihnya lāwan kakawin karasikan

b mulih² Ĕ mulihêng;
d alhnya: E wulihnya.

³
n

––––ū––cr–ar–ĕcrTūrṬ–


CANTO 22

wargsapatrapatita: - - - l - w - l v w w l 2 ww l wwwl wx

1

ndā ucapĕn tikī gati nirang narapatiduhita

lwir tan atön sumungsunga ri sang kaka ḍatĕng angĕnĕs
nda lĕwu göng i garjita nirê hati hinawĕr ira

mwang manis ing liring winuni len guyu lagi hinĕma

a ndd ueapĕu: A ndâ tucapĕn.

b sumungsunga: B sumungsanga.
c uirî: Ŋ nirêng.

nista ni śanya ning diwasa tan hana marĕk i sira

de ni wingit nirân patiwiwal bari-bari n arĕngu

ndah yaya n epu sang kaka yadin wawanga mangucapa
sugya kunang hanângluruganâng mata lagi mulingā

c wawanga: F wangika.
d -luruganânḍ: AB -luruganā.

lingnya n apet raras twas ibu toh mapa manaha tuhan
tan hana sanmatârjunasutârdha mingay atiśaya

tan huninga jugêng wacana hewa humĕnĕng apuji
ngwang tiki kerangan n arasa matya kawĕkasan irang

a mamnhn: D manahan.

b -ârdha: AB -adha.

c jugeng: BD jugê.

d n arasa: D hana sa, Ĕ juga ya.

mangkana lingnya tandwa kumĕtĕr hṛdaya sang ahayu
tbra rapuh ning angga wadanâmirah asĕmu tangis
kadga hanê tangan swara sahur pisan ahirit alit

om pĕjaha nghulun kaka paran phala ning ahuripa

b rapuh: B rawuh.

c hanâ ACā hanêng,
d om: T um.

CANTO 22

Let us tell of what the princess did:

Phe seemed not to want to greet her lady coming back in stealth,
But restrained the depth of elation she felt in her heart,
—oncealed her sweet glances, and held back her smile.

âlthough it was a guiet time of day and no one was in attendance,

ḍecause of her moroseness when in a bad mood, always cross,

eler lady seemed uncertain whether she should speak straight away,

Ñr whether perhaps she would tease her with her eyes by looking about
in dismay.

| an effort to arouse her emotions, she said, 'Come, madam, what
would you think²

4 Junasuta gave no sign of assent - he just looked away in disdain.
âe paid no heed at all to your words - he was annoyed, and said
nothing, aloof.

- ith the dagger in her hand her reply came at once in a small uavering
lvoice:
Éb be it, let me die, sistert What would be the use of living'

i
p
f

134 Ṭext, Canlo 22 Translation, Canto 22 135

Ṣhe was just raising her hand to stab when she was swiftly embraced
Iand fondly caressed:

Ṭoh, lady, I was not telling the truth, just seeking to arouse feelings of
love.

ṭ ow could the one oppressed by love not be happyî

ḍöōurely he will die of lovesickness if you do not take pity on him.
f

5 wahu mayat sirâtĕwĕka śīghra pinĕkul inamĕr
doh ibu mithya ta ngwang ari pet ulah anguyut-uyut
ring kapanâ ta sang katanĕhan smara tan agiranga
nyâma pĕjah rimang sira ya tan hana wĕlasa tuhan

a -tñuĕka: H -tuwĕka.
d nyama: B nyamma.
ḍōee, here are the wiraga flowers he has sent you - take them

ḍṬo be a tie for his love toward you, you know, a means of binding your
ḍ attachment.

e cindaga doll will be the issue from shared pain or passion.

ḍrhese were to be the bearers of his longing at the time when he was

| roaming in search of beauty.

6 ndah wwaya tang wirāga pakirim nira rari tariman
talya ni sih nirê kita ta rakwa pangikĕta lulut
ciṇḍaga putra-putran apatatana lara turida
na pamawâna kingking i sĕdĕng nira n ahas alangö

d pamaudna: A pamawaha.

Ṅéere too are the kakawin verses in which he asks you to conârm the

h agreement

Ī*hat on the third day of the waning moon he will come to you.'

uch were the lady's words, and the weeping one ceased being pained,
hAs deeply moved she hstened to the charm that arose from reading the
lh princes reply:

7 len kakawin paminta nira ring samaya mapag²ha
panglwanga pintigâng śaśadharân ḍatĕnga sira jśmah
nahan ujar nikang kaka marĕn ta lara sang ananḍis
marma rumĕngwakĕn raras i de ning amaca panuwal


-.

Jagaaahia: - - - l ww -1 wcw lwwalwwwlwwwlaowa-lws

CANTO 28

sakṣāt śrī ni kalangwan ing pasir amânuṣa mara kita ngūni n
anglĕngöng

nahan karaṇa ni ngwang anghyang asamâdhi turida ri sihanta sanm

mangke pwân inanugrahanta wĕnangkwa lumawana ri śakti ning of

ndr ragr ta kunang dumĕlwa kakawinku n agati kawi digjayêng lanḍṭ

a anglângöng: ĔF anglĕngĕ.

b sihanta: F sahananta; sanmata: Ĕ sanmatan.

c w~ḍnangkua: EF wĕnanganta, Ŋ wĕnangangkwa; lumauana: F lumawada.
d ragr: D ragĕta; n agati: Akl nagata.

ndan pintangkwa harêbu haywa maluy ing madhu manis i wuwusḍ
ring puḍak
tolih ringranga ning rimang kĕna-kĕnân alara turida ri dwa ning guṭ
yadyastun ngwang iki n dudul-dudulĕn ing hyun idan-idanĕn ing
karāsikan
nyāmâku n pĕjahâsilunglunga karaskw iki n awiji tangis linangwa ĕ

a pintangkua: Ĕ pintangkwi; hayuw: F uywa.
b -kĕnân: Ĕ kĕnang; ṅ D ring.

c yadyastun: F yadyastu.

d awijṅ A awijil, H mawiji.

e –

–ō=-īs - –

w–ūṇōīsr³

ā
Ŋ

CANTO 23

| | 'You were like a visible form of the deity of the unearthly beauties of the

sea-shore when you were seeking enchantment there,

] So that is why I prayed to the gods and practised the samadhi of amorous

longing in order to be favoured with your kindness.

f But now that you have granted it, so that I shall be capable of

combatting the power of love,

| f Where is there a passion that will dare to look upon my kakawin, naw

that I have been accepted as a poet world-conḍuering in beauty³

5o let me beg you, lady, not to return into the honeycd words that you
wrote on the pandanus bud;

– Ṭhink of the confusion of the heartache right on the spot when pained by

longing at a false smile.

j lāven though I should be aroused with desire and driven mad by the
f: delights of love,
Ñ For sure I would die with this writing-tablet of mine as a vehicle with its

| contents of tears turned into poetry.'

CANTO 24

- wWa- w - w Ṣ
No name, sameas CantoṢ:- - w l w w - l w - w l w l l

1 nahan rasa niking wilāpa pamaḍĕm ri duhkha sang arūm
hilang wiwal irâhĕlī ngrĕs angiwö prapañca turida
samantara tĕkâng kulĕm tuwi yaya tatan mrĕm alangö
mapang karahinan sirângĕnĕb i mar nikang kĕtĕ-kĕtĕg
b -hat¹ Cgh.

c tekâng: B tĕka; tatnu: B ndatan; mrâm: ĔF prĕm.
d wapa ug: F mapa; -ugânĕb: ñ -ngĕnĕki.

2 tangeh mara patingkah ing diwasa yan kathakĕna huwus
pirêki ta kunĕng lawas nira silih kirim-kirim ujar
lanângingĕt-ingĕt sang aryasuta reha ning saharasa
anganti sanimitta ning wĕnanga mañjingêng pura jĕmah

b kunĕng: Aē kunang; ujṅr: F ujara.

3 lalu pwa wĕkasan sirân anĕmu kaladeśa rahayu
ri tan hana nirang narādhipa layat madewaśaraṇa
marêng giriwanâpakon ira bhaṭāra sūkṣma ri sira
ya marma nira langgĕngâpagĕh anĕmwakĕn kawijayan

c -wanâpakon: E wanan pakon; -pagâh: D -magĕh.

4 asimpĕn angĕnĕs ta rakwa sira nora rākṣaka tumūt
kapat amawa pawwahan mwang ikang anghawin laras ira
purih nira sakama-kama n alĕmĕh katon ariwĕga
kaśaktin ira ta pwa wastu pinakâârayā gada nira

b anghawin: B anghahawin, DF angawin.
c ariuḍga: R anlwĕka.

CANTO 24

Ṅ Such was the essence of the letter that served to uench the fire of the
sweet lady¹s sadness,

¹ Her displeasure disappeared, replaced by the sharp pain that fed her
ḍ confusion and lovesickness.

B ĕefore long night came on, but even so she did not sleep, deep in

thought.

| Then suddenly she was overtaken by day, and tried to hide the
spreading signs of her emotions.

It would take too long to tell of the disposition of the day:

| Ror some time they sent word back and forth,
Ṭ And all the time she was thinking of the prince and how they would

share intimacies,

ḍ Awaiting the sign that he would be able to enter the palace.

ĕ Ṭime passed by and finally he found the right moment,
p When the King was not present but had gane away to seek union with

the deity.

Ñ'So that his reign would be long and firmly established and he would
ḍ attain victory.

He took only essentials and of course went unobserved, with no guards
É. joining him,

Râ party of tour carrying the betel-tox and the ones bearing his bow.

Ñit was his nature to do whatever he liked and he was disinclined to be
f seenina crowd,


Ṭext, Canto 24

kunang kawawan ing jagat nguni-ngunîrikang sanagara
narendra Baladewa ta pwa pituhun saśāsana nira
tuwi pwa sira agrajâpratihatâng prabhawa i sira
ya marma Harimarti lalana sakāpti tan hali-halin

a -ngunî-: A-yunî-.
b saśasanx: AR paâasana, Ĕ pasasan.

byatna kadi leśya de nira dumoh angingkis alangö
hana wruh ira yan saharṣa waraputra len sang araras
maran tan agiga n lĕkas wipatha kūng nirân paḍa īse
yadin mapuputa ng prang ādbhuta katon tikâ guṇa nira

d katon tikâ: Ĕ kantika.

nda tandwa waraputra molih akire paranti dinadak
hulun prawara Partha ngnni mangaran Pragupta subhaga
ya tângusir i jöng narendra Harimarti sampun agati
umahnya kasĕnöt pikandĕl i samĪpa ning taman arūm

a parantiī Ĕ paran.
d pikandĕ¹ F sikandĕl.

ya têki pinaran sang ārya pinirak tĕhĕr tinangisan

lawĕs pwa patulaknya lot apitutur halanya tinahā
kunang pwa ri kĕdö nirâwacana mâtya yan tan ubhayan
wĕlasnya ri sira pwa yâpralalu têki milwa pĕjaha

a pinirak: É pinarak.
c kadöṣ: Ĕ kadĕ.
d walasnya: F wĕkasrya.

|

d Translation, Canto 24 141
ṭ

|

| However, as for the rule over the world and in particular the ḍhale city,
ilt was King Baladewa whose every instruction was to be obey

|¹He was also the elder and the might he possessed was irresistiñle,

Śa Harimarti was relaxed and had na concern about doing anyîhing he
wanted.

R Inshort, it was like a pretext when he went far away, leaving unnoticed
É to enjoy nature,
f ñor he was aware of the shared joy of the prince and the lovely girl,
| With the result that he was not worried that their love would take the
f wrong path, both being young,
R And if it should end in a terrible battle, the boy¹s good gualities would
I become ewident.

§ lmmediately the prince succeeded in making a plan and improwised a

î useful expedient:
ṬÑ A former servant of the noble Partha, known by the name of Pragupta.

ĕ This man had sought refuge at the feet of Hlarimarti and been accepted;
Ñ His house was hidden by the palace wall at the side of a lovely garden.

ĕl ṬThe prince went to this man, gave him some money and poured out his
l| sad tale,

ḍ But his refusal was total, always remembering the misfortune that might
be imagined.

| However at his insistence, saying that he would die if he did not agree,
hOut of pity he resigned himself and would join him in death.

CANTO 25

śaraalawikrgita: - - - l ww - l wc w lww -l cwlaawls

1 sampun mayu ng ujar tuwin siwil ikang śttangśu panglwang tiga
anghing pat wĕkasan sira wruh ing ulah yatnâkire gopita
ndan Parthatmaja kepwan awri kumĕtĕr de ning takut kātrĕsan
nahan hetu nirahyun anghyanga mĕne panggil kṛtânugrahā

a śṅangśsu: B śitanggung; panghuang: F long ping.
b gopita: Ĕ| turida.

prapta ng ratri tĕngah wĕngtrika sirângantī taman sök sĕkar
yatnânghyang ri bhatara Manmatha mamūjângarpanakĕn madhu
kĕmbang campaka pallawâsmi sĕkar ing tañjung ganitrī nira
sanghub dhapa nira ng patĕr ya kaharan ghaṇṭtâśiwambhâng riris

a -ngantî DF -ngantîng.
d nira ng: Cē nira ru ya kaharan: D sakaharan; -âmbhâny riris: A âmbha ing riris, C
amuhâriris, DF siwamba niris, E sawambhan riris.

sampun pwâjapa kūṭamantra ginĕlar lawan wilāpastuti
hyayī n tungkula yoga yêka n anilib tang prĕm sawet ning harip

sakṣat-dṛṣṭa caturbhujatrinayanâng anggârdhananĕwara

b tang pr²m: B ta prĕm, F tang mrĕny, haripī A hurip.
d -udrḍśwara: A -nāreśwara, D nareswau..

CANTO 25

| When they had reached an agreement, and it was fixed for the third day
of the waning moon,

| In the end there were only four who knew of the plan, carefully laid in

k secret.

. But Parthatmaja was worried and afraid, shaking with fear and seied

f with fright,

| And this is why he desired to pray to the gods, in the hope that he might
be granted a favour.

R When night fell, at midnight he kept watch in thc garden thick with
flowers,

And attentively prayed to Lord Manmatha, worshipping with an

| offering of honey.

¹ Ṭhe flowers of the campaka and pal¹awa with shoots an
Ri tañjung were his rosary,
ê The mist was his incense, and the tnunder could be cñlled his bell, with
as holy water the misty rain.

e flowers of the

- When he had said prayers and had performed the Peak Ma

praise in kukawin form,

â|Absorbed in meditation with head bowed in yoga, then sleep crept up

on him because of his drowsiness.

|Then suddenly in a dream he saw the deity, seated on a golden lotus,

Visible before his eyes, with four arms, three eyes, and a body in the
ardhanartśuwara form.


144 Ṭext, Canto 25

pasah lāwan bhaṭarī Ratih

4 ndan swecchâwĕkasan bhaṭāra
ndânĕmbah ta sirang Dhanaṅjayasîñṭâminta ng warânugraha
mojar sang hyang ahum bapa ndah iku mah puṣpâtmarakṣakâng bhñ
tanggap tânaku siddhasadhya ta kamu\ṇ prāptâ mĕnê jro purī

a udau: nda.
b ndânĕwbah: BCFtî ndânambah, D ngran nĕmbah iku: A ika.
d prḍptī: D praptang: mâne: ER mĕnâng.

5 na ling hyang Smara tandwa sbk sukha sirang Parthatmajângañjali
ndatar sĕmbah i padapangkaja bhaṭārī kewalâpelawa
tandwa krodha sirân triwikrama karĕsrĕs krḍra Durgākṛti
anghrik sāhasa kātarân panapathe mangdhik sawet ning gĕlĕng

b uddtar: B ndar ta, [Ŋ nda tang, H ndata; bhaṭarī bhatara.
c sirân: Ĕ sira.
d panapathe: F panapatheng.

6 ayay Parthasutâpa ko n wĕnang asampe tar sumĕmbah ry aku
astwâmangguha duhkha ko mapasaha mwang sâdhya bhukti ng larḍ
nāhan ling nira yekân akrak amĕkul jöng rakwa sang duhkhita
kĕdw āminta warāntaśâpa saha pajâ kaṭamantrâstuti

a¹ dyay: Ĕ ayayay, F aye; ko n: Ĕ kong; tar¹ ĕ ta, Ĕ tan.
b .mangguha: Ĕ -manggiha; ng: Ṭ om.
d -4ntaśâpa: D antassapa; pâjâ¹ B muja.

7 rĕp ndah somya muwah ta rakwa tumuluy sang śrī bhaṭarī Ratih
apan jati nirân sinambah awĕlas ring bhakti mopākṣama
ojar ḍa bapa tatakĕn pwa sakarĕng śabdangku haywâmihang
ndah enggal maluyâta māsku n anulus yatnanta bhaktî kami

ndah: A ndak; śrī. Ĕ si.
sinambalr: AF sinĕmbah.
ojar: Ĕ mojar, Ĕ ujar. ¹,
bhaktî. Ĕ bhakting.

a n e w

Ṭranslation, Canto 25 145

| Then of his own accord the Lord separated himself from the goddess
Ratih,

| And Dhanañjayasuta bowed humbly and reṇuested to be granted a

h special favour.

f The god spoke and said: 'So be it, my boy. Here is a flawer which will

k protect you from danger -

j Take it, my son. You will attain what you propose when you arrive
within the palace.¹

| śuch were Smara, the God of Love's, words, and Parthâtmaja was

I immediately filled with happiness and made an obeisance,

ĕut he failed to pay homage at the lotus-feet of the goddess - he was
merely indifferent to her.

l lmmediately she was furious and adopted her terrifying form, fearsome

ḍ and auel, in the shape of Durgā -

J She shrieked savagely and frighteningly, uttering a scornful curse

because of her anger:

Ṅ Fie, Pârthasutal Do you dare to insult me by not paying homage to meî
ḍ May you find misery - you will be separated from the object of your
ḍ desire and will taste pain¹

ĕ Ṭhat is what she said, and thus stricken he screamed and embraced her

feet,

ĕl Begging for a counter-curse, while worshipping her with the Peak

Mantra and hymns of praise.

ĕl In a moment she became benign again and went back to being the .

goddess Ratih,
É|For it is her nature when paid homage to take pity on those who show
âl devotion and ask forgiveness.
she said: 'Oh, young man, first obey what I have said and do not refuse.
klCome, return guickly, my dear, and continue to pay full attention to
your devotion to me¹

-g
-°–


Ṭext, Canto 25

ling dĕwī wĕkasan hilang sira katanghyan têki Pārthātmaja

ton tanṭ kĕmbang aram karaātan i tangan pinwih rinākṣâĕnamĕr
yângde ḍarjita marma sakṣma rumĕsĕp ri twas nirânglangwani
nghing tâṅangśayanî manah nira wuyung dewr tuhun tan ginöĕng

c ri C ring.
d ânangśayanî D tan nangśaya ning: wuyung: Ŋ huyung.

lunghâng ratri samantarâwa rahinâwās tang pamuktyan sukha

anghing sang kakĕnan Smarastra siwuhĕn lĕnglĕng tan aptîng pangṣ

agyân wĕngya muwah byat*ta tĕka ring sore yayan tan kĕjĕp
glanângher wijil ing niśākara sirân ringrang sarantâlangö

a rahinâuus: È rahingawas; pamuktyan: Ĕ pamuktyang.
b kak²nan: F kakĕna.

c yayan: Ĕ| yaya, H yayā.

d ringrang: A ring wwang, C ringwrang, Ṭ ringwang.

Ṭranslation, Canto 25 147

k With these words the goddess finally disappeared and Pârthatmaja

i awoke,

k And saw the sweet fîlower that had taken visible form in his hand, and
carefully protected and tended it. :

) t brought him a joy, deep and subtle, that permeated his heart and

caused a feeling of rapture.

h The only thing that made him anxious was the goddess¹s anger,

although he did not take it too seriously.

Night passed and meanwhile it was broad daylight, brightly lit for the
enjoyment of happiness,
| But the one struck by the arrows of Smara was dejected, bewildered, and
ḍ had no desire to eat.
He was eager for it to be night again. In short, evening came but even so
he did not sleep,
î And wearily waited for the moon to rise, while confused, impatient and
. sunk in thought.

Ṭuraagatiw w w | - wl ww lwcwluwwlwwslw-wls

1

CANTO 26

lalu wĕkasan mĕtu ng wulan awângḍaḍari kumĕñar ing nabhastala
kadi-kadi tamtam ing rimang akon ahañanga ring angel angöl hunĕnḍ
sahana nikang pĕtĕng rinarah ardha pinalĕh ing akârya lānglĕngā |
linalu tikang karîng akiwa donya tawĕnga ri wirang ning angrĕngö |

a ing:Ci.
b hundng: B uning, Ĕ unang.
d tikang: BF tika.

irika ta Phalguṇātmaja lumampah anilib awĕdi n katanghyana
dalihan anakti-nakti sira karwa hulun ira Jurudyah angdulur

ri ḍatêng irêng Pragupta mamapagṣ ri sira huwus anajyakĕn hĕna
sira juga mañjing ing taman ikang kawula kari mĕhah mĕngĕn-mĕngĕ

e Prngupta: Ṭ Pragastha; mamnpaṣ: Ĕ namapag; anajyakân: R inajyakên.
d wḍṅah: Ĕ mahah.

atha ri ḍatĕng nirêrika sinungsung i katĕmu niking Sudarpanā
laki mapa hetu ning lali saranta dahat usun alal mangantyakĕn
kawĕkasa têki masku sakarĕng sira yayi ni bapangku hundangĕn
nya wuwus iki n mulih muwah amārga lalayan awarah ri sang mangî

b usun: DēF isun; mangantyakîn: D angantyakĕn.
c sira: H sirê.
d mulih muwah: E muwah mulih.

CANTO 26

Ṭhen finally the moon appeared, shining brightly and gleaming in the

| heavens,

lAs if yielding to longing and urging elopement on those fatigued from

| suppressing their heartache.

All the darkness was hunted down, much blamed by those who might
be engaged in the business of seeking enchantment,

But what was left behind in the privy, with the intention that it would be

. a screen to block the shame of anynne listening in.

Īt was then that Phalguṇâtmaja stealthily set out, afraid that people

. might be disturbed and wake up.

Htis excuse was that he was going to seek the favour of the gods with
only his servant Jurudyah as company.

When he arrived at Pragupta¹s place he came to mcet him and had

already prepared a way,

Śo he just went into the garden, leaving his servant hehind, sighing and
at a loss what to do.

INow when he came there he found Sudarpaṇa who greeted him:

*Young man, why are you so forgetful² I cannot bear it, impatiently
waiting for you.

Iwill leave you for a moment now, and go and call your little sister.'

ṬThese were her words as she returned by way of the wall to inform the

musing lady:


150 Ṭext, Canto 26

4 dyah ari ḍatĕng tuhan sira sang onĕng i manisi liringta yan guyu ḍ
i

angĕnĕs anganti ring taman alal ri tulusa ni wĕlasta sanmatan
mapa ta nimitta ning mingay a.ungsut anikĕli halis tĕkârĕngu
lalu maluy ing hawan manah irâtiśaya puji-puji n sugih manis
a dyah: Ĕ ndah; onūgg: È onang.

e halis tâârĕngu: ñ alista karêĕngu.
d hauam: Ĕ awanta, Ṭ hawa; manah: H taman.

5 taha mapa hetu rakryan akalib kari n aharĕp i lma ni nghulun
amiwa-miwal sirân alĕmĕh amrangakĕna lungid ing curik singī
ya matangipun tuhan pahalawön pĕjaha manĕ-manĕhta lalwakĕn
atĕwĕka têki tan wênang anona pati ning awirang jinogakĕn

a ni nghulun: Ṭ ning ulan.
b amṅuwn-: Ĕ amawa.

c lalwak²u: C lakwakĕn.
d atñwĕkn: H atuwĕka.

6 nya wuwus ikî narendraduhitāâ ri hatur ira tĕkângurud lulut
ri tĕlĕb ikang takut lawan irang juga ng amihĕri kingking ing mans
ndan i mayat ing kakâtĕwĕka marma ni lari nira rañca mār gupe

kumĕtĕr i hambal ing lalayan erang umingay i pananggap ing kakuḍ

a kî: Ĕ iking.
c mayat: F mihaū -tâwĕka: H -tuwĕka; lari Ĕlara.
d talayan: D laleyan; umingay: D umihang.

7 ri ḍatĕng irêng latâgṛha pinakpak inamĕr ing ujar priyambada
ibu tuhan i nghulun dyah ari toh mapa ta kunang i rât karîkihĕn
taha winalingku nora inĕn ing alara kokalan lulut
umangĕn-angĕn-ī'doha ni sihanta

a irêng:ēirâ.
b i rī karîkihĕn: F irang ta kerikl.
d umangên-: E numangĕry unêâng: A unang.

awĕlasĕnêng kĕnêng unĕng

h¹
-|]

h
é
¹

r

îr
ī

é

| | Ṭranslation, Canto 26 151

|My lady, the one who is longing for the sweetness of your glance as you
l smile has arrived.

'He is alone and iîs waiting in the garden, burning with impatience for

you to continue taking pity on him and showing him favour.
What is the reason you look away in annoyance, or crease your brows in
a sudden frownī

| Then he might go away again, as he is superior by nature, very proud of

being rich in sweetness.

[ Not Why do you hesitate² Do you want to be the end of me²
| 1f you go on resisting him and being unwilling he might use his sharp

dagger for stabbing.

f That is why you should stop worrying if your maidservant should die -

just accept it.

Let me stab myself -- I will not be able to consider dying with the shame

of being rejected.¹

Ṭhis is what she said to the princess, about how she seemed to be

resisting his love,
But it was merely from the depth of her fear and shyness that she
restrained the longing in her heart.

Ṅ ṬThen when her lady raised her hand to stab herself this was reason for

j i

|

w lady, noble maid, come - is this still the real world²
Ñ\No, Ihad imagined there was no life to be awaited by one who suffers

her to go ahead, troubled, weak and languishing,
a trembling on the steps over the wall she shyly looked away as her
loved one received her.

'When they reached the bower of creepers he coaxed herarḍāūūressed|³-
her with gentle words:

the pain of being afflicted with love,

'And I reflected on how far away your sympathy might be, or that you

might be moved to compassion for someone struck by heartache.


152

10

11

Text, Canto 26 Translation, Canto 26 158
f

| But when there was hope of your pity, then happincss that seemed to
open like a flower in my heart.

ŪDear maiden, what can I use as a repayment ta you for my lifeî I cannot
marĕkakĕna ng wirāga pakĕnangkwa majuma ri lukar nikang gĕlu ḍ hnd it.

-3
l
!
|
ḍ

¹ The only thing that would be any good for me would be just to be your
servant, and never be parted wherever you go,

And to come before you with wirâga Aowers for me to use in rearranging
your loosened hair.

a ya:kĔta.
b kĕnênusir: F kĕnêngusir,
d ng: Fom.

hiḍĕp i tan patĕwasa ngwang ari titir angarcanêng Smara

angipi lĕngṭhg maramwan asanâhiliran anĕngah ing tasik madhu

sari-sari yan marêng taman ikang bhramara lagi mĕngĕng marêng kḍ

ḍawuh i wĕlasta ring wwang angarang pwa phala niki lĕwih sakêng
lświh

1thought, little sister, that my constant worship of Smara would be to no
avail -
Idreamed in a trance of foating on a raft of asana flowers and being
| carried into the midst of a sea of honey.
Éach day when I went into the garden the bees would keep buaaing
around my ears,
ṭBut your pity falling on a man lost in thought is the fruit of this, greater
than the greatest.

b maramwan: F marapwan.
c mĕngĕâng: E mĕnĕng.
d angarang: ñ angara.

lHowever, no matter how great the happiness of being granted a share in
Ṅte kingdom by the king,

ḍOr receiving anm apanage, or for serving and being given elephants,

f | chariots, wealth or a noble title,

h Ṭhese are things that a man produces in life, or are made the abject of

| striving in battle,

ḍBut compared to seeking your charms and travelling the three worlds in
search of them, how could there possibly be anything else'

pira ta kunĕng sukha ning inanugrahan anisihi râjya de haji
adĕmaka mon anewaka ti sŊngana gaja ratha lābha kakryanan

hana hinanākĕn ing wwang ahurip tinĕpĕtakĕn ing amrih ing raṇa
saka ring apeta ramta midĕrêng tribhuwana ring apa n hanâ muwah

a kunĕng: A kunang; aniih: D i asih, Ĕi sih.
b ti: b kati.

c ahurip: F urip; tinâp²ĕtak²n: C tinĕpĕkakĕn.
d apeta: BC ameta.

ḍṬhese were Parthaputra¹s words to the shy girl, who resisted and was
f| annoyed at being taken on his lap;
: bhe was angry at being hugged and moved away, she refused him and
ÑÑ averted her face as he kissed her, restlessly whimpering.
¹ w what is the outcome of the insistent actions of someone who has
ḍ long been suppressing his loveî
Ṭears turned to mere sighs, and to hear them it seemed that his pain had
| aroused her compassion.

ā
|

nya wacana Parthaputra ri sang erang anukĕr awingit pinangkwakĕn
arĕngu kinol umingsĕr anulak mingay inarĕkan osah angrĕngih
mapa ta kunang tĕmah ning ulah asru sang alawas angĕlakĕn lulut
tangis apuput mĕhah juga rinĕngwakĕn asĕmu larâmangun wĕlas

b anulak: | anul; osah angrĕngih: F arĕngi-rĕngih.


f

Wangsapatrapatita: - - - l - w - l w w v l - w w l w w w

1

CANTO 27

sāmpun irang narendraduhitā kawawa luyuk alĕk
de ni mĕlĕs ni siñjang ira karaṇa nira kalĕngĕr
lolya linālanâluru salaywan ing asana lume
kewala tan kĕḍap tinitisan sĕpah inamĕr-amĕr

epu Dhanañjayâtmaja n amangkwakĕn alĕh anangis
masku tuhanku toh dyah ari tânglilir ibu t angucap
mah sakaharṣa tâku yayi mon katikĕlana halis

hah lĕwu duṣṭa ni ngwang agawe lara wipatha dahat

d hah: CF ah.

mangkana de nirânangis apet wĕlas amaṭi-maṭi
waspa nirâmĕlĕs ri jaja sang narapatiduhita

hīsnya sumar i jtwa kadi tâmṛta rumĕsĕp atis
marma nirân mĕhah kumĕtĕr anglilir amahayu ken

c tâwṛta: F amṛta.

ndā tan arĕn tangis nira lanângisĕk-isĕk ahirit

epu ring enakângulaha mar alara kaluputan

tan wruh irân minangkana puput-puputa nikang ulah
wwantĕn irêki rakwa marĕkângucap-ucapa juga

a arĕu: Ṭ arĕp.
c tau: Ĕ tar; minangkana: E manangkana; -puputa: B puputi.

|-

CANTO 27

| Atter the princess had been overcome, she was exhausted and drained of
strength

Ñ At the wetness of her dress, and this caused her to faint away.

k Ardently comforted, but limp and languid as a plucked blossom of the
asana,
| She still did not blink, was sprinkled with betel and gently caressed.

ṭ Dhanañjatmaja was perplexed and took her on his lap, wearily
lamenting:
ḍ My dear, my lady, come, little sister, wake up, speak to me!l

Come, I shall give you anything you desire, providing you frown on me -

Hal It was exceedingly wicked of me to cause you pain - it was very
wrong¹'

¹ This is how he lamented, seeking her pity with the utmost effort,
And his tears wet the princess¹s chest.

¹ Their stream suffused her soul like the water of life, deep and refreshing,
fi And so then she sighed and trembled, woke up and put her dress in

order.

She did not cease weeping, constantly sobbing softly,

Puzaled as to what would be best to do, weak, distressed and lost.

5he did not realiae she would be treated like this, or that his actions
would end up this way -

lHe would of course be there to come before to her and just have a chat.

–r.

caasscṇ


Ṭext, Canta 27

nista nirâgilângangĕn-angĕn ng ulah alara tuwi
mintara ta pwa ng enaka dumoha sapara-parana
mogha katon manis-manis l rum sang araras angainĕr
sarwamanoharâ ng ujar añĕp-ñĕp angĕtĕri hati

b dumoha: Ĕ dumo.
c amgamĕr: C angĕmĕr.
d hati B ng hati.

ling nira mah ta mâskw ibu manĕhta yayi sakaharĕp
mon grĕmusĕn sadenya cacahĕn ta bibi yak awuyung
bhagya tiki n tĕḍan tĕlĕb i doṣa ni pinun i kita

dyah palarĕn kasewakan iki n wĕnang amalĕsa sih

b yak Dyat.
c tâḍan: A tĕḍĕm; tīâ²L: Ĕ tĕb, F tĕlĕng.

takwana ni nghulun tan awĕlas ta kita kinalaran

tan wihikan kunang yan inajapku lagi tinangisan
mwang ri tan olya ni ngwang iki mātya ḍatĕng iri kita
tan huninga kunĕng kita yadin ngwang ari pĕjahana
takuana: A tawana, F tĕkwana.

inajapku: C inajapka.

ḍat²ĕng: D ḍatĕnga.

huninga: Ĕ huningang; kunâng: ABFR kunang.

c M a'

tan panaha pwa tâkw i ririsanta maluluti kita

de ni têlĕb niking turida marma rumakĕt i hati
pŪrwa ri tan katonta tuwi nitya kinĕñĕp i hati
mangkin awās tikību ri sĕḍĕngta n amasir alangö

a panaha: Ĕ pranaha.
b 1aĕṅ Ĕ lĕlĕb.
d amasir: Ṭ umusir.

Ṭranslation, Canto 27 157

| Although she was horrified to think of the painful act,
k And that it would be better to leave and go far away, anywhere she
| mighthead for,
k But then suddenly she could see the sweet things in the charming way
| he cherished her,
¹ And pleasant in every way were the words that enraptured and made
¹ her heart tremble:

R He said, 'Come, my dear, do whatever you like to your servant -
k Éven if he has to be scratched, so be it; let him be chopped to bits if you
are furious.

| It would be good fortune to accept it, in view of the seriousness of my

k offence toward you.
Lady, this service is to be hoped for, so that I can reḍuite your kindness.

Ṅ Ask me whether I am not sorry for the pain I caused you,

Ṅ ordo you not know thatI longed for you and wept over you again and
¹ againî

! And ifI do not succeed in dying by coming to you,

Then you should pay no heed if I am put to death.

¹ But I had not guessed that you would be cross at my being attached to
i you,
i Because of the depth of this passion, clinging close to the heart.
In the beginning, even when you were not to be seen, I always held you
in my heart,

Ṅ And it became all the clearer when you went to the seashore to enjoy the

scenes of nature.


158

Ṭext, Canto 27

9 mogha ḍatĕng kite kahanan i ngwang alalĕh angĕnĕs

10

11

12

13

ngkā rasa mātya lĕnglĕng aku kepwan ing ulaha rimang
ry antuk i māsku ring pura muwah luput inangĕn-angĕn
yêki nimitta ning mara witadya n apuputa pati

d -dya n: F dyah.

ndan kita kewalâpuji minge humĕnĕng atiśaya

hewa sukĕr kunang ri parĕk i ngwang añuluh angamĕr
mangkana ling nirêki sumahur sang araras ahirit

sis lagi mithya tang lĕwih ujar ngwang iki baya kaduk

b riparñ ṅ D pinarĕk ing.

nâta sahur sang ogha pinasatyakĕn i sang angamĕr
dyah śapathangkwa yan wĕnanga saha sakarĕng i kita
matya kahaṇḍĕmâku ri jajanta ri sêḍĕng ing apöm
prangĕn ikung halis tĕwĕkĕn ing liring upasana sih

c aâḍâng: Ĕ sĕdĕngan. Ṭ sadhâng; ing apöm: Ĕ inamĕr.

d prangen: F parang; tāuĕkĕn: F tĕwĕkan, H tuwĕkĕn,

mangkana de nirâśapatha lot amĕkul angarĕki

mār sumusuk ri jtwita nira ng dyah amĕkasi wĕlas
hetu nirân rasângalihanâng hṛdaya saturida

dagha ri raśmi ning wacana tan humung awisi-wisik
b nira ng: BCFR nira.

c -âng:ĕ -a.
d wacana: Ĕ wacanan; awisi-: A awisik-.

towi winanwa-wanwa ring ulah sira tinahu-tahu
yan kinĕdö-kĕdb kawaśa sangśaya marĕn awingit
marma saharṣa rāinya sawulat saguyu sakalangĕn
ahyun aroka jiwa paḍa kociwa yan apasaha

a tinahu-tahu: Ṭ tinawu-tawu.

e sawulat: Ĕsawula.
d akyun: Ĕ mahyun.

Ṭranslation, Canto 27 159

When you suddenly came where I was, charming and unattended,

| Then I felt I would die of rapture, and did not know what to do for my
lovesickness.

| When you went back ta the palace again, my dear, I could not picture
you in my mind,

| And this is the reason I come, regardless of the fact I may end up dying, .

But you are just proud and turn away in silence, aloof,

Or you are annoyed and feel uneasy when l come near to express my
love and care for you.¹

Such were his words, and the lovely lady replied, softly and
tremulously:

| 'Shl Fine words, but always untrue. For me it's ton late anyway.¹

. This was the pining lady¹s answer, and her lover took an oath to her:

*Lady, let my oath be that if l dare to be separated from you for a
momert,

î I will die, thrown down on your breast in the midst of lowemaking -

Let me be slashed by your eyebrows, stabbed by your glances, and
poisoned with your kindness.'

This is how he took an oath, constantly embracing and kissing her.

And this gently spread and pervaded the lady¹'s soul, putting an end to
her pitiful feelings.

| For this reason they felt that they shared one heart, one passion,
: Thirsting for the delights of words, not spoken aloud but in whispers.

ṭ
i

¹ Moreover she was made familiar with what to do, and was trained -

| When he persisted and made her accustomed to it, more and more her
annoyance abated.

â Because of thair shareu joy, happily they were one in looking, one in
laughing, and one in rapture -

h They desired to blend their souls, eually disappointed if they should be


Ṭext, Canto 27

14 wet ni jĕnĕk nirângracana sih nira n awĕḍar unĕng

teg dumawuh tikang ghatita sapta bangun apitutur Ñ
ng wwang ri kabhukyan ing wiṣaya tan karak²tana dahat
marma halanya ling ning aji mangkana wuwusa nika

a awwar: Ĕ angawñi unĕng: Aē unang.
c ng wwang: AB ngwang. É wwanḍ.

15 yatna Sudarpaṇâsru pangutusnya muliha ri sira

toh laki meh iki ng rahina tolih i bhaya ning ulah
mangkana lingnya sang rwa paḍa tan jrih apuputa pati
anglalu yadyapîki cacahĕn saka ring apasaha

a pangutus-: F mangutusr.

b iki ng: ī tekang; toli i toliha.
c tajri:A ajrih Ĕtarirh.

d anglalu: Balalu.

16 ling nira sis kakâpa têmahangkwa ri kasaha yayiî

nyama patingku lĕnglĕng alangö jĕngĕr away-awayĕn
enaka tâku kârwa layatâmrih angusira pasir
denya n asangwa pangĕañ² yadin sĕkulana barubi

c enaka: E menaka.
d .panggsgu: F panggalāi barubiṅ Ĕ barunbi.

17 sing patapan kasimpar asĕnöt iki pangĕpĕpana

ramya ng awikwarwikwana lamun jênĕk angajĕng unĕng
sambi ning angrawat-rawata gīta kakawin amĕrĕn

tan hana lena ram yayi tikang racanana kalangĕn

a kasimpar: Ĕ ta simper.

b unĕng: Aē unang. –
c sambi ning: A sambe, sambĕn ing, CF sanglining, H samba.

Translation, Canto 27

Ṅ ĕecause they were so absorbed in expressing their love and revealing
their longing,
I Tack! The seventh hour struck, as if sounding a warning:

I'People in the midst of the enjoyments of the senses should not be too
attached,

Because of their evils, say the scriptures¹, so it seemed to say.

On the alert, Sudarpaṇa urgently told them to go back:

'Come, young man, it is atmost day. Consider the dangers of your
actions¹¹

Thus she spoke, but the two were eḍually unaśraid that it might end in

death -

They went on regardless, even if they should be cut to shreds, rather
than be parted.

Ñ He said, ¹Alas, sister, what would become of me if I were parted from
my little sister²
) Surely my death would be rapturous, full of beauty, carried away.
It would be best for us two to run away and try to take refuge on the

ḍ seashore,
Ṅl And as for our supplies of food, they would be the herbs of the fields,
ḍ even with yams for our cooked rice.

Éî Any remote, solitary hermitage might serve as our hideaway,

And we would be happy to live the lives of ascetics, provided we can
devote ourselves to sharing our yearning.

ḍ While making a start on some songs or kakawin, to be lovingly fashioned

ḍ 'There would be nothing else than the sweetness of my little sister to be

ḍsetoutin poetic form.

7


-

162

Ṭext, Canto 27

18 yadyan iki n katĕmwa wulikĕn walatĕn alapana

19

20

2

2

jÑḍ

ha

ngkâku n amaka mon awakĕna ng sanagara gĕsĕngĕn
mangkana de nirâwacana sang kaka malĕs asayut
lingnya siwil tuhan tĕmahanêki yadin iwĕhana

c asayut: B asayat.
d sṅuil: sewil.

ndan ikang antinĕn ḍatĕnga sang prabhu juga sakarĕng
apan awas manah nira n atön i pakurĕna tuhan

nghing tinaha ri tan tulusa rakryan asiha ri sira
yapwan agöng katon i turidanta niyata n ubhayan

mangkana lingnya sāmpun ahiḍĕp sira pinituturan

ndā yayan epu kemĕngan i tan wĕnanga ning apasah
ring tadanantara pwa tĕka tang juru taman angĕnĕs
ahyun anapwa-rnapwa ta kunĕng têhĕr angidung-idung

20c tang: Ĕ ta.
20d ahyun: E mahyun; kunĕng: Aē kunang.

awri ta sang rwa kagyat arĕbut hulĕs agarawalan
ken basahan ndatan kahuningân pinalalu kahurup
asru sirân umĕmban i sang anglayung inulihakĕn
ringrang i hambal iny lalayan osch akĕtĕr inamĕr

21b kahurup: ō kahurip.
21d asah: hos, F olih; akñîr: Ĕ akĕtĕn.

ndah ri lĕpas narendraduhitā prawarasuta mulih
tan kasulâhawan saga layat gati nira wĕkasan
epu manah nikang juru taman mawacana ri hati
yêki tuhanku yan salah ulah ndya ng ulaha ri sira

22b layat: Ĕ layan.
22c epu: E mepu; mawacana: D wacana, Ī mawasana.

Ṭranslation, Canto 27 163

îie was only concerned that you might not be sincere in your love for
\ her,

ĕuch were her words, and with this warning he had already taken

Jut even so was bewildered, confused at not being able to part with her.
the meantime, however, the gardener had arrived unobserved;

ṭ e two were terrified, and in shock they hastily grabbed the sheet,
Ṅ ot heeding their lower garments, and ignoring the fact they had been
mixed up.

wiftly he carried the languishing lady in his arms and sent her home -
ḍn bewilderment on the steps of the wall she restlessly trembled while he
ḍ fondly caressed her.

ḍṭhen the princess had gone on her way the young man returned home;
Rêgardless of the conseuences he went by way of a saga tree and finally
|Ñ was on his way.

ĕĕhe gardener was puaaled and said to himself,
is was my lord... If he has done something wrong, I wonder what
ewill happen to him!' '


wsuaataw w w 1 w-wṭcwwlwcwlcwwls

CANTO 28

³

atha ri mulih sang angracana harṣa ring taman aram
tucapa ta śāpa sanḍ hyang amangun larâpratihata

ri gati nirân kaciryan angajöng prapañca turida
winĕḍar i pājar ing juru taman tuminghal i sira

b -pratṅata: Ĕ -prihat.

c kaciryan: D%aciryann angajöng: A ahajbng.

asĕlur ikang wwang ing pura mucap ri tingkahan ira
katĕka tĕkê narendra Baladewa sampun alaris

Haladhara tandwa gadgada wawang kabāngan arĕngū

mĕjahana Pārthaputra ri hiḍĕp nirârah awuyung

a ikang: H ika.
d mĕjahana: C pĕjahana. altered to mĕjahana; -ârah: F alah.

karaṇa nirân tumuntĕn umarê kaḍatwan ing ari
abutĕng i Rukmiṇînujaran ardha tamtam ing anak
puyang iña len uwâśapatha ta pwa yan wihikana
nguni-yuni sang narendramahiṣr kacidra ring ulah
c puyang: AB muyangi -śapathu: Ṭ sapa kita.

d kacidra ring: Ĕkaddran ing; -yunî C -nguni.

inalap irâtikang pahulunan marê pura nira
tuluyakĕnê Suyodhanasuta prawīra taruṇa

apan iki rakwa Lakṣaṇakumĕāra tibra kalaran
umajap i rŊm sang angrimangi kintu tâpan apuji

a iratkang: ÉR iran tikang; marê ÉFf marêng.

d angrimangṅ Ĕ arimangî umajap: Ĕ numajapi âpan: A tapwan.

CANTO 28

– câme as far as King Baladewa, and had already reached him
adhara did not fail to be alarmed and immediately went red in the

âinking he would kill Pārthaputra, he was so upset.

hrthis reason he thereupon went to his younger brother's palace

ĕŚd in particular the ueen had been deceived by what he did

r

hseiaed his niece and took her to his palace
Ñĕṇrder to marry her off immediatel
ñ to the son of ö
y buthful warrior, * ofĕwodh a
fn this Lakṣaṇakumara was said tu be deeply smitten,

3 longed for the sweetne
ss of the one causing hi
Bhe was unapproachable. āñm panas aîlava, bu


re cano22 Ṭranslation, Canto 28 167
166 extṭ, ankro

nguni-yuni de Suyodhana kĕdö n pamantwa ri sira
maphala katantrayuktyan ira len watĕk Yadukula
haji Harimarti rakwa sira tan wawang mangubhaye
nṛpa Baladewa ta pwa sira binwatan wĕlasarĕp

a -yunṅ Cē -nguni; n: CāF om.
e mangubhaye: Cā mangubhaya, ñ pangubhaye.

ika mara kaladeśa ri hiḍĕp nirang Haladhara

niyata katanggamang prabhu Suyodhanêki warahĕn
awicaritan ri potus ira mâjare Kurupati

taya Harimarti rakwa silibĕn marapwan alaris

b katanggamang: Ĕ katanggama.
d sitöĕn: A silihĕn.

pamawan i tibra ning wuyung i bhangga Parthatanaya
tuwi makamala rama nira mangkanê bibi nira
walat atĕmah prang adbhuta silih syuh ing pabharatan
sira tumuwuh tĕkânglilir ing hulah tan apĕnĕd

b tuwi: D towi.
c syuh ing: B swuhiî.

pĕjahana ta pwa mogha hinawĕr tĕkap Yadukula
winuni hinötakĕn tuwi mĕnêng wĕngîki layata
tuluyana duhkha rena nira len ikang hawan ira
paḍa tinĕḍêki n antyakĕna sang marêng giriwana

a mogha: E mogha n.

b hinṭtakĕn: D anĕtakĕn, H hanĕtakĕn.
c hawan: D uwa.

d sang marêug: B samarêng; giri-: B gara.

particular Suyodhana was insistent on taking her as a daughter-in-

law,

And as a result would form a family bond between himself and the
Yadus.

ing Harimarti had, it was said, not agreed straight away,

Pḍhis was the perfect opportunity, thought Haladhara -
Certainly King Suyodhana would be promptly informed.
We pass over the message to be sent to tell Kurupati -

Harimarti's absence it could be done unnoticed, in order to go ahead
without delay.

Ṭhe butt of his fierce anger was Pârthatanaya¹s insolence,

Which also had its origin in his father and likewise his mother;

't was a use of force that ended in a dreadful battle, crushing each other
on the battlefield,

And now that he had grown up he came to inherit the tendency to bad
behaviour.

Ñte would have killed him, but it happened that the Yadus blocked it:
ey hid him and kept him in a secret place, till later that night he could
depart.

Ñtis mother would continue to bear the brunt ḍf his misery, but via a
different path -

ey both accepted that they would await the one who had gone into
ḍ the wooded mountains.

168

9

10

Ṭext, Canto 28

ndan iki warabhimanyu tan arĕs rumĕmpaka sira
awĕdi parangmukhê guru jugêki towi n inamör
karaṇa nirêki rakwa n alaris dumoha sakarĕng
amalara sanmata prabhu Janârdhanân tĕka jĕmah

a ikṅ B ak rumĕmpaka: rumampaka.
b -mukhê F mukhêng; guru: C adds note: juru; inamĕr: C inawöōr (v.d.-ī. corr. to îin

d m: F om.

ri ḍatĕng ikang kulĕm ndah irikā sirân wijil anis
telas amuhun ri rena¹nira kâsrĕpan tinangisan
kunang apa tan wawang lĕpas anoli-nolih angadĕg
hali-halin angrase pĕjaha sang katinggalan unĕng
b amuhun: F umuhun.

c apa: Ĕ apan.
d wnĕng: AE unang.

Ṭranslatiun, Canto 28

flabout.
ḍ was the reason, then, that he went off to remove himself for a while

ḍ the hope of gaining a sympathetic reception from King Janārdhana
] lwen he came later on.

vhen night arrived then he went out alone,

er he had taken leave of his mother, who wa
, s deepl
'wept over him. rrṣbṇuhsdand
owever, he could not go straight off, but kept lookin
–– pt looking back and

neasy and wondering whether the one he was l
die of heartache. as leaving behind might


CANTO 29

Myaukomata: - - - l w w l w cwl ww lwcwlww

1 lunghā lampah irêng kulĕm dinulur ing Jurudyah angamung
tan kewö panĕsĕlnya lot apitutur ndatan pinituhu
mangke pwa n hana duhkha ning tuhan adoh wĕnangnya kasaha
anglampa juga milwa mātya ri tĕlĕb ni sihnya ri sira
a lungha: Ĕ lunghang; irêng: Cirê.
b kewö: F kewĕr, pinituhu: A pinitunu.
d watya: Ĕ mitya.

2 ndatan wruh pwa sirê puput-puputa ning manah mwang ulaha
tan wring kwana salampah ing suku jugâng tinatakĕn ira
tĕcwan sambya n anakti-nakti saha kĕmbang ing kura-kura
sing hyang-hyang kahawan tikang sinawuran sugandhakusuma

---

a udatan: Ĕ ndĕtar.
! b kuaum: gwana; jugâng: AD juga n.
d tikang: Ĕ tikan.

3 rap moghâng ghana nīlawarṇa rumahab ring ambaratala
sumyuk tang hudan adrĕs ing tĕgal adoh pradeśa sĕpĕrĕn
anglampa ta sirâmitadya tĕlĕsâpa tan wring usirĕn
dodot rakwa sinimpĕnan hinapitan sirânggĕgĕs atis
b adrṣs: Ĕ drĕs; sîp²rân: DE sĕsĕrĕn, F rĕrĕsĕn.

e -mitadya: R -misata; tan:Ĕ tar.
d hiuapitan: A n inapitan.

CANTO 29

He went on his way in the night, accompanied by Jurudyah alone,

Who did not care about his regret at constantly giving advice but not
being heeded,

But now that his master was in trouble he was far from being able to be

separated from him,

And could only resign himself to joining him in death out of the depth of
ā¹ his love for him.

ĕut he (Abhimanyu) did not know where his thoughts or actions might
h ânally end up:

ḍle did not know where to go, but simply followed where his footsteps
ḍ took him.

â awever, at the same time he sought divine favour with the flowers of
ḍ the kura-kura,

fhnd every sacred place he passed along the way he strewed with
ifragrant blooms.

ĕuddenly a dark-coloured cloud covered the whole sky.
i leavy rain beat down on the ṭields, and a village to call in at was far

know where to head for -
ĕb of course he just gathered up his dodot and held it tight while

172

Ṭaxt, Canto 29

tĕkwan tang hawan ardha tan papakatonan ewĕh alĕyö
epw i daya nirânggagap lumaku tan pakala kasasar w
nohan rakwa sirân pamanggih ulul ing ḍukun wahu āwa
ngkāna n mampir angöb sirâpĕḍĕ-pĕḍĕk lawan dulur ira

a hauan: A om, papakatonan: A pakatonan.
b epwi Ĕ mepuy; dḍyn: Cbhaya, DF deya.
c ḍukum: D dukuṭ, H dukun.

d agst: A anghĕp, D anghöb.

mampĕh pwâng hudarring kamantyan apuput āai-iss alit
mangkat rakwa sirêrikân panĕmu thani koñjuk ahiring
angde rês wwang ikâsurak pilih amökî taskara kurns
panglinggan kukulanya lāgi karĕngö lanângalik-ali

b pan²êmu: B panimu; koñjuk: Aĕ konjak.
e kunĕug: A kunang.

sangsiptan ri lĕpas nirêrika mijil tikany wulan awās
kady asih ri sirân tĕkânghilangakĕn pĕtĕng rinadinan .

i i tirtha ramya kasĕnöt
ngkân praptêng suku ning wukir manĕmu y w

pawitrâsring inungsir ing wwang anahĕn prih ing twas ap

b wîa-Ĕ tkang.
e ugkdn: A ngkā; praptâng: BCēF praptê.

t²kwan wruh gati ning Jurudyah irikā matangnya n awuwus

ḍo nohan dahatĕn tuhanku kawawêriki n kadi dine
yêkî trtha warapradâgĕlĕm aweh kasiddhan înusi .
ndâtrthata kitêriki m palar amangguha ng hayu jêma
b dḍa: F dhuh.

c yskî AF yeki ng. °W
d n a n patar, C n palar, v.d.ī. inserts m fram his *b¹.

Ṭranslation, Canto 29 173

ḍ was good luck, then, that he came acrass the roof of a forest hermitage
ḍ recently abandoned,

Īhe rain abated in a while and turned into a āne driaale,

0 they set out and then discovered a village, high up on the slope.

f e people there were scary and were shouting, perhaps cutting off the
Yhead of a thief,

hnd the sign of this was the alarm-drum still to be heard constantly

h ringîng out.

In short when they had mowed on from there the moon came aut and
shone clearly,

Rhnd as if in sympathy for them it came to remove the darkness and
swept it away.

îhen they arrived at the foot of a hill and found a lovely spring in a

| remote spor;

ḍ was a place of purification, often visited by people enduring the sharp
pain of a sad heart.

;Moreover it was Jurudyah¹s way to know about this, and so he said:
BDh this is very lucky, my lord, that we hawe found our way here, as if

| decreed by destiny.
ehis is a 'boon-granting¹ spring - it never tires of giving success in what
ĕlone is seeking,
ḍome, let us bathe here, in the hope of finding good fortune in the


174 Ṭext, Canto 29

8 nahan lingnya warabhimanyu tumuluy prayatna n inutus
ndâmūjā ri huwus nirâdyus agawe Śiwarcanawidhi
mudra mwang japa kūṭamantra ginĕlar nirâmrih asiwi
Rudraradhana binwatan hiḍĕp apan sirâmaribhawa

a tumuluy: F tumulwū inutus: A inutur, EDR hinutus.

9 dhyayī rakwa sirân tumungkul asamadhi yoga ginĕgö
enak de ning animpĕnî sarinahasyan ing guru tinūt
tâkwan wyartha mara ng tapabrata ya tansthirâng manah aho
sasing sadhya kasiddha de ni bĕnĕr ing tutur pinahayu
a ginĕgö: Ĕ ginagö.
b dening: H de nira.
c mam ng: CD mara.

10 wruh yan tattwa bhaṭāra wastu pĕuuh ing jagattraya wibhuh
sūakṣmê sṛṣṭa nirân hanâmagĕhi pañcabhūta sakala
tambis kepwana tang prajângawakanâmuatiṣṭa ri sira
sang yogi pwa kumawruhî gati nirâpariñci tinuduh
a jagattraya: Ṭ jagattniya.
b sakymê D sakṣmĕng. F suksma.
d kumauwruhî: E kumawruh ing; -pariñcii * nninci.

11 manggĕh jñâna nirâbhimanyu ri kapakṣan ing sinamaya
prāṇāyāma tang âtma pĕjita Śiwatmakâmṛtamaya
nda moghân kasilib sirê lĕyĕp ikang matâlĕh aharip
tan wring bhawa nirâtura lawan ikang Jurudyah angĕḍĕr

b -mrtamaya: A -wṛtyamaya.

c naa: A ndah; kasit: ta silib; l&yḍs Ĕ iyĕp; -âr F lt aharip: Carip-arip, Ĕahip. |

d angḍḍrr: ī angadhĕr.

Ṭranslation, Canto 29

ĕhe said, and thereupon Abhimanyu was given careful instructions
Ñ worshipped; when he had bathed he carried out the rites for the
Rorship of Śiwa.

ĕhd-gestures and the kâtamantra he applied and strove to show
Ñverence,

ing his mind on the worship of Rudra, as he possesses supreme
ĕbwer.

Ā was of course deep in meditation, his head bowed in mental
Rbncentration as he adhered to yoga,
Ñd had no trouble in bringing together all the secret teachings of his
śuru and following them.

Rultivate our consciousness.

ÑŊ understood that the essence of the Lord in reality fills the three
borlds and is all-pervading;
Ñ is present in a subtle form in his creation, and gives stability to the
âve elements in the visible world.

Je world of men might be on the verge of desperation to embody him
fhr enthrone him,

eĕÑhimanyu¹s insight was firmly established regarding the
âetermination with which he strove to attain his goal:
ÑÑ exercising control of the breath, the indwelling soul worshipped as
Ṭĕñ*iwa himself, consisting of the water of immortality.

Ñlen it came about that without noticing it his eyes became dim, weary
ḍhnd sleepy.
R d without knowing what state he was in he doaed off with Jurudyah,


176

Ṭext, Canto 29

12 neka têki n hana bhūta rākṣasa mahadshutawugah agöng
rrakara Karālawaktra pangaran ĕkar - n uama
an wĕngi karwa hamba niki paṇ d
paaam - canan iĕka ri sang kapanggih aturū
y

c uikṅ ĔF nika.

1a lingnyâhāh lĕwu têki nohan i gatingkw îkin mahas has w
ndah siddhânĕmu mānuṣa wwatakĕnangkwa és tu l
i ri a sira śīghra sang dyah awunē
ānalyani rimpusĕnya sîra
amba anikwakĕn sira matangnyā n aprĕp asĕlur

a -kw ṅ Ĕ -kwaki Ĕ ntikh

b ndah: Ĕ nda; mânuṣa uṅwt-: H
c -nalyanṅ É -nalyana.

a matngnya: ā matanghya.

manuṣâwwatṅ rirḍ: a rī, ĕCkî ri.

14 tan jrih lagi silih tkĕk sira silih tĕhak silih arug

mangkin moha silih culik

mata lanêsilih kawil irung

i âkral apĕluk
wet ning śakti sakama-kama sira lāghaw p

lwir māyân sinikĕp luput

a t:Ĕ tar; tâ*k: Ĕ tĕkĕn.
b calik: Ĕ cunik.
a anugut: ADē*¹ apagut:

malês anar manĕmpuh amagut

ĕk
15 ndânambut baḍama ng niśācara tumandang amrang amurê

wyarthâpan kasikĕp tang

anya karĕrĕng jinsmbakĕn ira

tan sārângrĕpa kedĕkan tuwi jinambak akrak anangis
pinrĕp lāgî hinosakĕn mangabhayā maminta hinurip

a ng:D om.
b jinṅnbakên ira: jinêmbak ni
d pinrâp Ṭ sinrĕp; anangabhaya:

ra, DF jinambakĕn ira.

ā mangabhayan; mamiṅta: g aminta, f minta; hinurip:ĕ

inurip. D hunurip. ñ hinuripan.

Ṭranslation, Canto 29 177

ḍ
d ow there was a demon, terrifying and enormously big,
ĕh dreadful appearance, called Karalawaktra by his lord.
ḍhe went out every night with his servant, who carried his cleaver,

ĕdnd so it happened that he came and found him there asleep.

– âe said, *Aha¹ This is great good luck, this time on my rounds!

! e, Ihave found a human being here that I can take as an offering to my
ḍlord.'
Rîe was just about to tie up his hands and feet when the young man
swiftly awoke,

hereely boasted and pushed him away, and so they started punching
ḍwithout a break.

Ṭd–damīa a-ana¹ w

rw

–ad

\ arlessly they kept throttling each ather, pushing each other, showing
leach other ofṭ,

ḍnd all the more blindly poking each other in the eye and constantly
ldlawing eacñ other's nose.

ḍecause of their power at will they agilely gripped and embraced,
ḍke magic when seiaed they got away and in return kneed, clashed and

Ṭr––īrm

¹ ! en the demon took his cleaver and advanced, slashing and charging,

]

ut in vain, as his hand was seiaed, and the prince overpowered and
l

ĕḍelpless he fell to his knees, was stepped on. seiged by the hair, and
Ñlyelled and wailed,

ĕlmched again and again with all his might, to save himself he begged
ĕlfor his life:


CANTO 30

. oluwuolawwlw
śiarinī: w - - l - - l w

i i âmarajaya
aha maskw atyantêki pamaribhawant
huwakĕn ngwang denyâku manĕha tuhan tan panêbusan
nda nahan lingnyê Phalgunasuta sirâtakwan iri ya
ndi sangkanmu mwanñ toh apa kari gawaym¹ tĕka harah

a aha A ahah, Baha.

b huwakân: A umwāĕkĕm denyâku: dentâku.
c nda: D ndar; lingnyê Ĕ lingnyan-

a tari: karih; gawaymu: AR gawemu.

uḍa rakryan tan doṣa pataña tahan ngwang mawaraha
bhaṭārī Durgâtah sira waśa riking jīwa satata -
amet bhogâsing yośyâ tadahĕn ira ngwang si marusu!
mahas ring deśânung pawijilana mangsângrahatana

c si marusuh: Ṭ sang rusuh.
d ring: D riṅ -nung: © ning.

nda nāhan pājarnyân prawarasuta yatnângangĕn-angĕn
kalabdhajñānan ling nira yadi bhatarīlihatana
matangnyân pojar bhoh bapa haturakĕn pwâku tadahĕn
atön matyâku n duhkha kasah i kasihkw alĕh apĕsöh

a nda: D ndan; -uyâr: ñ -nya.
c nyâm:Dē-nyar.
d atṣn: A akĕn; n duhkha kasak: © ndah kakasah.

awas pwêki n sihkwī kita muliha molih kahulunan
nghulun matyā tan siddha mapupula lāwan sang ahajöng
nda nahan ling Pārthātmaja wihang ikang rakṣasapat
apan heman lingnyê sira sira kĕdö māyu tang ujar

a muliks: C maltha; mol: Ĕ molah.

b matya: Ĕ matye.
c nda: A ndah,D ndam ikang: Ĕ îkung.

Aha, my dear, great indeed in your superior force to be able to
overcome mel

Release me, and lI shall be your servant unconditionally.
Ṭhis is what he said to Phalguṇasuta, who asked him:
at is your originî Come, what is your business in coming hereî*

bn, my noble lord, the guestion is not an offence, I think - let me tell
¹ you:

Ṭ€he goddess Durgā has power over my life always.
Beeking any foöd suitable for her to consume, I have a troublesome task,

Roaming through regions that might provide prey to find her favour¹*

is is what he said, and the prince was alert and thought it over;

hi would be an inspiration, he said to himselî, if I were able to see the
¹ goddess.

Ño he said, 'Well, old fellow, then offer me for her to eat!
Ñjust want to die. parted from my loved one, weary and dejected.

|
l
)

ṭ

but it is plain I would be doing you a favour if you go home taking me
as a slave,

d if I die then I will never succeed in being reunited with the lovely

Ñhis is what Parthatmaja said, but the great demon was unwilling,
ĕs he thought it would be a pity for him, and insisted on making an


Ṭext, Canto 3ḍ

5 ndah enak tambĕknyânglayang umawa sang kārwa kawula

gĕnĕp rakwêkâtunggalan umibĕr ing megha ri ruhur
sukhâmbĕk sang Parthatmaja tuhun ikang rowang akĕtĕr
lanârĕs yadyan lingnya ḍawuhakĕnâwās tan ahurip

d ahurip: Ṭ mahurip.

ḍatĕng ngkānêng Durgālaya wukir agöng ñapñap awubur
pĕnuh ratnâbhra swarga ng umah ahalĕp gopura maṇik
kunĕng pwâkweh rāh len iki tahulan ing preta kasawur
pĕnuh sarsök tang bhata hala-hala kapwâmĕdi-mĕdi

b wmah: BH uma.
c ikṅ F ika; kunâng: A kunang; kasawur: É kasahur.
d tang:ĕ ta.

bhaṭarī Durga harṣatara rumĕngö wrtta kahatur

ri polih ning hambâng taḍahĕn ira yângde airang ira
tuwin sinyang ring ghaṇṭi saha wajaghaṇṭâtri gumĕrĕh
pamaja ning bhatâjaya-jaya paḍâsewa huma

b taḍahan: D taḍah.
c sinyang: B sinya; -âlri: A -âri.
d 'pamĕjî: E pamaja.

mijil prāptê heng garjita lumihat inṭ mukhya taḍahĕn
matangnya n gĕnggöngĕn lwir amḍpĕkanâng andabhuwana
wwalu ng hastâtĕṇḍas tiga ḍadḍa wĕlang lampir aganal
matâwĕlw āḍangṣṭrâsalit irung arong roma murarak

a mukhya: AH makya; taḍakĕn: Ṭ tadhaha.

b gânggṅngên: Ĕ gögöngĕru amñp*k- B amĕpak-, ñ amapak-.
e Ṭhis line missing in Éi wwalu: A walu; lampir: Ŋ rampir.
d arong: A aro, C arongrong.

Ṭranslation, Canto ĕḍ 181

ḍhe was happy to y away, carrying with him the two with servant,
ey were all present, as of course they went as one, ying high up in
h e clouds.

Ñrthatmaja telt Pleased, although his companion was shaking,

h the time fearful, thinking that if he was dropped clearly would not
live.

ḍhen they arrived at the abode or Durgā, it was a big hill, vanishing
from view it was so high;

ĕll of brightly shining gems, the house was a heaven, with a proper
jeweled gateway.

âowever, there was much blood and the bones of ghosts were scattered

about,

Énd it was crowded with demons and evil beings, all very frightening,

RṬe goddess Durga was highly delighted to hear the news brought to

her,
Ñhow her slave had got samething for her to eat - this made her elated.
Ṅḍ called by a little bell together with cymbals resounding loudly,

ĕê worship of the demons uttering shouts of victory, each standing
Ñê ady to serve.

d

Ñe emerged and arrived outside, excited to see the spedial food to be
ṭ onsumed,

hd so she was bursting as if to fill the whole world.

ḍe had eight hands, three heads, a chest with gaudy stripes and rough,
Ñlging eyes, sharp fangs, nostrils like caves and hair disheveled.


182 Ṭext, Canta ĕ0 Translation, Canto 3Ū 18a

9 lumung têkang hastâharĕp amanganê Pārthatanaya ĕśr hand was reachin, i

¹ g out, intend t
! tuhun maṇḍĕg yan tinghal i sira n amajā saha widhi ing to eat Parthatanaya,
matangnya n mār moghâwĕlasa ta bhaṭarī kakawaśa
lĕngĕng de ning mantra sphutatara rĕsĕp ramya karêngö

' Ṅl¹

pity and was overcome,
Ŋraptured by the mantr -
é y ntras, very clear and penetrating, pleasing to the

| -
c wḍasa ta: E welasana ta, f welas ika; kakawaśa: } kawagha.
d lângāng: Calĕr, altered to lāngĕng. F kaler.

––w––w- c–rg £––vAR -

|
6
.


Cṭuuwluwwlw. l-
Jagaduhita: - - - l w w - l w - v l v - |

1

CANTO ĕ1

3

om sĕmbah ning anâśrayâmĕkul i jöng paramasakala rena ning jagat
apan byakta kitânghanākĕn irikânghilangakĕn agawe halâhayu

icchantân atisukṣma len aganal aruhur amĕpĕkana ng nabhastala
waswasĕn hana tan hanānta yan adoh aparĕka ring apan kawastwanḍ

a om: C ung.
e aruhur: Ĕ aluhur.
d kauastuana: C kawastwan.

yatnânḍūt i gawe bhaṭara n umiwö ng bhuwana mara gatinta tan
solah bhāwa sakama-kāma ni manah nira salĕkas >ên kinālihan
ekatwanta lawan sira ng paramatattwa tuwin adadi sarwadewata
Brahmā Wiṣṇu Maheśwarâdi sira len kita matĕmah Umâdidewatī

ng: Ŋ om.

ni: E mani.

sira ng: È siran.
matĕmah: | n atĕmah.

a n ḍ w

utpatti sthiti mjna ning jagat ikang suruhan ira kitâśrayângdulur
krarân Rudra bhaṭāra Bhairawa ta nāma nira n agati līnakāraṇa

ngkân Durgā kita Bhairawr paramasūkṣmatara pinakajtwa ning praj -
mawak sukṛta duskṛtânĕmahakĕn hala hayu sukha duhkha ning daḍ

a -śraya-: C -angâraya.
c ngkân: Ĕ ngka. -
d -nĕmahak²n: E mahayukan, Ṭ -ttmahakĕn.

CANTO a1

Ñplaill Homage from the refugeless, embracing the feet of the supreme
manifestation, mother of the world;

gor it is plainly you who bring it into being, who take it away. and who
make ṭood and evil.

ht is your desire, whether very subtle or gross and high, to ñll the
firmament,

And if your being and non-being are to be examined, whether far away
or near at hand, how could they be defined?

our way is to follow attentively the work of the Lord in caring for the

world, inseparable,

Rll his actions and whatever he desires, their whole implementation, are
shared together.

Ñĕour unity with him is the highest reality, and tums into all the gods:

Ñĕrâhma, Wiṣṇu, Maheśwara and so on are he, and you assume the form

of Umā, the first of the goddesses.

e arising, abiding and passing away of the world are his task, and you
f are their support and refuge that go with them.

¹ 3 s fierce Rudra his name is Bhairawa, when playing the part of causing

Ñĕ destruction,

nd then as Durgā you are Bhairawṛ, the highest immaterial being, who
f serve as the life of the world of men,

embodied in good deeds and evil deeds, you give form to ill and good

ĕ fortune, the happiness and unhappiness of created beings.

186 Ṭext, Canto 3î

4 jñṅanângandĕl i mantra śakti kita ring gurumukha rinahasya gopil |
yan sakṣat kawaśânganugraha sakêng guru ta kita n aweh anugrahñ
mwang ring swapna kitân katona nguniweh yan ika siluman

adbhutâhalĕp
nā cihnanta n asih maweha sakatöna ning amahayu yoga sasmṛti

c -halṣ: Ĕ -alĕp.
d yoga:Ĕyo.

5 ndan ring sampay agöng ta denta mangupadrawa niyata wineh
kapātaka

Q

tonĕn nya ng Mahñasura mwang iki daitya Ruru paḍa jayêng jag

ndâwajñā pwa n amangpang ing samara tan pabiṣa mangabhaya

sināhasan Ñ
marmanyâgati kahananta wĕkasan linalu niki n ahātnya ring hurip,

a ndam: Ĕ nda; agöng: B agöi mangupa-: Ĕ ṅ angupa-.

b tonĕr nya ng: BC tanĕnyâng, É tonĕn hyang, F tonĕn ya.
c sinâhasan: C kināhasan. '
d kahananta wîkasan: C kĕhanan kawĕkasan.

Ṭranslation, Canto 31 187

fou are knowledge firmly founded on powerful mantras, transmitted as

secret from the mouth of the guru and kept concealed,

R'hen in visible farm you are empowered to grant a favour from the

B guru when he gives a boon.

ând in dreams when you are seen, and especially if this is a marvelous

and appropriate image,

chis a sign that you will be kind enough to give all that is desired by
one practising yoga with mental concentration.

Ṭee for ecample the Mahiṣâsura and the demon Ruru, who were eually
victorious in the three worlds.

âut it would be disrespectful to challenge you on the battleñeld,

f powerless to seek protection when fiercely attacked,

ḍnd hence with your presence in this role, finally this one accepts if he

. cares for his life.¹

CANTṇ 3ĕ2

śwariarv - - -- l wwwlwwclacwwlws

nda nahan ling Parthatmaja n angabhiwâda sphuṭatara
bhaṭarr Durga somya sira wĕkasan marma mawuivus
uḍn sampun wruh pwâku bapa ri sakâryanta ri kami
parīkṣangkw rbhaktinta juga yak amintoni racana

a ndm D ndan.
a jugm C huga; wmintoni racana: A aminton niradhara.

tâlas manggĕh pwa twangta ri kami subaddhâpratihata
apan tan linggar ta pwa ya pinaribhaṇḍênapa karih
matangnyân siddhâtah kita maluyana ng sadhya kalulut
tuhu n wwangsanaktâmisan usir ikā yogyaśarana

a tuangta: Ftatwa.

b tinggar: lingga. Clangga. F langghana
c maluyana ng: Ŋ maluyaning, F maluyana.
d tuhu n: Ṭ wuhaw -tânisan: ī -amisan.

kadatwan ngkanê Porabhaya kahanan Bhīmatanaya
widagdhêng mayābañcana gati niki n rākṣasakula
Karalâmah lakwâtĕrakĕna rika haywa makabāt
bhaṭarī nāhan ling nira ring apa tang bhṛtya wihanga

a kaḍdatwan: R ngkadatwan.
c rikī: Ĕ irika; makab²t: D ta kabĕt, Ĕ n akabĕt.

prayatnânĕmbah Pārthasuta n amuhun mangkata huwus
Jurudyah nityâsru n larisa bĕsur agyang giri-girin
manahnyârĕs lagînuyut-uyut iki n tinggalakĕna

ikang bhuta krarânggyat amuhara ringrang kasuriring

b agyarg: Ĕagyan.
c iki m: Ĕiken.

CANTO 32

Puch were Parthatmaja¹s words as he addressed her reverently in ve
clear tones, Rl
ĕ the goddess Durgâa was ânally gentle and said with deep feeling:
oh I already know, young man, about all your observances for me -
Ṅt was just my test of your devotion to me when I displayed my

; unshakable,

îor it is unfaltering when subjected to any kind of severe test.

Por this reason you will succeed in going back to the object of your love,
ut you should seek the help of your first cousin as a suitable support.

o is skilled in the use of deception by magic, as is the way of the

¹ râkṣasa race.

urhasuta was careful to pay homage, taking leave to set out.
yah was always insistent on leaving - h i it, i

g - he was sick of it,
î and seiaed with fright. īaîw
ñ heart was fearful and kept warning him not to be left behind -
hhe fierce demons startled him, and this made him confused and
unsteady.


Ṭaext, Canta 32

t²las lunghā sang Pārthatanaya hanêng ambaratala
Karālânunggw ī karwa hulun iki yatnê hulu nira

putus ñapñap doh ning parana mapa yan śighra sapĕtik
kasiddhajñanan sang hyang amuhara mūkṣênangĕn-angĕn

c doh: C don, D joh, Ĕ adoh.

byatītan praptêng Porabhaya dumunung ring taman arūm
ndah amwit sakṣma bhata sira kawĕkas karwa kawula
angantī sor ning rajasa ri dungus ing pañcuran aho
umer-her lungha ning wĕngi tuwi mayat söng ning aruṇa

a byatnan: A byawta; prdptêng: C praptê; dumunung: ê dumunu; rinṣ: A ing.

b sakṣma: B sakṣma ng; kauîkas: C wĕkas.
d umer-her: ā hume-her, C humer-her; mayat: C sayat.

Ṭranslaticn, Canto 32 191

When Parthatanaya had gone and was there in the sky,

Karala watched over him and his servant, carefully on his head.

Ṭhe distance to be covered was completed and faded, as it went as ḍuick
as a flash -

The god's endowment with supernatural knowledge caused it to vanish
into nothingness when they tried to picture it.

We pass over haw he arrived in Porabhaya and took up lodging in the
fragrant garden,

And then the demon said goodbye, and he was left behind with his
servant.

He stayed there beneath a râjasa tree on the rocky bank of a clear
fountain,

Waiting till the night had passed and the glow of the sun was about to

appear.


Iuridagati w w w l w w l c wwlw- wlwwwlwwaclw-wlṅ

1

CANTO 3ĕ

atha rahinê samantara bhatara dinakara mijil prabhaswara
bangun asĕgĕh ri sang ḍatĕng anis lali lumihat i lĕnglêng ing taman
bhramara marêng sĕkar kadi mahâtuduh angutus asumpingê sira
manuk amijah munî wwahan ikâwarah i surasa ning phalânĕḍĕng |

w-

b tumihat: tumihĕt.
c -tuduh: É-nuduh; asumpingê C umimpange.
d munîng: A munî.

lalu tumurun sirârahup acamana humĕnĕng ayoga sâsmṛti

angudakatarpanângharĕpakĕn kahanan ira bhaṭara bhaskara
ndan umulat ing mirah mata lĕwih kĕḍap angular-alir lwir angjawa
dĕlĕg angalung yayâsĕgĕh akon anginuma bañu haywa tan warĕg

a acñmanai B aḍamana.
c -alirn CF -alṭ wir D lwar; angjauat: D angjahat.

pira ta kunĕng suwe nira samantara hana tĕka rākṣasâtuha
ndan amawa kuṅdi len sapu gawenya masuruhan i haywa ning tamñ
sawulat ikî sirârĕngu ta yâharĕp abutĕnga sāhasâmranga

tuhun anaha ri rapa nira marma niki marĕk anantwa sādara

a kunĕng: A kunang.
b gawenya wasuruhan: Ĕ gawenyan asuruhan; haywa ning: Ŋ kaywaning.
c -mranga: Ŋ -pranga.

CANTO 33

Then it was day and soon the Lord Sun emerged shining brightly,

As if greeting the new arrival, who had come unnoticed and was
absorbed in viewing the lovely garden.

The bees headed for the flowers, as if intentionally pointing them out
and telling him to use them as an ornament for his ears,

And the birds excitedly called in the fruit-trees, infarming him about the

delicious taste of the fruits just ripening there.

Then he came down to wash his face and rinse his mouth, while keeping
silent in concentrated yoga;
lHe carried out a libation of water while facing in the direction of the
| Lord Śun.
ḍ Then he saw the 'red eyes¹ glinting and darting to and fro as if nudging
him to come,
And the pike swam in a circlc as if welcoming the guest and telling him
| to drink the water and not fail to take his ñll.

Ñĕ After some time passed in this way, soon there was an old demon who

came;
R He was carrying a key and a broom, as it was his job to keep the garden
in order. .

h As soon as he saw him he was annoyed, and was about to lose his
ltemper and fiercely attack,

³ But had a suspicion about his appearance, and so came forward and
addressed him in a respectful tone:


––seTD–ss-

194

Ṭext, Canto 3ĕ ]

uḍuh apa kawwanganta mapa donta kari laki warah pwa ta nghulḍ
ndi kari hawanta len syapa ngaranta bapa taha kunang kita hyanga |

ndah iwĕh iking taman kĕta tuwin piningit ing apa tang wangĕn
pitih iki dewa kinnara jugâng wĕnanga ḍatĕnga len sakê haji
b ndi: F ndin.

c kata: BCēF tĕka.
d jugâng: C%juga.

pataña nikîsira ndan awarah ta sira n agati janma kasyasih
ḍatĕng aharĕp sumĕmbaha Ghatotkaca palar anumoda masiha
nya ling ira marma tang winuwusan umatur ajar i rakṣaseśwara
haji winarah kapahan ing asambhawa karaṇa nirân katanggama

b sumâmbaha: Ū sumambahu; palar: palarĕn, F malar; auumoda: numuda.

ri ḍatĕng irêng taman katĕmu sang kasiharĕp asumöng tininghalan

sumuyug anĕmbah atwang irikân tinañan inapa marma ning mara

laki mapa hetu ning tĕka bangun hana pinalĕh i rañca ning manah
kapati rumar hatingku mawĕlas ri kita tuwi kadi wruha nghulun

a asumubng: A asumĕ.
b atwang: H ang; inapa: Ĕ angapa.

apan iki yan wruha ngwang i rawat-rawat i manis irârjunân rare
ring apan aseha len kita haturta kalilirana mon têkêng guna
mata waja tan pahī kĕta kabeh juga tiniru nikang swalakṣana
hana panahangku masku ri kitânaka nira ta warah pwa torasi

a -dn rare: ÉF -na rare, H -ârare.

b tâkâng: BH tĕkĕ.
c wajm B wangja; kĕa: Ĕ kita; tiniru: Ĕ inuru.

Ṭranslation, Canto 33 195

'Oh, what is your position and birth, and what is your purpose, young
manī Ṭell me!

fltow did you get here, and what is your name²î Might you be a divine
being³

[This garden is hard to get into, and is also forbidden. What is the limit to

| entryî

Maybe this is just a god or a heavenly musician, the only ones allowed to

i come except the king.'

ĕuch were his ḍuestions to him. Then he told him that he was a sorry
| person,
'Who had come intending to pay homage to Ghaṭotkaca, in the hope of
| his kind sympathy.
Ṭhis is what he said, and the one addressed was moved and respectfully
informed the demon king.
'he he was told, the king was astonished by the extraordinary story
and for this reason he came in haste.
l
lWhen he arrived at the garden, he found him in a pitiful state, a sad
sight.
hie hastened to make a reverential obeisance, and then was uestioned
| about why he had comer
'Young man, what is your reason for camingî It is as if you are suffering
| from some disturbance of mind.
fMy heart is deeply moved with pity for you, and it is also as if I know
â about you. -

Ñor when I look at you and see the traces of the sweetness of Arjuna as a

boy.
Īlow could he ba separate from you² Your likeness might be inherited,
even including the good ualitius.

Érhe eyes and the teeth are no ditfcrent, in fact everything is just a copy
k of his fuatures,

Ño its my guess, my dear, that you must be his son. Ṣo tell me the truth¹'

prthwnala: - - w l w w - l v - -

CANTO 34

-
lwwo lwoa lws

nahan pataña rakṣaseśwara ri sang sĕḍĕnĕ mohita
ndatan sahur apan pijĕr mĕnĕb-ĕnĕb putĕk ning hati
Jurudyah ira têki yâmĕḍarakĕn satingkah ira
umaṇdĕm umusap ri jöng nṛpati mājar opakṣamā

b piîr ö pūĕ. r

d wmusap: F amusap; apakṣama: B apakṣama.

panĕmbah i patik narārya kĕna de narendrânguhâ
sirêki tanayârjuna ndah Abhimanyunamâhalĕp

prakaśita sakêng bibi pwa sira yan Subhadrātmaja
hatur pahulunan tĕkap nira narendra Damodhara

b udak: Bā ndan, C mandṅ, F sang.

tuhuṇ datĕng irân umaṇdĕm umusap ri jöng bhūpati
ri duhkha nira kālapan rara warātmajā Rukmiṇī
nararya Baladewa sāhasa widhayakâmidhyani
mahânuluyakĕn ri Lakṣaṇakumāra sāmpun majöng

c widhâyakî: Ĕ winayaka.
d majöngī F ajĕng.

balik ta Harimarti lāgi pinalar wĕnang masiha

apan hana manah nirângubhayanê swaputrī nira
kunang pwa sira mogha tan hana layat madewāśraya
matangnya siha rakṣaseśwara ng inant rantĕn haji

d siha: Ṭ sira; ng inantî Ŋ hinanti, Ĕ ninanti.

- a a

CANTO 34

Ihese were the demon king¹s ḍuestions ta him, in the midst of
bewilderment,

ĕut he did not answer, as he was absorbed in trying the control his

| depression.

ht was Jurudyah who revealed everything about him -

Prostrating himself at the feet of the king, he said, asking for forgiveness:

our servant respectfully submits that Your Majesty¹s supposition is
k correct.

ĕte is a son of Arjuna, and Abhimanyu is his name, âttingly.

Ñle is famous on his mother's side, as a son of Subhadrā,

Rund is thus related to King Dāmodhara as his nephew.

h fact he comes here to prostrate himself and wipe your feet,
Pecause of his grief that the daughter of Rukmiṇī has been seired and
ḍ taken away.
ḍhe noble Baladewa has cruelly exercised his power and ordered it,
ĕ eliberately arranging an immediate marriage to Lakṣanakumara, and it
Ñ is already agrecd.

Bn the other hand Harimarti was repeatedly asked to be allowed to

' 'favour her,

Bs he was inclined to agree to his daughter's choice.

eowever, it happens that he is not there, but has gone away to seek the
Ṭ gods¹ favour,

—nd so it is your kindness that Your Majesty's younger cousin awaits.


198 Ṭext, Canto 34

5 tuwin mara ḍatĕng nirêriki pakon bhaṭarr Widhi
ya kāraṇa nirân wĕnang gaganamârga bhūtângatĕr
nahan pawarah ing Jurudyah i narārya Bhīmātmaja
nda tandwa sira garjitâmĕkulakĕn saharṣêng ari

a nirârikṅ Ŋ nira riki.

d saharṣâng: A saharṣ².

Ṭranslation, Canto 34

oreover he came here on the orders of the goddess Widhi,
Ŋund this is the reason he was able to travel through the sky, escorted by

Ṭhis is what Jurudyah told the noble Bhīmatmaja,
ho immediately was delighted and embraced his younger cousin with
ioy.


CANTO 3ö

sasantatiaka: - - - l - w w l w - w l w – w l *

ḍa bhāgya māsku kita tan sipi garjitangku
ndâringku kapwa kita mār hṛdayangku harṣa
nityângrĕngö ngwang i guṇanta kasangkya ring rāt
mangke tĕkanta ri kakanta kadî pangipyan

haywâsumâlara ri kaprihatinta masku

tan sangśayâku wĕkasanya sakewĕhanya
yadyan hanêng amaraloka katön ku petĕn
kahinya ring kṣititala pwa ya tâlpawastu
a -lara: F -laha.

c hanêng: C hanê; amaraloka: B arnbaraloka.
d tâlpa- Ctalya-.

têkwan pwa buddhi Baladewa katon halenya
twangtê sirân atuha tang humawör gĕlĕngta
nahan matangnya n aku tâmalapa ng suputrī

yadyan si Lakṣaṇakumāra kĕnoh ya mātya

b humauwĕr; C humawĕ.
d si: A ni.

nantĕn siwil ngwang ari mangkata haywa tâgyā
ngwang motusâmiḍĕngĕrê tĕka ning wiwāha
tântuk tarêng gṛha wulat pwa ri kāsyasihku
nghing panggihĕnta kĕtĕr ing hrdayangku n onĕng

mangkata: D mangkat.

-miḍêngerê: B -miḍĕngĕngê.

4ântuk: F kantuk; tarâng: Ĕḍl ta ring; ri F ring.
on²ng: Ĕ onang.

a. ṅ a –

CANTO 3ō

Oh, you are welcome, my dear, l am extremely happy,

or you are my younger brother my heart is ñlled with joy.
have always heard about your virtues, famous in the world.
ow you have come to see your elder brother, it's like a dream!

Don¹t be too dejected, worrying about your troubles, my dear.

ithout doubt I will put an end to them, no matter what the difficulties
are.

Éven if what you want is in the abode of the immortals, I will fetch it!
ow much more so on the face of the earth - it will be a paltry matter!

oreover Baladewa¹s idea is plainly improper.

ĕtis your respect for him as an elder that has restrained your fury.
Ṅhis is the reason that I shall carry off the princess,

And as for that Lakṣaṇakumara, it would be right for him to die.

R ! is being so, it is agreed: I shall set out, Śut we must not be too hasty.
ḍ will send emissaries to listen for news of the coming wedding.

Ño back and stay in the house, and see my pity for you -

Ñhe only thing you will find there is the trembling of my heart in

r longing.

Ṭext, Canto 35

nā ling Ghaṭotkaca manuntun i sang suputra
praptê dalĕm sang Abhimanyu muwah manĕmbah
ndan sang sinĕmbah atulak bapa haywa mangkā
tan reha rakryan i haturkw iki rākṣasāngśa

bhaktinta sampun apagĕh ta tikā hutangku
nahan matangnya sahurĕnkw asih adwitīya
nā ling nirâsĕgĕh asung sĕrĕh ing kajang mrak
len wastra malya pisalin saha bhuṣaṇâbhra

b matangnya: B matanyṅ; asih: Ĕ isih.
c na: D nahan.

ndan wyartha tan hana jugângrahatî suputra

tan strī kabhuktya tuwi tan rasa pāna mātsya

tan tangga-tanggapan alĕh swara ning mṛdangga
tan gnta tan lĕngĕnga ring wanadeśa rāmya

a ndam: A nda.
b kabhuktya: kabhukti.

sangsipta reh nira tigang wĕngi yan hana ngkā
lagîniwö rahina ratri pĕnuh bhinukti

ndan kewala pwa sira tan huningâng pangan prĕm
nghing ywênaka ng lumihatê sang asung larônĕng

b bhinuktṅ Ĕ bhibhukti.
c huningêng: C huningê; prîm: Ṭ mrêm.

mar twas Ghaṭotkaca tumon sira sangśayâlĕk
tan pantarângusapi luh juga wet ning Āśa
nahan matang nira n adandana pangkat asru
tambêñjing ng bala samūha kabeh inajñan

b luk: CīH lĕh.

c u adandana: É Dhanjaya, Ĕ adandan; pangkat: C mangkau, Ĕ umangkat.

d kabeh: H kakeh.

Ṭranslation, Canto 3ā 203

So said Ghaṭotkaca, and led the prince by the hand,

'!And when they had come inside Abhimanyu once more bowed to him,
'But the one to whom he bowed refused, saying, 'Don¹t do that,

1's not what a nobleman should du to the likes of me, of the demon race.

I'Your devotion is ârm, and that is my debr.

For that reason let me repay it with unparalleled affection.'

h So he said, and welcomed him with a gift of betel on a cushion of
peacock feathers,

!As well as rich garments to change into and brightly shining
adornments.

But it was in vain, for there was nothing that took the prince¹s fancy,
â No women to be enjoyed, no âavours of drink or meats,

B No performances, tired of the sound of the mrdangga,

No songs and not even the enchanting beauties of the woods.

ĕ In short for the three nights he was there
] He was constantly entertained day and night with an abundance of
enjoyments,

ḍ But he paid no attention at all to food or sleep -

ḍ The only thing that might please him would be to see the lady who gave
him such pain and longing.

’

R Ghatotkaca was deeply moved ta see him becoming all the more
] dejected,

h Uninterruptedly just wiping his tears because of his despair.

R So this is why he made ready for a swift departure,

h And the next imorning the assembled traops were given their orders.


204

10

11

12

Ṭext, Canta 3ō

têkwan tĕkâng apiḍĕngĕr wruha ring wiwāha

rwang ngwe ta rakwa kawĕkas tuwi kaprakāśa

śrī Koraweśwara ḍatĕng saha mantri mukhya
mering ri Lakṣaṇakumara huwus pralabdha

a apiḍeng²r: B piḍĕngĕ; wiwaha: C wirata, Ĕ wawaha.
b rwang ngwe: B rwângwe.

ndan rakwa rājaduhita bhaya māti duhkha
tan pântarâmayat apatrĕma lot ginĕgwan
wyarthângrĕngö mara sirân hana dewaśabda
tan sangśayâ nira humera tĕkâbhimanyu

e -ngrĕngö: Ĕ -rĕngö.

d nira humera: Ŋ humer, B siran umera.

ndātar hiḍĕp rasa niki n tinahā nirâdwa
yan taṇ ḍatĕng prabhu siwil sira wastu lia
tan lalana ta haji mangkata śīghra-śīghra
sugyan kasepa ri hurip nira tan katĕmwa

b wn:Ĕ tar.

Ṭranslation, Canto ĕō 205

lMoreover, the one sent out to get news about the wedding came back:
*lwo days are leî, it is said, and it has been made known

That the Korawa king with his leading ministers has arrived,
Ṅāscorting Lakṣaṇakumāra, who has already attained his goal.

\They say the princess looks as if she is dying of unhappiness,

|And constantly is about to stab herself, with the dagger always in her
hand.

'In vain has she heard that there was a divine voice,

LṢaying she should have no doubts, and should wait for Abhimanyu to
come.

RShe has paid no heed to this message, suspecting it might be false.
[1f the king does not come, it is agreed she will die for sure.

lLet the king not just take it easy, but set out as swiftly as he can,
|Lest it be too late and you do not find her alive¹


CANTO 3ê

-
-- w -ww- -a-w w w 3ū

No name, as CantoṢ: - - w l w v -

nahan wara-warahnya mangkin awuwuh sru rākṣasapati
byatīta kalalu ng kulĕm nṛpati mangkat eñjing alaris

tĕkê sahana râkṣasângjuru ghinuṣaṇân paḍa tĕkā
pĕnuh gaja rathââśwa sañjata humung gumĕntĕr anguhuh

c uñe ĔF têkêng; -angjuru: Ṭ sang juru, H ajuru.
d anguhuh: F anguwuh.

parĕng wijah arampak anglayang ing ambarâmuhara rĕs
bangun jaladharânghĕmau hudan awangkawa dhwaja mĕlĕk
kilatnya larap ing curik sipi-siping karah kalung agal
gĕlapnya kĕtug ing gubar patĕr ikā mṛrdangga gumĕrĕh

b -nghâma: BF -hĕmu.
c curikṛ B surik.
d pat²ēr; B matĕr.

tuwin prabhu Ghatotkaca mwang ari lālanêng awang-awang
angārwani rathâlalĕh pinayungan mayūra lumarap
Jurudyah iki tan karî sira lanâmawa ng pamucangan
manahnya kadi munggahêng amaraloka yâmĕng-amĕnga

c ng: Ṭ om.

patih nira Sadeha Bāhukawikampa Babhruwikaṭa
paḍânupama rākṣasâtuha widagdha ring kira-kira
paḍâbala salakṣa śakti tuwi tahu têng pabharatan

wĕnang pamati śatru mon rumarahêng Surendrabhawana

a Ṣndeha- BēF Ṣudeha-, C Śudeha altered to Śadeha; Kawikampa: F wikampana.

c têng: F weng.
d rumnrahêng: D rumarahê.

CAN'TO 3ê

ith this information the demon king's haste increased all the more;
assing over the night, the king set out in the morning straight away,
ḍncluding all the demon divisions, who had received orders to come,
eomplete with clephants, chariots, horses and armed men, with
k thunderous shouts.

Érxcitedly they few in serried ranks through the air, inspiring dread;

ey were like a cloud bursting with rain, with as rainbows the swirling
banners,

l'he lightning was the Āashes of the many daggers, the chainmail,
breastplates and neckbands,

e thunderclaps were the clash of cymbals and the thunder was the
rumbling drums.

Also King Ghatotkaca and his young cousin were travelling at their ease
| through the sky,
Ñsharing a handsome chariot and shaded by a parasol of Aashing peacock

É teathers.
Ñlurudyah was not left behind, still carrying the betel-box,
Rând he felt as if he had gone up to the realm of the immortals just to

*have fun.

is chief ministers were Sudeha, Bāhukawikampa and Babhruwikaṭa,
Éēach a demon without compare, senior and skilled in strategy.

#6nd each with ten thousand troops, powertul as well as experienced on
the battletield,

Capable of killing enemies, even if they had to pursue them to the abode

¹ ofSurendra.

Ṭext, Canto 3ê

arok silih usr lumampah arurĕk ring ambaratala

hatur trik asamaha mör alulunan katon awalikan

ndatan hana manungga-nunggala ri wuntat embuh i harĕp
arĕs siwakĕn ing bĕkĕl yadin alona karya lumaku

us¹: Ĕ usir.

aur a-: F mara.

manungga-nunggala ri: F manunggalan kari; enbuh: É ambĕh.
siwakên ing: CD siwaka ning, DH siwakĕn lL.

a m a w

tangeh yan ucapĕn suwe nira lumampah adrĕs akĕḍap
samantara ḍatĕng ri bhūmi Harimarti kongang aparö
hanâlas alĕbâsukĕt pĕtĕng arĕs ri jöng ning acala

ika tang inusir nirâbhawaha ramya panghinĕpana

b ḍatâng: H ḍantĕng ; aparĕ: Cē aparĕk.

c alĕbd-: A alĕbĕ, F alĕk.

d panghinĕpana: panghinĕpan.

sirĕm-sirĕm ing arka meh sumurupân tumunggang acala
samangkana sirân turun saha balâgawe kuwu-rkuwu
saharṣa para rākṣasī nda sama-rkuṇḍang angliga-ligā
têkêng kuda liman sukhâmarĕki toya dinyus iniwĕ

a -ân tumunggang: Ŋ pan manunggang.
e rakṣasī F raksasa; -liga: F -ngliga.

Ṭranslatiou, Cunto 36 209

Marching together and pushing cach other they went in close formation
through the sky,

Like a fock of rice-birds flying in waves, to be seen turning to and fro.

¹ There were none who wanted to be all alone at the rear, and rew more

and more at the front,

Ī Fearful they might be cut off from their supplies - if they were too slow

they might be left behind on the march.

It would take too long to tell about the time they took on their journey -
they were as fast as winking,

And in the meantime had arrived at the land of Harimarti aṅd looked
down oniit from close by:

É There was a broad forest with undergrowth dark and scary at the foot of

the mountain,

' And there they headed to busily make preparations as a place to spend
the night.

| The sun¹s rays began to grow dim and it had almost set, riding on the
mountains,

| And at that moment he came down with his troops and made himself a
camp.

J The demon maidens were delighted and with their companions were

ḍ getting undressed,

ĕ And even the horses and elephants were happy as they came to the
water, were bathed and carefully tended.

cowl–wlw
Jagaddhita: - - - l ww - l w–w l ww - | |

1

CANTO 37

prāpta pwa ng kulĕm ing samantara paḍāmrĕm ika sabala rākṣaseśwḍ

kapwêkĕg pinĕkul ni kuṇḍang ika sowangṣi huwus ing ulah yathāsul

ngka sang nātha yan anggupîng ari marêng pura Haladhara tan hanañ
wruha

cetr Keśadhara tikang amawa pawwahan inucap anindya rākṣasī

a prapia: D papta. '.
b kapuṅkḍg: ö kapwakkĕg.
c yam A tan marêng:ĕCDē marî; ng wruha: Ĕ ng wruhi, Ṭ wruha.

enggal rakwa sirêng hĕnū lĕpas apan sira gaganacarâhawan ratha
prāptêng Dwarawatī katon sahana sang Yadukula pada somya nis
tan tat nggânya sirê sabuddhi Baladewa kunang apan amogha

kemĕngan
kepwan tan wruh ing enak āpĕga ri tan tĕka nira sang anis marêng

wukir
enggal: E menggal.
nismita: D nissmîta.

tan tat: B tan tat, F tan tu.
kepuan: F kweh pan; tan: Ĕ tar; marâng: C marĕ.

a m G –r

wwarg ri jro Baladewarājya ta juṣâmangan anginum anamtam indri
singgih tambay ikang wiwaha paḍa kabhinawa saracananya kādbh
honya ng dyah Kṣiti Sundarī piniduduk ndan inĕnahakĕn ing tamanḍ
lĕngöng – ww
pucchâmbĕk Baladewa hewa ri sirân wihang i luluy irân maling

c ug dyah: dyah; Kṣiti: Ṣit piniduduk. Ĕ pinadhudhuka; ngĕwg: Ĕlangö, Ṭ alĕng. |

CANTO 37

, Ṅight came and before long the whole army of the demon king was
asleep,
î Snoring and each in the arms of their partner after making lave any way
' they liked.

Then the king gave a sign to his young cousin that they should go to
d Haladhara¹s palace without anyone knowing;
The maidservant Keśadhara would be the one to carry the betel-box -
she was said to be a faultless demon maiden.

ĕ They were soon on their way and moved fast as they went through the
R sky ona chario,

p And arriving at Dwarawatī they could see the whole Yadu tribe, eually
calm and unaware.

t Ēvidently they were not in harmony with all Baladewa¹s ideas, or else
they were somehow confused;

Ṅ They were perplexed as to the best thing to do and at a loss at the failure
of the one who had gone secretly into the mountains to arrive.

¹ The people within Baladewa¹s palace were just eating, drinking and
satisfying their senses, j

As indeed it was the eve of the wedding, and all the arrangements were
ḍ eually amaaing and extraordinary.

There was lady Kṣiti Sundarī, who had been through the piḍiduk
ceremony and was placed in a lovely garden;
I Baladewa did not care about her, as he was annayed at her refusal to
i forget all about how she had enjoyed illicit love.


212 Ṭext, Canto 3ĕ7

4 mar angrĕs hati ning tuminghal i sirân gupay angĕlih amādapâlum*
marccâśâlupa ring pangan prĕm anangis juga tĕwĕk ira sāh sakêng
kakung
lampus matya mara ng manah tuwi titir mayat atĕwĕka kadga tan k
sep yan doh hana dewaśabda rinĕngö nira dinulur i panghrĕt ing kaḍ

b tñwṣk: H tuwĕk.
c atâoĕka: H atuwĕk.
d rinĕngw: Ĕ riangö.

5 lwir pakṣâkuhirā ta bhaṣaṇarnirê gyang ira n akuru rakṣa kasyasih |
nā tang glang nupurâlaris munus awaknya mari lagi milĕt ri jöng nin
sĕsran mangkana sah sakêng tangan ikang tali tapih anasar sakêng

tĕngah
anghing lot ataḍah-taḍah sararab ing luh i jaja marĕk ing kalung-kal

a gyarg ira: F gya nira.
b na: B nang.
c ikang: D ira; sakâng: F sakê.

6 tĕkwan makṣa manis nirân liring ikā winuni ni kucup ing saroruha
śrīdantâgigu ring kapan adhara tan minging umalap i raśmi ning we g
bang ning lāṭi ri sinwam ing kayu sĕnö satata kinĕmukan himanipis
anghing panghrĕng ikang madhubrata karî tangis ira saha luh sakênḍ

riris

a kucup: Ērukmucup; nā A rî, DF î.

b minging: Ū mingin; umalapṅ D umalapa.
c kinâmukan: Ĕ kinĕmulan, Ṭ kinamukan.
d harî Ĕ karing, H kari.

7 hinganyân lĕwu tikṣṇa ning prihati tan wĕnang inimur-imur niên lḍ
wyarthâkweh paricârikânita hanân pamaca-maca lumalanê sira
gĕnding strī saha damya-damyan anameni kidung iniring ing taban ḍ

tabang J
tan kewö sararas niki n kadi kinangsyan i lalĕh i pamanggĕl ing c

c tabang-tabang: F tĕbang-tĕbang.
d keuw: B kewa; pamanggñ: AB pamanggĕng, F mamanggĕng.

Ṭranslation, Canto 37 213

ose who saw her so weak and languishing, like a wilted stem, were

deeply moved:

ĕwooning and desperate she neglected to eat or sleep, just weeping ever
since the moment she was parted from her beloved.

he thought she would rather die, and repeatedly was on the point of

stabbing herselî, with the dagger never out of her hand,

ĕput before it was too late she heard a voice from the gods, accompanied

by restraint by her ladies.

Ñt was as if her ornaments felt unable to do their duty by the speed with

I which she grew thin, emaciated and miserable:

ee how the anklets had come straight off her body and ceased to

[ encirde her legs;

ḍhe wristbands had likewise separated from her hands, and her girdle

ḍ had slipped from her waist,

b ut still caught all the teardrops falling on her chest and approaching via
| her necklaces.

Ṅoreover her sweetness had vanished when her glances were concealed
in the buds of the lotus,

ĕrhe śrrdanta was hesitant: how could its lips lacking fragrance seiae the

g radiance of her teeth?

Érhe redness of her lip-rouge in the shoots of the kayu s²nö was constantly
Ĕ veiled by the thin mist,

%And only the humming of the bees was left from her lament and her

Ñ tears from the sok: rain. r

nshon the great sharpness of her sorrow could nat be soothed but grew
, worse,

And in vain the many maidservants played games and some read from

k this and that to amuse her.

Ū2ṅding strī together with rice-whistles sounded in unison with songs
accompanied by the tabang-tabang drum,

ĕĕut all the charm of this went unheeded, as if it was being played to the

| beat of the kdngsi for the lovely leading melody of the curing.

038 CANTO 3ĕ

u.wul| cwwl w

aswaattaw w w |w-w¹cwwlwacwlcwwl

nahan iki reh narendraduhitā tinarka nira sanō hanêng a |Ṣuch was the princess's situation, as conjectured by the ones up in the

karaṇa nirêki kārwa tumurun sakêng ratha marêng sang oruk anangh ay,
sahana nikang atanghi kinĕnan prayoga maturū mateki wĕkasan lhe two of them came down rom the chariot and went to é
sang ahayu len ikang kaka Sudarpanṅ juga dine tan ilw aharipa sadly weeping lady.

They put a magical formula on all those keeping a vigil, and they ñnally
went to sleep -

Only the lovely lady and her lady Ṣudarpaṇa were made not to join

them in feeling drowsy.

4

b marêng: Cēñ marĕ.
c atanghṅ É matanghi

: When he came Abhimanyu thereupon forcefully took her on his lap and

ĕḍ ḍ hastened to wipe her tears, saying:

| ‘Lady, my mistress, little sister! Deep indeed was your grief at being left

behind love-iorn.

¹ Come, put me to death, cut me to bits, anything you like because of your
anger!

Iam aware of my sin - because of the way that I abandoned you while I

went wandering.

si t²ka nirabhimanyu tumuluy waśângisapu sambramângusapi luh
ibu tuhan i nghulun rari lĕwös pwa duhkha niy aringku kāri si

amah aku patyan tbu cacahĕnta mon sakaharĕpta denta ta wuyung
wruh aku ri doṣa ni ngwang i haturkw atinggal i kitê sĕḍĕngkw alar²

a tumuluy: Ṭ tumulwi.

b tuhan: D tuhun; lâaĕs: A lĕwas.

c amah: Ĕ sama; patar: Ŋ patan; saka-: C suka.
d wruhaku: D wruhara.

It was not that I would be scared of King Baladewa even if he should go
to waī,
| Rather that my hostility to his anger might be a cause of sin or wrong
conduct.
It was his curse that I feared, and this is why Imade an appeal for safety:
*Ghaṭotkaca¹s kindness would be my refuge in these circumstances, and
so you should offer him humble respects.

taham ari kakw arĕsa ri sirang narendra Baladewa n apranga tuwi
kunang i parangmukhangkwa ri wuyung nirân alarapāna doṣa wipa
śapatha nirâtikang kawĕdi nâta marma ning apet wilāśaīahayu

sih ira Ghatotkacâta śaraṇângkwa rī gati nihan t anĕmbah i sira

a taham ari kakw arsa: Ĕ taham ari aku arĕsa, F taha marika kwa; n apranga: Ŋ map

b -kwa: -ku.
c npet: ĕ amet.


Ṭext, Canto 3 Ṭranslation, Canto 3 217

Ñ§his is what Abhimanyu said to the pining lady, who was startled,

| trembled, was pugaled and in a trance.

Phe was thinking about the conduct of her beloved, who had arrived
from nowhere unannounced.

Ñor this reason she was overwhelmed and struck dumb, although her
joy displaced her deep dejection -

or the poison of her utter misery, Pārthaputra could be compared to a
ā medicinal plant.

ling ira warâbhimanyu ri sang ogha kagyat akĕtĕr kapūhan alangö
umangĕn-angĕn ri tingkah i kakung nirêki tĕka tan pasangkan inucap
karaṇa nirân jĕngör kahĕnĕngan tuhun girang irângaḍĕh putĕk agĕnḍ
wîṣa paramarthaduhkha nira Parthaputra sira tângkĕn oṣadhilata

a akĕtĕr: B akĕtĕ.
c -ngndân A -ngĕḍĕh, B-ngadih.

Pudarpaṇā replied to him: 'Parthaputra, it is out of this world that you
have come!

Ṅo, it may be a dream, the way it resembles the supernatural, like a god
| kind enough to come down.

Ñĕt is truly fortunate, young man, that you have found the lovely lady still
alive,

Īhe result of holding her fast with difficulty when about to stab herself -
¹ see the weapon in her handl!

rasiki Ṣudarpaṇânahuri Parthaputra tan i rāt karī tĕka tuhan

taha ta kunang pangipyan i haturnya sakṣma kadi dewa maāsih an

tuwi tuhu bhagyamanta marika bapangkw i sang aram kapanggih
ahurip

ulih ing angel gumĕgwan i mayat nirâtĕwĕka honya ng astra ri tanga

.nahuri: F -nawurṭ; kari tâa: È| tĕka ri kita tĕka.
kunêng: A kunang; anurun: *H aturun.
marika: Ĕ marike.

tâw²ka: H tuwĕka; honya: F tonya.

a ṅ Ū w

ook here at her humble obeisance, because of her debt of gratitude at

ḍ being given the boon of her life.

Bhe is trembling weakly from her exhaustion, day and night not
sleeping, just weeping.

ḍt is as if she cannot leave Ghaṭotkaca and wiping his lotus-feet;

*Now that she has met you, my lord, then go ahead and seiae her waist so
Ñ hard that it breaks in two¹

lihatana têki sĕmbah ira wet nirân rĕṇa wineh anugraha hurip
kumĕtĕr asāra-sāra ri gupe nira n rahina râtri tan prĕm anangis
ri sira Ghaṭotkacârasa tan intarâmusapi pâdapangkaja haji

ri ḍatĕng irê tuhanku tumuluy pwa sambutĕn ikang tĕngah tikĕla ya\

b kumĕtr: ñ gumĕtĕr; prām: Ĕ mrĕm.
d irṭ tuhanku: B irĕng tuhankwa.

r

ōhe said, and then Ghaṭotkaca spoke again to Pārthatanaya:

fYoung cousin, go first and rest in my chariot; it will be the vehicle for
you three.

Ṅ myself shall stay behind with my servant, and shall endeavour to

Ñ disguise myself in the form of a princess.

Ā y aîm is to kill that Lakṣaṇakumāra - Let me overpower him in the

Ñ bridal chamber¹'

nahan ika lingnya yêkan awuwus Ūhaṭotkaca muwah ri Parthatanayḍ
ari ta rĕhĕn ta reng rĕrĕb ikang rathêku hawananta kanyu katiga
nghulun iki kārya kārwa kawulâmrihânamar arūpa rājaduhita
umĕjahane si Lakṣaṇakumara donku parilĕnkwa ring pawarangan

b rahan ta reng: Ĕ rĕhĕn ta ring, Ṭ rĕngĕm aneng; hawananta: E wawanta, H wawananḍṭ
kanyu: Ĕ kanya.

-ânamarṛ Ĕ anamawa.

d umĕjahanê Ĕ umĕjahanang; parilânkuu: B parilĕngkwas ring: A rī.

Iṛ]


CANTO 3Ṣ CANTO 39

-

Mrawonmata: - - - l ww - l w wlww-lwcwlwws

fīhus spoke King Ghaṭotkaca, sending Parthaputra homewards;

'He did not object to these orders and had already mounted the chariot.
IHe carried lady Kṣiti Sundarī on his lap and Sudarpaṇā bore the betel-

k boy;

lin short when they had set off through the sky they were already well on
their way.

1 na ling nātha Ghaṭotkacângutus i Pārthaputra muliha
ndatan langghana sang kinon tĕlas anumpak ing ratha sira
mangkw i dyah Kṣiti Sundarī tuwi Sudarpaṇâmawa sĕrĕh
sangsiptan ri lĕpas nirân gaganamārga sampun alaris

c mangkw ii Emangkin; ṣiti Ṭ Śiti; tuwi: Ñ tutuwi.
d âpas: D lapas; nirân: D nirâng-, CF nira.

a śrrBhrmatmaja têki lalana karîng taman piniḍuḍuk
sakṣat dyah Kṣiti Sundarī ndan iki māri mūrccita dahat
cetr Keśadhara tikâniru Sudarpaṇân tĕlas areh
sakweh ning wwang atanghi tan hana sumangśayê gati nira

The illustrious Bhtmâtmaja now relaxed, left behind in the garden where
p the piduḍuk ceremony had been held;

gHe was evidently Kṣiti Sundarī, but ceased swooning so much.

Ṭ The maidservant Keśadhara imitated Sudarpaṇâ and was ready and
waiting;

a latana: A kalana; kartng: A karî, H kari. j
All the people woke up, and no one suspected what they were doing.

b kKṣiti F ōiti.
d sumangśayê: Ĕ n anangśayê.

3 manggĕh tan luputêki Lakṣaṇakumāra mātya niyata
yan tan wwantĕna masihâwarah akon prayatna ii sira
ndan tingkahnya hanêki rakṣasa hulun kaparcaya nira
tan len putra nikang Baka pwa ya si Bajradanta subhaga

It was sure that Lakṣaṇakumara would not escape and would certainly
|die,
ḍ Ifit were not for someone fond of him who informed him and told him
f to be alert.
É The way it happened was that there wasaa demon, a trusted servant of
F his,
Who was none other than a son of Baka, the well-known ĕajradanta.

a matya: B marya.
d pwa: Ckapwa.

4 wwantĕn têki hulun Ghaṭotkaca kadangnya māsih iri ya
wruh rī duhkha nikang tuhan hala nika tinonya katahā
sākṣātnya n rumĕngö ri sārathi Ghaṭotkacêrikang ulah
nāhan marma niki n marâmĕng-amĕngan tĕkâwara-warah

Now there was a servant of Ghaṭotkaca¹s who was a fond relative of his,
Who know about his lord¹s trouble and suspected that something bad

f# might happen to him.

| Evidently he had heard from Ghaṭotkaca¹s charioteer what was going
g on, .
And this is thê reason he went off on a casual visit and came to tell him
about it.

b rṅĕ ring, H ri.
c -êrikang: C -a rikang.
d -âmâng-amĕngan: BCDē amĕngĕ-mĕngĕn.


a20 Ṭext, Canto 39

5 yângde yatna ri buddhi Lakṣaṇakumĕra tan raga-ragan
pinrih gopita de nirâwarah i jöng nirang Kurupati
enak ta pwa hiḍĕp Suyodhana bangun huwus wruh alawas
nganîki n katahân tulus matêmu yâmangun guyu mrā

b nirang: É nikang.

6 tan strratna juga pwa sādhya yadi siddha bhagya kĕtikā
yan tan siddha jayārtha labḍha ri kadonan ing Yadukula
hetunyân wĕki sañjatâtri gumuruh tĕkêng gaja ratha
samantanṛpa kapwa yatna pininang ḍatĕng saha bala

a kawka: Ṭ natika.

7 mangke pwa n hana duṣṭaśabda rinĕngö nira sphutatara
tan kagyat-gyat ikang manah naya rahasya kapwa winulik
nahan marma ni Bajradanta kinayuh nirân winisikan
yan yâmātyana ring Ghaṭotkaca makāwakê nṛpasuta
b tan: Ĕ taṛ winulik: Ĕ winalik.

c nirân: Clrân.
d -matyana: H -matyani

8 ndatan langghana Bajradanta kawaśâhiḍĕp minanisan f
mwang sĕnghitnya ri Bhtmasena n umatî bapanya kagĕgö
sāmpun têkang alapkĕnâpituwi nora len wruh ing uiah
apan ng wwang wawahan ri sakṣma ning upaya lāgi wiphala

c têkaug: Ṭ teking.

TṬranslation, Canto 39

This made Lakṣaṇakumāra cautious and not in too much of a hurry,
| And while striving for secrecy he informed Kurupati.

ĕ Suyodhana was guite relaxed about it, as if he had known for a long
time:

h Formerly he had suspected this, and now that he found it was true, that
j made him smile.

It was not just a jewel of a woman that was his object - if successful that
would be lucky,

b But if he did not succeed, then victory would be a gain from attacking
R the Yadu tribe.

3 And so the armed men were all prcsent, shouting loudly, including
kelephants and chariots,

R And as a precaution he had invited the vassal kings to come with their
troops.

ḍ Now, however, there was an evil portent he heard, loud and clear,
h ĕut it did not shock him - he scarched for secret strategies.
f For this reason he took Bajradanta aside and whispered to him,

Telling him he should kill Ghaṭotkaca by taking on the body of the
Ī prince.

Ñ Bajradanta had no objection; he was won over and felt he was being
¹ donea favour,

¹ And he held firmly to his anger toward ĕhīmasena, who had killed his
¹father.

k The plan was in place and moreover there was no one else who knew
¹ about what was being done,

¹ For if people divulge the secrets of a scheme then usually it comes to
ā nothing.


r

222 Ṭext, Canto 39

9 sangsiptan rahina pwa Lakṣaṇakumāra gambanṣ ĕpsĕ |
sakweh ning bala mantrī mukhya mangiring ri yângātērakĕn
nora wruh tuhu sang nṛpâtmaja jugêki panghiḍĕp ikā
tuwy ānungganēi rĕngg² ning liman awās alĕp ĕurapati

10 gēṇḍing gharmita ring lĕbuh ri sĕḍĕng ing tekeng pawarangan
byatitan wînarang ta rakwa paḍa gambang aṇjâ n apupul
sakweh sang dwija śaiwa Sogata maśānti rāmya karĕngö
ndan wyarthêriya tulya gīta uĕkap ing tuli ndin aphala

e Śaṅun Cā sewa.
d udan: Ĕ nda; tuli ndin aphala: D tulin winiphala.

11 ring sore pwan umunggah ing grha tan asru rehnya kinasut
lungha nis tumahā ring eranga yadin lanângawaraṇa
ngkân sang nātha Ghatotkacârirang, i Bajradanta n añuluh
têkwan yâgigu sangśayanya sira tuhwa rājaduhitâ
a grhm Ŋ graha.

b ais: AĕH ni, D ning.
c ugkâu: ĔF ngka; -rirang: F -miring; añuluh: Ŋ anyuluh.

d sira: A nira, Ĕsirê.

12 wahw angol ya rikâ Ghaṭtotkaca malĕs rumangkul iri ya f
yângkĕn pātyana śrghra yâkrala bangun mahâwugah agöng
kagyat Bhīmasutâpa tan tuhu Suyodhanātmaja katon
sakṣat rakṣasa Bajradanta tiki hah musuhku ta karih

a rikx: Ĕ rikan.

Ṭranslation, Canto 39 223

ân short, it was day and Lakṣaṇakumĕāra set out in state,

And all the troops and leading ministers went with him as an escort.
lo one knew, and imagined that this was the real prince,

lAnd he was even riding on the back of an elephant, plainly as fine as
Surapati.

ÑGamelan orchestras sounded loudly in the public suare while they
were arriving at the place for the marriage-ceremony;
e pass over how they were married, of course eḍually stately when
|gathered there.
All the Śaiwa and Sogata priests were chanting prayers for peace and
j prosperity, a cheerful sound,
ĕĕut they were useless for that, like a song for the deaf - how could they
have any efîect²

ĕlt was evening when thay went up into the bower, but ware not in a

k hurry for an intimate encounter:
ĕThey went away and disappeared, thinking how embarrassing it would
be if they kept on abstructing.
Ṭhen King Ghatṭotkaca felt uncomfortable about Bajradanta when he
| started fondling,
RWhile he too was hesitant, wondering whether this could be a real
f princess.

Considering he might be killed he ḍuickly decided to resist and took on
R a huge form.
Bhīmasuta was startled, for it was not the real Suyodhanâtmaja he could


224

13

14

15

16

Ṭext, Canto 39

nahan ling nira garjitânarima mangdêdĕlnya n anĕpak
tandwâprĕp sira lot arangkit arukĕt silih kawil irun
rodrân moha silih culik mata silih tĕkĕk silih arun
mangkin krūra silih gulung bĕtah atêmpuh anrĕng atarung

a mangdâdânya: BR pangdêaĕlnya, C pang- changed to mangr--
b arangkit: Caringkiṭ arukĕt F amukĕt.
c taka: F tĕkuk;arum: B aran, ŊF arug, C arun changed to arug.

gĕnggöngĕn wĕkasan hanan kadi gunung matangkĕp apagut
rimpĕk tang grha kedĕkan ri parukĕt nirân silih ust Ñ
kagyat sang mamarang paḍâwrĕg alayū kawös giri-girin
pakṣângilya sarājya tanṣ saBaladewa pūh kakĕtĕran

a matangkṭp: B matangkip.
b nirdn: Ĕnira; usī: Ĕ usir.
d tang saĕaladewa: D ning Haladhareki.

tambis tan hana kapwa śara wihikan ri reh sang apĕluk
yan tan mātya si Bajradanta kasikĕp jinĕmbak nira
sumbar-sumbar irang Ghaṭotkaca sirâdhikâra puruṣa
wangke ning kalanâbubat kahabalang dinūkakĕn ira

a kapua: BDF tapwa, C tapwa changed to kapwa; apñuk: É amĕluk.

b jinâmbak uirm A Jinambak nira, Ŋ jinambakĕn ira, Ĕ jinsmbakên ira, î tinambakan

sanyasâpranga buddhi ning bala humung paḍâgarawalan
lunghângambara Bhīmasūnu saha cetikânglĕngit adoh
wadwa śrr nṛpa Koraweśwara jugâta mangkin alayū
mungsî pangrĕrĕbanya śīghra mawarah ri Hāstinapati

b -nglagit: Ĕ n lêngit Ṭ lĕngit.

d mungst: Ū mungsir, ngungsiṅ pangrârâbanya: BE parārĕbanya, F pangrĕrĕpanya, Hj

parĕrĕbanya.

Ṭranslation, Canto 39 225

He said, and delightedly took him on, giving him a kick and a slap,

Then immediately they started fighting, constantly locked in close
combat, tearing at each¹s nose;

They were ferce as they blindly poked each other in the eye, throttled
each other and grappled each other -

Wilder and wilder they rolled each other over, tirelessly clashing,

forcefully colliding.

They got completely carried away and finally were like mountains
closing and meeting;

The building was smashed, trampled in their close combat as they
pursued each other.

The wedding guests were startled and in panic ran away, stricken with
fear,

The whole palace was intent on fleeing and all of Baladewa¹s men were

powerless and seiaed with trembling.

Practically none of the heroes would have known what was happening
to the two locked in embrace,

If Bajradanta had not been killed - when he seiaed him he hurled him

down,
Ghatotkaca¹s boasts were that he was the supreme warrior,

And the corpse of the demon was torn apart, hurled away and thrown
straight at them.

t

Ṭo all appearances the army was in the mood to make war, shouting and

milling about restlessly,

l But Bhrmasunu had gone up into the sky with the maidservant and had

vanished in the distance.

: The Korawa king¹s army just ran away all the more,
¹ And sought their night guarters, then swiftly went to tell Hastinapati.

226

17

18

19

20

Ṭext, Canto ĕṢ

kagyat sang rṛpatî warahnya tumuluy murub galak ira
anggyakĕn bala mangkat angluruganê watĕk Yadukala
pĕngpöngĕn taya sang narendra Harimarti cidra ning ulah
syaha ng Dwârawatī pwa haywana mĕne kĕnohnya n ucapĕn

a murub: Bmurung.

b auggyakēn: B agyakĕn.

c narendra: C nrîpa, changed to narendra.
d syaha: Bsyuhĕn.

t²śkwan śrī Baladewa motusan i tan manah nira ng ikâ
kewalyâmbĕk ikang Ghatotkaca jugâwamāna kuhaka
rowang tândĕl irang narendra Baladewa de Kurupati
ndan manggĕh tiki kaladeśa ning anīrṇa śatru hilanga
a nira ng ikâ: D nira ikā.

b kuhaka: D kuwaka.

d ndan: Ĕ nan; manggîh: B manggĕ.

tandwânghruk anguhuh tikang bala n umangkat asru lumurug
gĕṇḍing gharṇita len gubar kakĕrĕtug hatur gĕlap ahöm

grit ning syandana panghrik ing kuda liman paḍângrĕgung awū
sakṣāt sāgara rob gumĕntĕr i panĕmpuh i ryak ing alun

a anguhuh: A anguwuh; -dnghruk: Aē -ângruk, angrĕk.
b kakrr&ug: Ĕ kakurutug, ñ kakarĕtug.
d panâmpuh ii Ŋā panĕmpuh ing: ingalun: D angalun.

munggah ring ratha Koraweśwara sahâstra tikṣṇa lumarap
mwang wwangsanak irângdulur paḍa matunggalan ratha maṇik
lwir Ganggâ humilrtinūt ni laku ning balâtrî gumuruh
samantanṛpa gharṇitânglĕwihi guntur anghibĕki rāt

a Koraweśwara: A Korawaśwara.

d samantanṛpa: Ĕ samantang nṛpa; anghibēîi: Aĕ angibĕki.

Ṭranslation, Canto 39 227

Ñḍ TṬThe king was shocked at what they told him and thereupon his fury

Āared;

He gave orders to the troops to make haste to set out and attack the
Yadu tribe;

He would take advantage of the absence of King Harimarti to take them
by surprise,

ḍ And when Dwarawatī had been destroyed the rightness-of it could later

¹ be approwved if it were to be discussed.

ĕ Moreover even if Baladewa should send a message that he did not

l concur with this,

It would only be the character of Ghaṭotkaca that was disrespectful and
false.

King Baladewa was a firm ally toward Kurupati,

¹ SṢo surely this was a good opportunity to destroy the enemy and wipe
him away.

p Immediately the army roared and shouted when setting out and rushing
to the attack,

l The gamelan orchestras resounded and the gongs boomed like massed
thunderclaps,

The sueaking of chariots, neighing of horses and elephants trumpeting
loudly

ḍ Were like the ocean at full tide, thundering with the clash of the

billowing waves.

Ŋ¹ Koraweêwara mounted his chariot with his fashing sharp weapons,

É With his relatives accompanying him, each with his own jeweled chariot.
| They were like the Ganggā flowing, followed by the marching troops

-¹ with a thunderous noise, -

l And the vassal kings were boisterous, exceeding a mountain torrent,
filling the world.


i

Ṭext, Canto 39

21 nistanyân wĕngi māwa deni larap ing karah kalung agal

nahan marma nikâlaris lumaku śīghra tan kahawaraṅ
prāptêng Dwārawatr pwa mañjing i dalĕm kuṭâmarĕpĕki
lumrârampak anunwa ng grha tĕkângidĕk wwang aturū

b kahawaran: É kahawĕran.
c prdptêng: C prāptê.
d anumwana ng: Ṭ anunwani,

kagyat sang Yaduwangśa kepwan ajagâmuih aprang asĕkung
meh tan kewwa pĕnuh ning astra panulak riyân pamurulū¹
hetunyân wahu manḍĕg alwang i harĕp rĕbah katalayah
sinrĕng lagi winak rinangkik asĕsör mangunduri rupĕk

c wnhu: Ṭ waha.
d sinrâng: ÉD sinrang, Ṭ pinrang: rupaî: Ṭ rupit.

tĕkwan wahu ḍatĕng Ghaṭotkaca hañar n inundang atulung
lumrâwra waragang nirângamah-amah sakêng awang-rawang
mundur tang bala Korawângusir i sang tuhanya n apupul
yatnâdandan atingkahârĕp apagĕh wĕdinya rusaka

a haṅar n inundang: BCŪF (h)añar hinundang.

b lumrâ-: A kumra.
d -drḍ Ĕ arpat, H arĕpa; apngâṅ: A apĕg²h: rusaka: Ĕ rusak.

Ṭranslation, Canto 39 229

Éven though it was night, it was bright because of the gleam of the many
breastplates and collars,

And so this is why they went straight on, swiftly and without
obstruction.

Arriving in Dwarawatī they went inside the fort and attacked at close
guarters,

Ṣpreading out in great numbers to set ñre to the dwellings and go and
trample the sleepers.

The Yadu tribe were taken by surprise and bewildered; on guard they
tried to ūight with all their might,

And could almost not care about the full number of weapons for
warding them off as they mounted a wild attack.

or this reason they had just stood up, suffering losses in front, falling
scattered everywhere,

Pressed again and again, attacked furiously, driven into a corner and
hard pressed, they withdrew in the direction of the narrows.

Moreover Ghaṭotkaca had just arrived, having recently been called to
assist,

And his champions spread far and wide, uttering challenging yells from
the sky.

The Korawa army withdrew and sought their chiefs to gather,

And cautiously prepared to take up positions in order to stand firm out

of fear of being battered.


CANTO 40

-
- Ñ
owuluwuwl aw – l

kangwgan: - w - | w – w | ww - |

1 rahina hyang arka bangun ahyuni kawḍḍara ning prang adbhuta
mijil ing tĕgal Yadukulâkrama saha bala kośa wāhana
tuwi sang Ghatotkaca hanêng wuri pamuputa pagwanêng laga
Abhimanyu tan sah i sirê ratha kumĕmit i rājaputrikā

s

a ning: A ni.
c hanêng: CD hanê; pumuputla: AD mamuputa.
d sirk BDā sirêng, Ṭ sirang; râjaputrikâ: Ĕ rasuptrka.

2 sirang Ugrasena Basudewa ratu matuha tanggwan ing naya
Kṛtadharma Satyaki sang Uddhawa patih adhikāra ring guṇa
wwaya len sakê sira tangeh yan ajarakĕna kapwa śaktiman
pada sök pĕnuh gaja rathâśwa paḍṅ titir akīrti ring raṇa

a naya: Ŋbhaya.
c sak²: Ĕ sakêng; ajarakêna: D ujarakĕna.
d paḍa titir: paḍati dhira; akrrti: Ĕ akitti.

a maliha ng wuwus tucapa Korawaśata muwah waūbañ
katêĕngah Suyodhana rinākṣa nikang ari paḍa yatna tan ka
nguniweh ta Lakṣaṇakumāra marĕk i haji sök balângasut
pinĕtik paḍa wwang agunâkawula paḍa pênuh karah kalung

a maliha: E malaha; śata: Ṭ -natha.
d kwwula: A kawule.

CANTO 40

f It was day and the holy Sun seemed desirous of revealing the terrible

f battle,

f And the Yadu tribe came out onto the field in due order with men,

J baggage and vehicles.

| Ghaṭotkaca was also there at the rear in order to complete the firm line
of the battle,

and Abhimanyu was not far from him in the chariot, keeping watch
î over the princess.

| Ugrasena and Basudewa were the senior kings and a firm foundation for
] policy,

â And Kṛtadharma, Satyaki and prime minister uddhawa were the
Ñ foremost in good ualities;
ā There were others apart from them, too many to mention, all powerful,
[ And each had large numbers of elephants, chariots and horses and had
repeatedly acuitted themselves honourably in battle.

J To change the subject let us speak of the hundred Korawa again, firmly
established in due order:

¹ Placed in the centre, Suyodhana was guarded by his younger brothers,
k eually alert and not far away.

| In particular Lakṣaṇakumāra came respectfully before the king, his
l troops in overwhelming numbaers,

| Selected, all men with special ualities, with servants eually endowed
with breastplates and collars.


Ṭext, Canto 40

Bhagadatta Mālawa Jayadratha panihung irânghapit gĕlar
analangkupê sĕḍĕnga ning kawaśa sĕlswĕgĕn sakêharĕp
tuwi mangkanê wuri pirang ratu huwus arĕpat paḍânghaḍa
kadi sāgarâgni mara sañjata nira makukus dhwajâpagut

a Malawa: F mayawa.

b sakā: EŌ sakêng.

c mangkanê: A mangkanâ, Ĕ mangkanêng; wurî f uri; -nghada: ĔF -adang.
d marm Ĕ wara; makukus: Ĕ n akukus.

a

tĕlas akrĕp inggita ning angdani gĕlar akĕkĕh tunêng bhaya
kadi parwatâgĕgĕr asĕngkan aparangan alasnya durgama

ri dalĕmnya singha saha barwang amacan asĕlur paḍânggĕlur
ndah awas ikā kahiḍĕpanya ri pasalĕsĕk ing balânguhuh

akrâp: D krĕp; ning: F ni; akâkḍh: F apagh.

-gegar: Ṭ nggĕg²r; aparangan: F apangaran.

amaaan; C mangan, changed to masan.

ndah: Ĕ ndan; awds: B awwas.

a n e6 mw

tuwi nora ta pwa tinaha katakuta nira Hāstineśwara

ya ta kering ing hati sanista ning anĕngah i bhami ning musuh
¹i hatur narendra Baladewa hana pisaninga parangmukha
yadi rodhakâna Harimūrti tuwi bhaya witadyan apranga

a ta:Ū kapwa.
c pisaningḍ: B pisaningun.
d witadyan: F witanyan.

rinasan katuhwan apĕgâmbĕk ira Haladharârdha kemĕngan
yadin aprangânglawana ring Yadukula ring apêki n enaka

nṛpa Hastineśwara kunĕng tulakĕn ika lawan watĕk Yadu
awirang ri bhagna sang arṅm warangĕn i hana sang Ghaṭotkaca

b ring: ri.
c kunĕng: A kunang, F ya kunĕng.

Ṭranslatīian, Canto 407 233

Bhagadatta, Malawa and Jayadratha formed his 'fangs¹ and fanked the
battle-array,

In order to enclose it if it should be overcome and pushed back from the
front.

And likewire at the rear any number of kings were drawn up and

standing ready;

Their weapons were like a sea of fire, with as smoke the banners

cdashing together.

Ṭhere were already freṇuent signs of preparing a firm battle-line, lacking
any danggers,

Like a mountain with ridges, gullies, crags and thick forests;

Within it lions with bears and tigers uninterruptedly snarled -

This was clearly the idea formed by the tightly packed ranks of shouting
troops.

¹ Ṭhere was nothing that one could imagine might frighten the king of

Hastina,

¹ That he had set aside, even though he was going into the midst of enemy

. territory.

Given the fact that Baladewa was there, he could not possibly be hostile,
And even if Harimarti should hinder him, why worry if he should make
war! !

| Realiaing the facts of the matter Haladhara was at a loss and very

embarrassed:

It he should make war and oppuse the Yadu tribe, what good would that
do²

King Hastineśwara on the other hand should be repelled together with
the Yadus,

As he was ashaṇed at the abortive attempt to marry off the lady due to
the presence 'of Ghatotkaca.


Ṭext, Canto 40

athawa Ghaṭotkaca kunang harĕpakĕna ri madhya ning raṇa
asamaha len Yadukulânggĕh i sakasukha-duhkha tā pwa ya f
paḍa kapwa kering ira ta pwa wĕkasan amangun manah mangö
angadĕg jugângangĕn-angĕn saha bala lĕngĕng epu ring gati

b sakasukha: Ū ira sasuka.
c ta pwa: D kapwa, Ĕ ta rwa.
d jugâ- Ciaga.

Ñ
h
ā

Paauaaaar–

Ṭ'ranslation, Canto 4ṇ 235

Or else Ghaṭotkaca should be confronted in the midst of the battlefield,

Assembled with the Yadu tribe - this was the proper basis for all
pleasure and displeasure.

These things he put aside and finally gave himself up to musing,

Just standing there and thinking things over with the troops, bemused as

to what to do.


CANTO 41 CANTO 41

śarauawiwwa: - - - ¹ w w l w-w lww-l-awlacawls

We pass over how Baladewṅ was perplexed as to what to do and kept
his distance in the midst of his confusīom

He took no notice of how the Yadu tribe was furiously overwhelming
the enemy.

The battle was in full swing, locked in close combat and embracing,
neither wishing to retreat,

Suffering losses by the thousand or by the ten thousand, their corpses
unheeded.

1 byautan Baladewa kepwan ing ulah mangdoh sĕḍĕng mohita
tan kewö tĕkap ing watĕk Yadukulângrampak musuh sāhasa
enak tang prang arok marangkit apĕluk norâharĕp mundura
kapwâlwang sakasewu lakṣa ta kunĕng wangkenya tan kombara

b keww: F kewĕh.
d kunâng: Aē kunang; kombara: B tambara.

| The troops were skilled at seeking out their match, and bearing down on
each other they made a thunderous noise.

See, the ones in chariots clashed with chariots, and when riding
! elephants with elephants,
Not to mention the ones on horseback who clashed in close combat, all
on horses,
| Slashed and being slashed, charging and being charged, trampling each
other, never thinking of the dead.

2 wruhnyâmet sawawanya tang bala silih tab ghūrṇitâgĕnturan
nda honya ng marathâpagut paḍa ratha n munggwing liman mwanṭḍ
liman
astām tang mahawan kudârurĕk awor kapwanya munggwing kudḍṭ
amrang pinrang amuk winnk silih idĕk sing māti norênucap

c kapwanya: B kapwinyai munggwing: CF mungging.
d amrang: B mamrang; idâū: Ĕ adĕ; sing mdti: B si mata, Ṭ sama ta.

Then the Korawa men were beaten, having just been swept away, fallen
and scattered, terrified;

. Their battle-line was broken, they werṣ fearful and carried away, and all

the kings were in disorder.

¹ They would almost have been totally wiped out if the Korawa king had

not gone back to the rescue,

¹ Fiercely attacking with the whole group, followed by a recovery of the

routed, who resisted once more.

3 ndan sor wāhu katūb rĕbah katalayah trasa wwang ing Korawa
rampak byaha nirâwri kelu kalulun sakweh watĕk bhūpati
tambis bhrasta larut ya tan lumabuha śrī Hāstinendrâpulih
rodrâmak sabatĕk tinut i waluy ing kabwang manganggul muwah

a ndan: Ĕ nda; katab: B katnṭ; katalayak: ñ kasulayah; trasa: A trāda, ñ trĕsa.


238

Ṭext, Canto 41

Bhīṣma Droṇa Jayadratha Krpa tĕkêng Bhariśrawânimbangi
Karṇâlĕmbana len Alĕmbuṣa tumūt mwang śarasenângdulur
kapwânglud i śarastra śakti gumĕrĕh sakṣāt hudan sāyaka

wah rah tang raṇamadhya rob amalabar sangkêng śawâmarwata

b Karyâ-: A kirṇa; -ngdulurī É -dulur.

c sarastra: A śastra; sakṣak: A om.

d wah rah: Ŋ tang rahi sangkângī Ṭ sangkĕ.
&Ṅ

tan wring de Yuduwangśa de ni sahab ing matangga lāwanratha
ngkân kewran n umurud ri tan katulak ing hra mangkin embuh pĕnuî
nahan hetu ning awrĕg awri malayū norângucap maṇḍĕga

kabwang tan pamalar hurip luyuk arĕs mĕnggah kangelan kawĕs

tan: Ĕ tar.

!
a
b ngkîn: É ngka; ing: Ĕ anĕ. h
c ning: H nirâ-. l
d kabuarg tan: F kabwatan. ṭ

ngka sang nātha Ghaṭotkacângdĕmak arampak mwang watĕk rākṣasś
lwir meghân sumahab sakêng tawang añandak śatru tan pāwĕran |
sing kolih kinĕmahnya lot ininuman rah mangkin angde wĕrö

twabnyâsrak gĕrĕhanya n anghudanakĕn tĕṇḍas tangan len pupa

b meghan: F megha.
d anghudanakn: F angudanakĕn.

enak yan ya jugêki rakwa lawanĕn de ning tumĕnghâpranga

mwang sakweha nikânghudan-hudani ring kontā lawan tomara
moghân tandang irâbhimanyu manĕḍak tan panggalĕng twās amak Ñ
tan jrih lot kinasut bangun rawi tĕngah ngwe nâng musuh lwir limut

c manaḍak: A manĕḍĕk, * manĕhak; tan: Ĕ tar. ,

Ṭranslation, Canto 41 239

Bhrṣma, Droṇa, Jayadratha and Kṛpa as well as Bhriśrawa supported

them,

lAnd Karṇa, Alĕmbana and Alĕmbuñṣa joined in with the army of heroes

accompanying them.

Ṭhey all rushed forward with powerful weapons, thundering like a rain
of arrows,

And the battlefield was a flood of blood, spilling from the corpses, piled

as high as a mountain.

Ṭhe Yadu tribe did not know what to do because of the overwhelming
numbers of elephants and chariots,

And then they were in trouble and withdrew, unable to ward off the
arrows that fell in ever increasing numbers.

This is why they fell into disorder and fed, without any thought of

stopping,

Śwept away, without expecting tu live, giving up, scared, panting, worn

out and stricken with fear.

Then King Ghaṭotkaca swooped in a throng with the host of demons,
Like a cloud engulfing them from the sky they seired the enemy
unimpeded;

The ones they caught they chewed, constantly drinking blood that made
them all the more intoxicated,

And their belches were as loud as the thunderclaps, as they rained down
heads, hands and thighs.

They could just do this as much as they liked, as of course they had to be
opposed by those looking up in order to fight,

\ And no matter how many there were they rained down spears and
lances on them.

Ṭhen it came about that Abhimanyu advanced, charging in with
indomitable spirit,

Without fear and constantly covered like the sun at midday, and thus
the enemies were like the mist.


240

10

11

Ṭext, Canto 41

têkwan tan papahî kaśaktin ira lawan śakti Dāmodara
yadyan sagara bahni parwata kunĕng sing sañjatâ ring rana
sampun kagraha de nirângaji tĕkâng mantranya sakṣmê hati
anghing cakra Sudarśanêki tinĕngĕt de Padmanābhaprabhu

a tan papahî. A tan pamalt, Ŋ tan papatî, Ĕ tar papahing.
b kunĕng: A kunang, Ĕ nunang.

c tākêng: CāF tĕkêi sakṣmê: Ŋ sakṣmêng, F sukṣmayati.

d -neki: Ĕ -eka.

mangke pwâlĕkas aprang ing kapana tang śatru n wĕnang dharaka
towi pwa n abangun muwah Yadukulângrampak maluy sahasa
anggrĕk ring ratha len gajā sumarasah rodrângidĕk ring kuda

harṣân ton Abhimanyu kātara hatur Kalāntakângiṇḍarāt

a kapana: B kupana.
b towi: F towin.

c anggrak: F angrĕk.
d -ḍarat: A -dĕrat.

salwir ning panah ādbhutâbhinawa tang hrū de nirânūb musuh
kong bayw adulur agni kong asura sök kong parwatângae takut
syah bhraṣṭa ng bala peka denya malayū samanta norâpulih
kabwang bĕntar amet parāna kapĕgan tan wring dayâng enaka

-nawa: A nama; -nâb: Ĕ -nung.

a n o w
ā Ṭ
ñÑ
[g]

teutar: ? pdōar; kapâgan: Ṭ pĕgat tang: dnyâ-: C changed to deyâ-.

îuran de ni pamak Ghatotkaca sakêng meghânusuny ādbhuta
arângrok angasut lanângramĕs anūt ndātan paweh manḍĕga
tan koli n linawan sakê ruhur i sor kepwan jugâng apranēa

a lan: Ĕ tar.

c lanâ-: Ṭ lara.
d kolṅ A kuli.

ang wruh nṛpa Koraweśwara sumanghara ng lĕkas tan wĕnanṭ

Ṭranslation, Canto 41 241

ḍ Moreover there was no ditference in his power from that of Ŋāmodhara,

Whether an ocean of fire or a mountain, anything might be a weapon in
battle.

î He had already grasped how to recite the scriptures including their

mantras hidden deep in his heart,

b And it was only the discus Sudarśĕana that King Padmanābha kept secret
to himself.

b Now he went ahead with the fight - how would the enemy be able to
f stand against him²

k And the Yadu tribe also arose again, attacking fiercely en masse once
f more,

| Pushing forward in chariots and on elephants, spreading everywhere,
R wildly trampling with horses,

É Delighted to see Abhimanyu, frightful as Kalantaka, the God of Death,
f descending to earth.

î Évery kind of amaing arrow and extraordinary shaft he used to assail
l theenemyr

k āither a wind accompanied by fire or a flock of aḍura or a fearful
E-mountain.

f The foot soldiers were crushed and destroye
ran away without coming back,

k Ṣwept away and broken, looking for sgafewhere to go, exhausted, and

with no idea what to do for the hasî.
Undoubtedly the -ar– this but was unable to curb what

was happening,

| Frustrated by Ghaṭotkaca¹s assault from the clouds in amazing shower
after shower,

Attacking furiously, overwhelming them, constantly stirring them and
pursuing them, giving them no chance to stand,

R There was no mistaking that when combatted from above the ones

l below wuresîmply at their wits¹ end as to how to ñght.

y them, and the vassals


242

12

13

Ṭext, Canto 41

wyarthêki n hana rākṣasâdbhuta muwah pangdāha Duryodhana
kĕmbar sök bala kośa wāhana ngaranyâlĕmbanâlĕmbūṣa ¹

trasân meh pĕjah aprang ing gagana sak wadwanya norânghawĕr
simbantĕn tulunga pwa wangkay i hulunyânglad ḍawuhnyê sira

b ngaranyâ-: BCF gahanyā-.
c -nghawĕr: -ghĕwĕr, E awĕr.
d wangkuy ii D denika.

sangsarânglalu hĕntya mātya sabatĕk sakweh nirang Korawa
yan tan māsiha Ṅaradâpituturêng heyopadeyâhayu

ḍa Duryodhana toh usir Haladharânghing ta pwa yogyâśrayā
prih dentâsĕkungâtalangkup aparĕk pangher i wuntat ira

a -llu: É dayu; nirang: D nikang.

b -tuturêng: Ĕ tuturê; keyo- A heno-.

c tok A totṭtypoīk yogyâ³ Ā yośya-.

d aparâ: A apapak, C parĕk changed to papak; paugher: Ĕ sangher.

Ṭranslation, Canto âl 243

| It was useless that there were more terrible demons who served

Duryodhana as leaders,

Twins with plenty of troops, baggage and vehicles, by the names of
Alĕmbana and Alĕmbuṣa.

Trembling as they were almost killed fighting in the sky, their army
scattered without defending themselves -

Let alone helping, their bodies heat down on his head when they fell on
him.

He was distressed and resigned himself to the idea that all the Korawas
would be wiped out,

1f Narada had not taken pity on him, and gave good advice on what was
to be avoided and what was to be doner

*Oh Duryodhana, go and seek out lḍaladhara, as he is the only proper
refuge for you.

Make every effort to put your hands together in respect for him, and
wait on him close by at his rear¹


CANTO 42

-
-- w w- Ñ&

asuautta ww w ¹ w-wlcwwlwcwlcwwlws-s

1 nahan iki ling mahārṣi karĕngö sakêng tawang awās tikâmṛtamayā

Dwijawara Bhṣma Karṇa Śakuni pwa tan hana wihang humaywani nḍ

ujar ḍ
tuwi Kurunatha kagraha tĕkap Ghatotkaca sĕḍĕng rinangkul apĕluk
luput arusit ri laghawa nirân widagdha sinikĕp lumumpat alayū

a tikâ-: F thika.
b tan: Ĕitar.

2 paḍa mangusîluput linalu sing pĕjah gati nikang Suyodhanabala
atakis amet upāya pangîwung nikâmilih awan marapwan ahurip
sahana nikang turung kasikĕp awrĕg awri malayū marê Haladhara
kadi lari ning pĕtĕng midĕr aliṇḍungan gunung i tambwang ing

śaśadhara

mangusī: EF mangusir.
atakis: Ĕrl anakis.

marś: EF marêng.
pat²ng: F mĕta; tambwaug: D wijil.

a ṅ ū

3 irika Suyodhanâmarĕki jöng narendra Baladewa mojar aharis

prabhu mapa tā kĕnoh karika reha ni nghulun umātyana ng Yadukul

ri haturipun wĕnang humalangṭî nareśwara n aweha rajaduhitā
taha mara doṣa de haji ri denta tan wawarĕngö nghulun juga kaduk

c humalangî Ĕ humalang ing.
d taha: F tapa; wwwarēnyö: ĕCH wawarĕngēh.

CANT 42

I Such were the words of the great sage that were heard from the sky, so
clear they consisted of nectar;

f Dwijawara, Blṛṣma, Karṇa and Śakuni, none of them demurred but

approved of what he said.

Also Kurunatha was seiaed by Ghaṭotkaca, and was just being held in an

embrace,

h But escaped with difficulty thanks to his agility, as he was skillful when

held, leapt up and ran away.

Suyodhana¹s army's action was to find a way to escape, ignoring the

dead,

ḍ Looking for a means of warding off the raging attack, choosing a way in

order to stay alive.

§ All those not yet seiaed fled in disarray and ran to Haladhara,
R Like the Āight of the darkness circling to find shelter in the mountains

from the light of the full moon.

k Then Suyodhana respectfully came before the feet of King Baladewa and

said softly:

'Your Majesty, how could it not be the rjght thing for me to do, to kill off

the Yadu tribeî

] In view of the fact that they have dared to block Your Majesty, when you

were going to give the princess,

'Is it not a sin toward youî If you do not concern yourself with me it is

just too bad.


Ṭext, Canto 42

ndan ing apa ta nghulun datĕnga hundangĕn prabhu yadiṇ
wruhêrikang ulah Ṭé
pijĕr ahiḍĕp juga ngwanĕ i kasajjanan haji n inastuting tribhuwana |
tuwi kita n angdadak kuhaka durta ring kapana sang narendra wā ar
kunĕng iki toh mapêki ta kunĕng nimitta ni patik tan amrih ataña
aa kasajjanan: A kasajñanan, D kasajanar; inastuting: F inastawa rînḍ

a

b

c kuhakai D kuwaka; durta: Ĕ durta.

d kunang (1*): ADF kunangṣ wapêki: F mapa tika; kunêng (2*): AE kunang.

nahan ika ling Suyodhana ri sanṣ narendra Baladewa kepwan aputĕk
haji mangupakṣamākĕna sirê kahīnan ira n epu tan wring usirĕn
irika hatur ni potusan irê watĕk Yadun aminta tan pih²rana
amĕjahanê Suyodhana kunĕng narendra Baladewa mamrih atulak

b -kâns F -kĕnai; tam: Ĕ tar; usirât: BFH ulaha.
d kunĕng: A kkunang.

anaku kita ng watĕk Yadu Ghatotkacâku bapa tolihĕnta sakarĕng
ri hilanga sang Suyodhana mawĕs jugâku n apahasan ing tribhuwanḍ
lita ta kunang manĕmwa hala toh paran wĕnanga ni nghulun

humĕnĕnga -
luwara juga pwa kenaka niking lagâhajênga yuktya-yuktya ning ula

a kita ng: D kita.

b mauṅs: Ĕn awaṅ.

c haln Ĕ bala; humĕnângaī A humĕnangā-

d tuuara: putusa; niking: nikiru hajanga: F angājt yuktyayukṭya: H yuktya.

nahan ika ling nirang Haladharâsayut ī Yaduwangśa tan pamahiḍ² ¹
mawuyunṣ i sang Suyodhana ri denya sāhasa tan ering anghala-hala
karaṇa nika ng Ghaṭotkacabalângrubung Yadubalabhimanyu lum
amarawaśâng Suyodhanabalâta kahyun ika tan pananggĕl i haji

b mawuyung: Ĕ awuyung; ering: F erang; anghala-hala: BR ala-ala.

c -ngrubung: BR -rubung.

Ṭranslation, Canto 42 247

But how could I possibly come or be called by Your Majesty if Iknew
what to da²

Iwas merely mind*ul of your wisdom, as praised by the three worlds.

And as for your suddenly becoming false or deceitful - how could Your
Majesty ever do that²

In view of this, come, what passible reason could l have not to seek to
put a guestionī¹

Ṭhese wure the words addressed by Suyodhana to King Baladewa,
perplexed and dejected.

The king asked forgiveness from him for his miserable state, being
worried and not knowing what to do.

In view of his message to the Yadus asking them not to impede him,

| Or even to kill Suyodhana, King Baladewa strove to evade him:

My sons, the Yadus and Ghaṭotkaca, listen to me for a moment.

1f Suyodhana were done away with, clearly I would just be ridiculed by
the whole world.

You yourselves would encounter trouble - come, how could I sit idly
by²

But it would be best just to break up this fight - it would be right to do
whatever might be fitting and proper.¹

Ṭhis is what Haladhara said to restrain the Yadus, but they took no

notice;

Ṭhey were furious with Suyodhana, at the way he recklessly had no
respect and kept seeking to injure them.

For this reason Ghaṭotkaca¹s forces surrounded him and the Yadu forces
and Abhimanyu went on the offensive,

Wishing to overpower Suyodhana¹s forces, undeterred by the king.

a irika n atanggal uddhata galak narendra Baladewa tinghal arĕnga

anudingi ring watĕk Yadu Ghaṭotkacênuhut irâtighora n âwuwus
| adha apa ko kabehmu lalu sampayêry aku manahmu māna kuhaka
hilangakĕnangkwa ko d wulati langgalangku ri tangan pĕjahmu ni
| a uddhata: F abdata.

b ring: C rū -êauhut: ñ -a nuhut, Ĕ -uhutar; awuwus: D amuwus.

c mana: B manah.
d walati B walaṭj ri: F ring.

9 wacana nirang narendra Balaḍewa kātara n umuṇda langgala nira
pinutĕr irâdbhutâmijilakĕn gĕlap haliwawar ng halisyus amusus
tuwi mĕtu bhata rakṣasa pĕnuh sakêry āngin-anginya bahni kumutug
rṣi gana Ṅaradâdi hana ring nabhastala kawös dumoh ababaran

b -akĕn: Ṭ -akan.

10 syapa kari śatru wānya mulatê sirê sĕḍĕng irân triwikrama huwus
mawugah agöng lwir āngibĕkana ng nabhastala rumampaka ng
tribhuwana
gumĕrĕh ikang prahāra kumupak sakê tutuk irân mĕhah mangĕbusa
gajapati singha barwang i guha nikângrĕpa kawös kagöm alingĕngĕn

a wanya: Bwanw; irân: Ĕiira.

b mmuugah: CF mahugah; -ângibĕanu: ñ antakangibĕk; rumampaka: rumumpaka, F
rumampaki.

sakê: Ĕ sakêng; mangâbusan: F mangabusan.

d alingĕngên: ĔF aklingĕn.

f

j And when he turned it, amaaingly it produced thunderclaps, a
| There also emerged devils and demons in plenty from its gusts and

hṬhe troop of sages led by NṄarada present in the sky were frightened,

â What enemy would dare to look upon him while he was in his

Ṭranslation, Canto 42 249

Then King Baladewa¹s wrath arose and was stirred and he looked in
anger,

Pointing at the Yadus and Ghaṭotkaca, he forbad them with very terrible

words:

*Rie, how vould you all be so contemptuous of meî You are arrogant and

deceitful.

h Iwill get rid of you - look at my ploughshare in my hand - your death is

plain¹

f These were King Baladewa¹s words, frightfully brandishing his

plnughshare,
whirlwind and swirling sḍualls;
blazing fres -

withdrew and scattered.

triwikrama formî

] He became enormously big, as if to fill the sky and to overwhelm the

three worlds.

The gusts thundered and crackled from his mouth as he sighed and

panted,

And the great elephants, lions and bears in their caves cowered, feartul

and stunned.


Jagaaahiu: - - - l ww - lww lww-lwwwlwwwla-wn-lws

1

CANTO 43

-

kala śrr Baladewa gutgutĕn agöng kagirigiri sĕḍĕng triwikrama

lindn ng bhami rubuh tang adri katawa wway ing udadhi gumĕṅîĕr |

ombakan

sang siddhârṣi manungsung ing gagana gharnita majaya-jayâsawur

sĕkar 3

mogha haywa barang wirodha haji sugya kahawa bubara ng jagattray

a agöng: F agĕ.
b katawa: D katawung.
d magha: B magha, C magha, Ŋ marggha, Ṭ manga: barang: Ṭ nirang.

nahan ling nira sis katuhwan ing apa n hana huripa nirang watĕk Yad
yan tan prāpta sira ng narendra Harimarti mĕkulakĕn i jöng nareśwaṭḍ
ngoni n śīghra sakâng wukir kapalaya n winarah ira mahārṣi Nārada

ndah mangke n tĕka sādarângharih-harih kaka nira ring ujar manoha

a uirang: D nikang.
d wdah: Ĕ nda.

dū sĕmbah ni patikta nātha huningan pwa panĕḍa niy arinta torasi
hyuntê patya nikang watĕk Yadu śarīra haji mara gatinya tan waneh
doṣânamtami bhangga ning pahulunan tuhu paḍa lalunĕnta ng enaka

āpan yan dawanĕn tuwin syapa ta lena sĕmanga ni tuwuhnya yogyan

a panḍḍa nṅ A panḍan; torasi: Ṭ torasih.
c -ta ng: Ĕ| tan.

CANTO 43

At the time when Baladewa was clenching his teeth in anger and was
frightfully big while in his trṅuikrama form,

The earth guaked, the mountains collapsed, and the waters of the sea
were scooped up and surged thunderously.

The siddhas and sages greeted this in the sky with loud cries of *Victory,
victory! and scattered flowers:

May the kings¹ guarrel be settled, atherwise the whole world will be
involved and break up.'

Such were their words. How lucky, for aw would the Yadus have
survived,

If King Harimarti had not arrived and embraced the feet of the king²

He had hurried swiftly back from the mountain when informed by the
great sage Nārada,

And so now that he had come he respectfully tried to soothe his elder
brother with charming words:

*Oh, the humble obeisance of Your Majesty's servant - heed the sincere
reuest of yuur younger brother:

| Your desire to kill the Yadus is a personal matter of yours, nothing else.
| Their sins in yielding to the reckless conduct of your nephew should

truly be ignored, that would be best,
For it would go on too long, and furthermore who else will be concerned
about the kind of upbringing that would be proper for himî


252

Ṭext, Canto 43

nantĕn ring kapana nghulun wihanga sāmbĕka haji ri pakarma put:
tĕkwan yukti marêki Lakṣaṇakumara lituhayu gulakṣaṇânulus
ndan herên warahĕn ta kenak i patikta tĕwasa ning asewakê kita
milwânghiwĕ sakāya-kāya hiḍdĕp i nghulun umiringi kārya sang prabñ

c ndan: Ĕ ndah; aseuukō asewakêng.
d -nghṅw* Aē -ngiwĕ, D -ngiwa.

ndan mangke tĕḍarĕn ri tan wiranga ni ngwang awĕdi katĕkāna
duryaśa
lawan śrr nṛpa Koraweśwara wawang tan umiringi ri reha ni nghulun
apan yan patitūtana ngwang ing ulah tan apagĕh i kayuktyan ing gat
awas kerang-irang matangnya.palakun juga luwara ni buddhi bhapaṭ

a wirangm D waranga, F wihangṅ; katâkana: | katĕkan i.
c -ana nguang ing ulak: D raning ulaha.
d kerang-irng: keranganirana; bhapati:C nrêpati changed to bhopati.

ling śrī Kṛṣṇa mawaodhana ri Baladewa tuwi tĕka ri Hāstineśwara

ndah sampun kahiḍĕp rasanya paramārtha ri kapana wĕnanga
langghana

nāhan marma Suyodhanâmuhun umantuka saha pariwāra tan kara

tan wruh rakwa ri tan pakona Harimarti ri Haladhara nā sahur nira

a tâka: R atṣ; riṅ F ring.

c parṅwra BCH parihara, Ṭ paricara; kara: ĔDF kari.

d tan:Ĕtar.

dātan wāni kĕdö ri sāhasa nirân rĕhĕnana tĕkap ing watĕk Yadu
syaha ng Dwārawatīkatön ira salah sêĕmu uira tika yogya dūṣaṇan
yângde gyā ri sirân mulih dalihan ing wĕdi saha bala suksĕkâwirang
sapĕn ring masayut lĕpas kadi maling kawĕnangan ing apa n tan eraḍñ
b daṣaṇan: F duṣanĕn.

c nri Ĕ ni; wirang: Ṭ yan wiring.
d sapên ring masayut: F rĕsĕp rimpasayut.

Ṭranslation, Canto ṭ3 253

Hence how could I possibly oppose whatever you may have in mind
regarding the princess¹s marriage²?

Moreover this Lakṣaṇakumara is suitable - handsome, with good
ualities and accomplished.

But it would have been better to wait and inform me, so that it could
have been a result of serving you -

My idea is to join in caring tor you with all my strength, and be involved
in Your Majesty's affairs.

Well, what I now reḍuest is that ¹ should not be embarrassed or afraid of
incurring ill fame,

And King Koraweśwara not be involved in whatever my business might
be.

For if I follow unthinkingly in what I do, or am not firm in whatis a
proper course of action,

It is plainly shameful, and for this reason I am simply asking you to let

.go of it in your mind.¹

So said Kṛṣṇa in order to set Baladewa¹s mind at rest, even including
Hastineśwara,

And whun they had realired that this was for the very best, how could
they.possibly oppose it²

5o this was why Suyodhana took leave to return home with his
followers unobtrusively,

Not knowing of course that Harimarti would not tell Haladhara to
answer in this way.

He did not dare to persist with his aggression if the Yadus were going to
beat him to it -

TṬhe destruction of Owārawatī was what he wanted, and it was proper to
blame his deceptive appearance.

This made him hurry home on the pretext of being afraid and the troops
downcast and ashamed,

Concerned that someone would hold him back from getting away like a
thief caught in the act - why would he not be embarrassed²

254

10

11

Ṭext, Canto 43

rĕp somyâta muwah narendra Baladewa sukha ri tĕka nātha Keśawa
tan tamtam nira ring hade sahur irê sira karaṇa nirân pamrdhana

mangke n mārya pininta sĕnghit ira harṣaja manah ira marma garjita
wwe pinrang juga duhkha ning kadi sirâguṇa ring apan anirwa duṛj

b tamtam: C tam; nira: É mira.
c arya: R maryya.

yêkan śrghra marĕk watĕk Yadu Ghaṭotkaca lawan Abhimanyu sādara
yatnânĕmbah acāmanê lamah i jöng nṛpati muwah i nātha Keśawa
mojar śrī Baladewa bhāgya bapa tan waluyana ta hade nikung gati
bhraṣṭa ng śāsana yadyapin tĕhĕra tamtamana palalunĕn matêkihĕn

c nikung: ö kung, Ĕ ninung.

nahan ling nira mār anîsi ri sang anghyang i siha nira mārya göng g

apan yâmwangi duhkhabahni kinabehan apuhara luput winarṇana

mangke n prāpta Janardanâmahayu kapwa pinaḍĕm inajum sinîim

nahan karaṇa ning padâhĕli sukha ng lara kadi siniram ring āmṛta

a mar awsi: E marma, F maraniṅ; anghyangī Aē ahyang; sika: Csaha changed to siha,
saha.

c iuajum: anajum.

têkwan wehĕn anĕmwa labha mara sang kṛtayaśa winanîng ranangḍ

nyāma ng gañjaran embuh ang dĕmak anūta guṇa nira n amuktya
kakryanan

saṇḍang-saṇḍangan ing prawīra saha singhĕl akalung akarah pwa

humwata
na jrih lagi kapengin epw ing ulahâpuhara tan awirang lanângabuk

b embuh: embĕh; ang dânak: adĕmak; auūta: ñ anat; n amuktya: HH mamuktya.
c saṇḍang-saṇḍangan ing: sasaṇḍangan ing; singhīī: Ṭ singgĕl; humuwata: E n umwata.
d uajrit: sang ârī kapengit: AC kapenghin, F kawehan; epw ing: F epwang; awirarḍ:

wirang.

Translation, Canto 43 255

All of a sudden King Baladewa was calm again and happy that King
Keśawa had arrived.

It was not his tolerance of his wrong answer to him that was his reason
for suppressing his anger.

Now that he was being asked to cease his anger, he felt happy. deeply
moved and elated -

Just like 'water chopped¹ is the unhappiness of a virtuous man such as
he, so how could he possibly emulate an evildoerî

Then the Yadus, Ghaṭotkaca and Abhimanyu guickly came before him
with due respect,

And attentively kissed thc dust at the feet of the king and King Keśawa.

Baladewa said: 'Welcome, my boys. Ŋo not go back to your bad ways.

When the moral laws have been broken, even if it continues, this should
be tolerated and disregarded.¹

So he said, gently calming those who were begging for his kindness and
hoping that his great anger would subside,

For kindling the fires of anger when done all together has results that
defy description.

Now that Janārdana had come to repair matters, they were extinguished,
composed and put away,

And this is why happiness took the place of pain, as if sprinkled with the
water of life.

Moreover those who have acḍuired mgrit for being valiant in battle
should be allowed to obtain the proñt;

See how the rewards increase: the gifts will be in accordance with their
virtues and they will enjoy a noble status.

The attire of a warrior together with a singhĕl with a neckband and a
collar will be promoted to a higher level -

Such is the fear and at the same time longing, bewildered as to what to
do, leading to being unashamed and always boasting.


cu|walw
No name, as Cantoṣ: w - - | w w - | |

CANTO 44

cu| w w

i ĕn paḍâparimita
tangeh gati para prawīra n ucap
bra arka wĕkasan mangulwan angadĕg rinē adriśikhara
bangun bĕsur aninghali prang atibhrṣaṇâdbhuta dahat
matang nirân akon umantuka ri sang huwus kṛtayaśa

c aninghali:D aninghal ing.

mulih ta Baladewa sahya n iniring têkap Yadukula
angarwani rathâlalĕh mwang ari lalanângucap-ucap
byatna sira ring hawan ndah utapĕn ta sang mabuhaya

prapañca ri kĕtĕr nikang hṛdaya mār paranti rumaras

b angaruanii © mangarwani.
c ndah: Ĕda.
a parantṅ AB paranting, F pranti.

katuhwan aparan tatan kĕtĕra ning priyâsih alaki
tuminghal i hatur parĕnya paḍa ghūraitâkrak anangis
ri duhkha niki n angrĕngö ri pati ning sĕnĕng karahatn
duda midĕr amet ri wangkay î jalunya ring raṇasabhṅ

a tatan: tan.
d dudm: ĕāF dudu ng, C dudu ng changed to dudĕ.

hanâlupa ri ken iki n lukar angun-nguñ agyang ahuyang
anangga wĕhang angligânglih angure gîluns kasamakat
mangö n lumiring inē lawang rĕngĕ-rĕngöṅ lananaha2 ā
alalnya mulatêng sĕnĕng mwang i wĕdinya kājara pĕj

a angun-ngun: A angunguṅ.
b -ugtih: ñ ngliga.

É It would take too long to tell about the warriors, eually incomparable -
Ī The holy Sun nally sank in the west and stood upon the mountain
peaks,

|As if tired of watching the frightful battle, very extraordinary,

' And so it ordered those who had won fame to return home.

Baladewa returned home, constantly attended by the Yadus,

Ñ Sharing a lovely chariot with his younger brother and hawing a relaxed
conversation together.

We pass over them on the way; let us speak of those who were smitten
with love,

Disturbed at the trembling of their hearts, moved and a prey to their
emotions.

Indeed how would a wife who loved her husband not tremble,

Seeing how their neighbours were crying out loudly and wailing,

At their grief on hearing of the death of their defeated loved one,

While others went around searching for the body of their man on the
battleñeld.

x

Some forgot that their dress had come loose, stunned, hurrying, restless,

Resting their chins on their hands, half-dressed, with loosened hair
hanging carelessly,

Musing while glancing at the door, listening for his voice, always
wondering,

And îālled with longing to see their loved one, or in fear of beīng told of

his death.

Ṭext, Canto ṭ4

5 hanâhyas angamĕr patah saha sĕkar minging rinacana €

asiñjang abĕbĕd pupus kadali lalanâwida hangĕt
rwa rakwa tanaganya tan padadakan yan ilwa pĕaha f
sabhagya ḍatĕng ing sĕnĕng sukha n amuktya raśmi ning apôöm

b lalana: Alĕnan.
c tanaganya: Ṭ tabhaganya.
d sablagyn: D sabhagyam ing: Ŋi

lawan tang akire prabhakti turidân tĕka ng jalu jömah
halis hinarĕngan rikang kṣaṇa mabañwa luh pamapaga
tuwin pasilihĕn smitâmanis arūm kĕtĕr ning ajurit
ikang hṛdaya jtwa-jîwana karâsikan lĕngĕrana

b hinarîngan: D hirĕngang; rikang: BC* rika.
d karasikau A karâsika.

waneh wruh i kaśaran ing sĕnĕng adoh gatinya pĕiaha

tuhun pwa katahā lanā kawĕdi sugyan oliha hañang

lĕwös marika sihnya ngūni rasa tan paninggalakĕna

kunang pwa ng awanĕh kasah ri datĕng ing hañar-hañar aram

c laoĕs: Alĕwas, Ṭ lĕwĕs.
d auanah: E awaneh; kasah: Ĕ kasih.

tangeh yan ucapĕn gatinya tĕka sang narendra wĕkasan
ikang bala mulih sinungsung i kakungnya rāmya salulu
narārya Harimarti mañjing î dal²m kaḍatwan alaris
tuwin sira warâbhimanyu katĕhĕr lawan sang araras

Ṭ'ranslution, Canto 44 259

Some were getting dressed and carefully adjusting their head-band, with
sweet-smclling flowers arranged in it,

Wearing a dress with a girdle in 'banana-bud¹ style, and at their ease
applying a warming make-up.

There were of course two reasons for their hesitation and not to rush in
and join them in dying,

And luckily when their husband came they could happily enjoy the
delights of lovemaking,

And those who had been counting on his devoted love when their man
came,

With eyebrows blackened with charcoal at that moment would have
tears as water for greeting him,

And they would take a sweet smile to replace the trembling of the
warrior,

TṬhe heart to be brought back to life, to be carried away with the delights
of love.

Ūthers understood about their husband¹s valour and how he would be
far from dying,
But even so had their suspicions and were always worried that he might
. have got a woman captive.
His affection before had been great, as if he could not leave her behind,
But he became accustomed to being separated with the arrival of a
lovely newcomer.
It would be too much to tell about what they did; the King finally
arrived,
And the troops returned home, greeted by their loved ones, happily
united in love.
ṬThe noble Harimarti went straight into the inner palace,
And the worthy Abhimanyu was brought straight in with the charming
lady.


260 Ṭext, Canto 44

9 hĕlêm ta sira rakwa yan wijila was misan pwa warangĕn
ndan anti ni tĕkā nirang nṛpati pañca-Pānḍawa jĕmah
| apan sumĕmu meh nirân ḍatĕnga sāmpun ing sinamaya
pilih matiki tan palekana tuwîki kâla ng usirĕn
| a wjia: D mijili misar: F pisan.
d wmatikṅ D matêki.

10 awās mara katinghalan sukha ni buddhi ning sanagara
makadi parameśwarī paramaharṣa gaṇjita sira
tâlas kalalu rena Pârthasuta mār hinundang anangis
lanâmĕkulakĕn ri putra nira mârbangun hiḍĕp ira

b sira: A nira.
c mar: Ŋmah, H mā.
d marbangun: H mĕbangun.

têka ng wĕngi tangeh matêki n ucapĕn sang amrĕm i dalĕm
tĕkê prawaraputra len sang ahajöng sapolah ing akang
lalu ng diwasa tingkah ing rahina rātri tan wacakĕna
Ūhaṭotkaca mulih tĕlas pinaripoṣitâsama-sama

1

-

b tâkê DF tĕkêng, Ĕtĕka; len sang: Blsanga.
c talu ng dṅwsa: Ṭlalu dewasa.

ṬTranslation, Canto 44 261

Only later would they come out, and would certainly be married,

But this would have to await the arrival of the Rive Paṇḍawa kings later
on,

As it seemed likely that they were on the point of coming, having
fulfilled the appointed time;

Apparently this would not be postponed, and this was the time to be
aimed at. .

The happiness of the whole country was clear to see,
And in the first place the gueen was supremely delighted.

Subseguently Pārthasuta¹s mother was deeply moved when invited to
come and wept,

| And kept hugging her son, feeling he had been brought back to life.

Night came and it would be too much to tell about them sleeping in the
palace,

Indluding the prince and the beautiful lady, according to the doings of
lovers.

Time passed and the passage of night and day need not be spoken o¹;
Ghaṭotkaca returned home, having been treated with unparalleled care
and attention.


CANTO 45

souamargana: w w w | w- w l cww lwcwlwwwlwwclw-wlws

1 atha ri mulih GChaṭotkaca Dhanañjayasuta kari ramya len sang araras
asukhassukhan silih sih akule rahina wĕngi tan intar ing pakasutan
ayam-ayaman lulut karika ngūni katĕmu ya tikân tinuhwakĕn ira
ri lawas irâbrata ng turida dāgha nira n alabuhan karāsikan arūm

c katâmu: kakata; tikân: Ĕ| tikang; tinuluwkĕm: F tinutakĕn.
d dagha: Ĕ raga; alabuhan: B labuhan, Ĕ alabuhang.

2 katĕkan i tan wĕnang nira kagiṇḍala saparan ahimya-himyan adulur
alalĕh atuntunan kadi wayang-wayangan iay irân lanâṭika-ṭikan

ndan asĕmu lobha ri hyun ira satmya mapisana śarīra rakwa ng arasĕ

wĕdi nira kociwa n mingaya tan wulata kunang i kāla ning kumĕḍap

d tanm: Ĕ tar; wulntn: A wulatan.

3 lwir akĕmitan taman gati nirân lagi jĕnĕk i latāgrhâsring akule
yan ahuyang adyus ing ranu sakāpti lĕkas ira n aguywarguywan asib
t²las ira mĕntas anghyasi silih hyas iki sira silih tatâsusu-susup
wiphala tikang crĕmin ri sira karwa n angalihi wilāsa ning saturida

taman gati C tamanggati.

ingī H î.

anghyasi silih: C ahyas asilih, Ĕ anghyangsî.
angalihi: A angĕlihi.

a ṅ Ū ö

CANTO 45

Now when Ghaṭotkaca had returned Dhanañjayasuta was left behind,
happy to be with the charming lady,
And they enjoyed themselves in mutual affection making love day and
. night, never leaving the bedroom.
The love they had longed for before they found and now madea reality,
And because they had kept their vow so long, their thirst when breaking
the fast was sweet pleasure.

It went so far that they even could not be separated, like a pair of himi-
himi crabs together,

Gracetully leading each other by the hand, their deportment like
shadowa, they were always so close to each other.

But with a hint of greed in their desire to be one in essence, being of one
body would of course be better,

And their tear was of being disappointed when looking away, or not
seeing at the moment of blinking an eye.

It was as if they were standing guard over the garden, always absorbed
in the bower of creepers and often making lover

If feeling hot they bathed in tha lake, doing it any way they liked and
laughing together, splashing. *

Having come out ot the water they dressed, adorning each other and
arranging the Aowers in each other¹s hair -

Ṭhe mirror was of no use to them both if it shifted the focus of the
pleasures of being in love together.


264 Ṭext, Canto ṭō

4 tĕka ri kabhuktyan ing wiṣaya ṣaḍrasa ṣaha sidhu pâna matsya surasa
rumĕsĕp i nala ning twas ira kārwa saha saragi gīta rāmya karângê
rasana tang alpawastu tuwi mogha rahat angĕnani n kinalihan ira

kimuta n akarwa ng antyasukha tandwa surapada jugêki panghidĕp i

a ing: Bi;saha: Ĕ ha.
b ning: B na.
c tang: Ĕ tan; angênani: angĕnaning.

Ṭranslation, Cantto 45 265

Including the enjoyments of the senses, the six Aavours with rum, drinks
and delicious meats,

Permeated the hearts of the couple, together with the saragi and gay
songs to listen to.

BÉven if trivial matters were to be savoured, somehow they were special
when they shared them,

And how much more when sharing the ultimate happiness, without
doubt they thought this was just like heaven.


CANT 46

waywra- - - ¹ww-lwcwlww-lauwluwwl-w-lwwwl

1 lungha ng kala pirântajinya ta kunĕng tĕka muwah iki duhkha
rajaduhitā
singgih ta pwa paganti ning rahina rātri hala hayu nirantaranya n
adulur
ndan tingkahnya ḍatĕng ni data nira Paṇḍawapati n adhikara ning
wwang atuha
donyângundang i nātha Keśawa Dhanañjayasuta sira mukhya ning
mangiringa
kunĕng: A kunang.
nirantara-: Ĕ ning antara.
niī B ning.
angundang ṅ A angundanga.

a. ṅ o w

2 āpan sāmpun awās ta rakwa pawĕḍar nira ri huwus i hĕnti ning

| sinamaya
| anghing tâng ucapĕn ri tingkaha nikang nagara kakilalan ri Hlāstinapaṭ
¹ yângde lalana pañca-Paṇḍawa n anganti gati hana nirê Wirāṭanagara
| nityâgyā ri tĕka Janardana n amantĕsana kira-kirânung enaka jĕmah

b tdng: ī tan.
d ĕa: Ĕ datĕng ; kira-kirâ: ĔH kira-.

2 ndan nahan mata rakwa ling ning utusan humatur i Ṅarimūrti kalih

apupul f
atyantêng paḍa garjita twas ira karwa karaṇa nira mangkat eñjinga sî
ndan śrī Kṛṣṇa jugâta Langgaladharâmagĕhakĕn ri karākṣan ing

swanagara
nghing sang Wrṣnikulâbhimanyu saha rena nira winidhi milwa samp
atihang
a adan: CH ndah, Ĕ nda; mata: C maha.
b atyantêng: D atyantĕ.
c ndan: Ĕ ndai Langgala- Ŋ yanggala-, Ṭ nanggala-.

CANTO 46

Ṭime passed and after a while unhappiness came again to the princess -

Indeed just as the alternation of day and night, good and evil go
constantly hand in hand.

Mow the manner of this was the arrival of a messenger from the
Paṇḍawa king as the foremost among the elders,

With the intention of inviting King Keśawa to come, and
Dhanañjayasuta was to be the iain one to attend him.

For it was already clear that they would be released after the time agreed
had elapsed,

And the only matter to be discussed was the future arrangement of the
country, which had been temporarily ruled by the king of Hastina.

This put the Five Pāṇḍawas at their ease, while waiting out their time in
the kingdom of Wirāṭa,

Constantly eager for the coming of Janārdana, who would approve the
plans for what would be best for the future.

Such indeed were the words of the emissary, reporting to Harimarti and
his brother;

They were both extremely pleased, and for this reason it was agreed that
they would set out the next morning.

But just the noble Kṛṣṇa would go, and IL.anggaladhara would reinforce
the protection of this own kingdom,

And it was only the Wṛṣṇis and Abhimanyu with his mother who were
instructed to join in and were already standing by.


268

Ṭext, Canto 46

ndan atyanta wihang Dhanañjayasutânghyanṣ i narapati kārya mon
tumutura

de ning nāgata sāha ring nṛpasutā tuwi wahu sukha tan bĕsur silih aslh

sang natha pwa kĕdö bayângḍawuhi śāpa karaṇa nira mohitân

sal - -
a–wngkēm pangkwan ing kalulut osah angisĕk-isĕk epu tan

wring arasā
-nghyang: Ĕ -hyang: tumutura: E tumuta.

b saha ring: Ŋ sang ari.
c w É| n ḍawuhî, F -ngdahuhi;wrokitân salanangis: DēD mohitân sahanangis, 3

mohitan sĕlanangis (see note).
d marcchân: Ṭ mūrccha.

shah masku tuhanku toh yayi mapêki ta kunang ulahangkwa de
narapati

kĕdw – dhyani tata ni ngwang i sirê larisa nira marê Wiraṭanagara

astam kewwana tâku de bapa paran ta wĕnanga ni kakanta sāha ri kita

ndin tan matya kari ng madhubrata yadin pasahakĕna ri gandha ninḍg |
sĕkar arūm

a dhak: ĕ aha, H aha; tuhanku: F tahanku.

c kewuana: BDR kewana, Cē kepwana; uḍnangā nt F wĕnangi.

d yadin: A yadi.

ndan kĕdw āmihangâku mon apuputa nḍ pĕjah n akusu was misan
ngaran iki

tak jrih mātya kunang pwa śapa nira ta pwa kawĕdi pangupadrawanyī²

niyata
nahan tâmuhara prapañca ya matangnya yayî pahalawön manahta

ahaho Ñ

–é– matya rimang akingking ari rumta matiki panangisku sāha ri k

a udan: B yan, Ĕ nda; apuputa: B mapuputṅ; t akusu: B sukha w, Casu, D aku nasu
asuka, FH nasuka.
b tak b tan, C tan changed totak.

pahaho: R pahawo. Ñ ā
a amwit: Emamwit akingking: E makingking: ramta matiki: F tamtama tiki.

[ṛ]

Ṭranslation, Canto 46 269

4 However, Dhanañjayasuta was extremely reluctant, and begged the king
to stay behind or else to follow later,

Because he was concerned about being separated from the princess, had
just found happiness and they had not yet had enough of loving each
other.

But the king insisted and might possibly impose a curse, so for this
reason he was stultified and wept non-stop,

Swooning with his head on his beloved's lap, tossing and turning,
sobbing, not knowing what to do for the best.

*Ah. my treasure, my lady, come, little sister, what should I do with
regard to the kingî

He insists on ordering me to join him, leaving without delay for the
country of Wirāṭa.

Furthermore, even if my father takes good care of me, how could I be
parted from youî

How could the bee not die if it were separated from the perfume of
sweet flowers³

Then let me persist in refusing, and if it should end in death, this is what
they call a sure thing,.

Iam not afraid of dying, but it is his curse that I fear, as its power to
infâlict misfortune is plain.

This is what leads to confusion, and so you should cease worrying and
clear your mind.

I take leave to go and die of lovesickness and longing for you, and this

sweetness of yours is what I weep aver when about to be parted from
you.


-

7 ngke ta dyah ngwang amöngpĕngângarĕkanê kita mawaṛĕgana n

Ṭext, Canto 46

pangola panĕpi
sangwā ni ngwang angöla duhkha lara kingking i kita tukĕlĕnkwa ring
para-paran
yan wwantĕn bhramarâmisik-misikanê kita n ahasa ri rāmya ning tamâ
arūm
mawas yâwarahê patingku mulih ing Śmara mĕgil i manista kĕmbĕng
luh
a -ngarâkanê: Ĕ -arĕkanĕ.

b tukâĕnkuu: Ĕ tukĕlĕngkwa. ¹
d -unrah² ñ -warahêng; mḍgil: Ŋ umĕgil; kāmbeng: Ī kambĕng,

Ṭranslation, Canto śê 271

Now, lady, let me seiae this chance to kiss you and take my fill of
clasping your waist,

To be my survival rations in order to endure the sadness of longing for
you, to be borne wherever I travel.

If there is a bee who whispers to you to go roaming among the charms of
the lovely garden,

Clearly it will tell you of my death, going home to Śmara, taking refuge
in your sweetness that wells up in tears.'


isarii wuuuwlwawlwawlw
wsajia: - w w | - w w l - v w | l

CANTO 47

w

nā panangis nira Pārthatanaya mamuhun ri narendrasutā
marma sahur sang aram mangĕtĕr i hati mār saha luh tan arĕn
mandra samar-samar onĕk amuhara lalî hĕnĕk ing hṛdaya

lot kinalīnga tunêng rasa ri pĕgat i śabda nirân sĕsĕgĕn
mamuhun: Ĕn amuhun.

manga*r. Eḍ angĕtĕr, F ma kĕpar.

on²k: A onĕr; latî D laling.

nirdn: D nira.

a fm cḍ

ling nira hah ring apa ngwang iki kaka n amāḍananâmihanga
sambĕka solaha ning kadi kita sakatöna hade hrĕtana
anghing anganti sihanta n asiha gati ni ngwang asewa lulut
tan hana sihta mapêki ng ulaha niyatânglalu mātya rimang

a kaka: F tĕka.
b sakatâna: ADH sahatuna.
e a: Ĕ ng.

pucchawalî sĕḍĕnganta ta kunĕng amagantakĕnêng araras
haywa jĕnĕk dahatĕn pihĕrana turidanta sĕlāna kidung

tângĕn-angĕn ta larangkw iki kawĕkas angun-ngun angel anangis
yan panginang kita palihi sĕpah i wajanta sawak ngwang akung

a kundng: A kunang.
c iki ka-: F kita; angun-ngun: | angunguṅ, tî angunan.
d sawak: f siwak.

CANTO 47

Such was Parthatanaya¹s lament, taking leave of the princess.

Deeply moved the lovely lady repligd, trembling in her heart, with tears
unceasing,

Faint and indistinct, downhearted, making her forget because of the
oppressed feeling in her heart,

Constantly trying to interpret the lack of meaning, because of the breaks
in his tremulous wordes.

Śhe said: 'How could I, brother, be careless about it or refuse?

Being united in spirit and in action with one such as you in whatever
you desire would be wronṣ to resist.

Only awaiting your affection if you are kindly disposed is my way,
serving you with my love,

But if you have no affection, what can I doî Plainly I will resign myself
to dying of lovesickness.

Regardless of how you might be engaged in exploring charming things,

Do not get too carried away, restrain your longing, intersperse it with a
song.

Remember my pain here, left behind and sad at heart, weary and
weeping. ¹

If you take betel, divide the guid in half with your teeth and call me,
longing for you.

Ṭext, Canto 47

mwang ri sĕḍĕngta mahas-mahas amĕng-amĕngâdulurâmasisi
cumbwa ta sang mangĕnāni turida ri kitânglih asanghulunan
haywa tika sinalah lwa samanah iki tatana rāga lulut
ngwang juga lalwakĕnanta kari tiniḍapucca sadenya pĕah

a saḍēngta: Ṭ sadhĕngta.

c uka kita; sinalah: Ĕ sihala; tatana: C tuhana; râga: Ŋ gara.

a tniḍa- uningda-, Ū tinadha-.

ring parajanma juga ngwanē amalara kasanmata denta jĕmaṅ
denya k angiṣṭya madadyana karas arĕnik wawanĕnta mangö
ramya niki n kisapunta yat angitĕka gīta ya panĕmwana sih
ngkân hilangâku maran malĕs analahasânghĕnĕkîī hṛdaya

b denya k F denyaku; angñtyī: F nistya; uawanânta: B wawanaata.

c nikin: A niki; kisapunta: C isapunîai yat angikāt: B ya ta tĕka gîta ya, H yat angikĕtī.

d maran: É paran; malĕs: B lĕpas; -nghenak Bē hĕnĕk ing, F hĕnĕka.

Ṭranslation, Canto 47 275

And while you are roaming about to amuse yourself with a friend and
going to the seashore,

Be affectionate to the one who subjects you to langing as you lie
languidly on her lap.

Do not blame her, be agregable to whatever she wants, and go along
with her passion and attachment.

You should just ignore me, left behind and neglected - what does it
matter if I die!

Let me just hope that in another incarnation I will find favour with you
later on,

And for this I would like to turn into a well-made writing-tablet for you
to carry while musing.

It would be fun to be held on your lap when you composed a song as a
place where your kindness might be found,

And there I would fade away, so that I could disappoint you in return
and oppress your heart.'


CANTO 48

-

luulwwwlwwwlawalw
Jagaaaatta: - - w | w w - l v - l

1 nahan wacana sang rwa ringrang atangis-tangisan aśapathân tan āsiha
tangeh iki yadin kathakĕna maganti sawĕngi kalĕngĕr silih tulung ñ
wangun rahina nāgatê wuyunga san prabhu karana niralarumĕ
apan sira huwus manumpak ahawan ratha sahaja ya manggalân laku

a tam asiha: Ṭ hanâsiha.

2 pĕnuh sang angiring watĕk Yadukulârĕpat ahalĕp atingkah akrama
paḍâlalĕh anunggang inṣ ratha masañjata saha pariwāra rakska
l²pas laku nirâlangö haliwat ing wana gahana samīpa ning w r
layĕp kalĕngĕnganya yan karacana niyata rahat i buddhi ning kaw

c ing: Ṭi.
d kalĕng²ânganya: Ĕ kalĕngauya.

3 muwah waluyana ng kathā tucapa sang kari kawĕkas akingking ing
sênĕng | |

kalad pwa kĕna śāpa marma nira raṅca rasa pĕjaha marccitânangîs

kunang pinaka mūla ning hala kurang sĕgĕh i tĕka mahārṣi Ṅārada

marânglawad i göng i harṣa nira rakwa ri tulus Abhimanyu len sira
l

a waluyana: F walwihan.

b kalad: ö kadilud.

c kunang: F kunĕng; kurarg: F tura.
d ṅ F ning; nira: A nirê.

CANTO 48

Such were the words of the two, distractedly weeping together and
swearing to love each other. |,

It would take too long to relate how in turns for the whole night they
fainted away and helped each other.

At daybreak it was fear that the king would be angry that caused him to
go straight to join him,

For he had already mounted his chariot, and naturally he would be the
leader of the procession.

The escort was complete, and the Yadus were drawn up in due order,

Éach charmingly riding in a chariut, with armed men as followers and
guards.

They were well on their way, enjoying the scenery as they passed
through thick forest on the edge of the hills -

It was dimly beautiful, and if it were to be described clearly it would
stick in the poet¹s mind.

Let us go back to the story, and tell about the lady left behind, longing
for her husband:

To make matters worsc, she was struck by a curse, and this was the
reason she was so perturbed she felt she would die, fainting away and
weeping.

Indeed the cause of her misfortune was a failure in her reception of the
great sage Narada when he arrived

To pay her a visit, out of his great joy that her marriage to Abhimanyu
would take place.


278 Ṭext, Canto 48

ḍatĕng marika ng arghyapādya saha cāmana sĕrĕh ahalĕp hanêng

kajan
- - alangö ywa tan tĕka pijĕr lali wiphala tikang wasĕh suku

ya karaṇa mahāīṣi n angḍawuhi śāpa ri sang alupa tan pangarcana
ndah astu kamu mogha sorakĕna ning maru ri salahasangku demu yuh

ng: Ĕ na.

yuwa: Ĕ pwa.

n angdawuhi: naradha wuh ing ri saṛg: Ṭ ring.
kamu mogha: Ŋ mogha kamuṅ yuh: Ĕ yu.

nahan wacana sang mahāmuni sakêng gagana sinayutan ndatan waluy Ñ

sang ogha kari mangkin epu kapĕgan jĕngĕr angangĕn-angĕn
kamanuñṣan ,

byatta sira n anggĕgö prihati laryakĕna laku narendra warṇan

lāpas tuwi titir sirânginĕp i doh i paran ira tan asru rĕ hĕnṇ

a mahamuni: B maharsa; ndatan Ĕ datar; waluy: Ṭ walwi.

c -gĕgö Ĕ gagö-
d titir titi.

pirang wĕngi kunang lawas nira samantara datĕng i Wirāṭṅ lalana
anungsunṣ iki pañca-Pandawa ra Matsyapati pada saharsa garjita
telas dumunung ing grhâracana rajya pasaji ri sirârja sōk sĕkar
kinārya tinamuy-tamuy pinaribhoga lĕlĕh alĕh amukti ṣaḍrasa

b anungsung: Ṭ apansun.
c dumunung ing: ĕ dumun ing, F dumunung i.
d tinamuy-tamuy: Ĕ tinamwi-tamwṅ; saḍras: Ĕ sad sĕkar.

a sira ṅ apupul ahöm rikang sabha

uta sakatambay eñjing irik sî
é , , lawan para ratu sama bhakti pūrwaka

ra Matsyapati pañca-Pāndawa
mucap lĕkasa ning

kunang wĕkas ikāng alapkĕna palakwana juga rumuhun tikang pura

a irikṛ: F araki.
b ra:Fni.
a tikang: kang.

dumona Kurunatha sahana para tanḍa sanggraha |

Ṭranslation, Canto 48 279

Foot-washing water with mouth-wash and āne betel on a cushion came,

But even so the dreaming lady herself did not come, she was completely
oblivious, and the water for washing feet was useless.

For this reason the great sage uttered a curse on the forgetful lady for
failing to pay due homage:

Well, may you be made inferior to a co-wife, due to my disappointment
with youl Ṭie¹'

Śuch were the words of the great sage from the sky, and when called
back he did not return.

The pining lady left there was all the more perplexed, speechless, deep
in thought and overwhelmed with emotion.

Passing over how she was enduring anxiety, let us move straight on and
describe the king¹s progress:

He was on his way but repcatedly passed the night on his long journey
and was not in a hurry to get there.

A*ñter a cectain number of nights he thereupon arrived in Wiraṭa at a
leisurely pace,

And there the Five Pāṇḍawas and King Mātsyapati greeted him, all
joyful and elated.

When he had taken his lodgings in a dwelling arranged as a palace, the
offerings to him were numerous and thick with fowers,

He was feted, hospitably entertained amd regaled with delightful things,
enjoying the six avours to the full.

Passing this over, the next morning they then gathered and consulted in
the hall:

The honourable Matsyapati, the Five Pāṇdawas and the kings showed
their devotion first,

And talked about how they would tackle Kurunatha, and all the offcers
were reaady for action,

But the final outcome of their planning was just ñrst to ask for the
kingdom.


280 Ṭext, Canto 4â

8 samangkana Yudhiṣṭhirâmrih atalangkup i sira naranātha Keśawa
sahâñjali sirân akâya ri Janārdana datĕnga nirê Gajahwaya
| apan ta ya muwah wĕnang kumilala nagara mangucapê Suyodhana
| prabhāwa Harimarti ta pwa pinakaśraya tĕkap ira pañcarPāṇḍawa

a -mrih: Ĕ om.
b sirâm: Èairang; nirê D nirêng, H nira.
c taya A taja (typoîh kumilia: E kumilila ng.

9 paran wĕnanga Keśawâmihanga sāmpun asamaya dĕlaha mangkata
kunang sang Abhimanyu len sang ibu sinrahakĕn ira ri sang Dhanañṅ
lawan pwa ri pakarma Pārthasuta tan widhi nira mara solah ing rare
ya têkang inupakṣamākĕn ira tamtam ira tan alaris mapīdhana

a -mihanga: Ṭ -wihanga.
d tâkanḍ: Ĕ tekaru maprdhana: CD mamYdhana.

10 kṣamakĕna kĕta nghulun rari sang Arjuna karuhun î jöng Yudhiṣṭthira
iking suruhan i nghulun makĕmitan pahulunan iniwö linalana
wwaya pwa ri salah ni śḍa niki len wwanganakipun amöm karāsikan

ya têki palakun ri tamtam i kakanta katuluy apa tan pamīdhanā

a kĕta: F tĕka.
b linalana: F twinalana.

11 nahan wacana Keśawâṇuna malĕs mangupaśama ri harṣa ning hati
uḍa paramagarjita ngwang i wuwus nṛpati n anganumoda ring rare
paran têmahananya mātra yadi sang prabhu katamana duhkha mar

dahat
matangnya tulusa pwa śârdha naranatha ri ya pakayaśa n jugêkihĕn

a mangupaśama: D tangupasama.
e tâmahananya: Ĕ tâmahanya.
d rdha: D sreddha, Ĕ śabda; ya pakayaṣa n: A ya pakayaśa, D kasuyaśan.

Ṭranslation, Canto 4ê 281

| 8 Likewise Yudhiṣṭthira strove to show his respect for King Keśawa,
And with an añjali he urged Janârdana strongly to come to Gajahwaya,
As he would be able to take over the rights to the country again and
would raise the matter with Suyodhana -
It was Harimurti's power that the Five Pāṇdawas would use as their
support.

9 How could Keśawa refuseî It was already agreed that they would set
out in the near future,

But Abhimanyu and his mother he handed over to Dhanañjaya.
And regarding the marriage of Parthasuta without his instruction and all

that the boy did,

For thesw things he asked his indulgence and not to go ahead with
punishment.

0 ‘Forgive me, younger brother Arjuna, and espedially at the feet of
- Yudhiṣṭhira.

dl Your order to me was to watch over my nephew, to take care of him and
ḍ comfort him.
' But as for this incorrect behaviour with his cousin, making lowe with her,

Ibeg your indulgence of me (your elder brother) for gaing too far, as I
did not punish him¹

11 So spoke Keśawa, and Arjuna responded calmly with joy in his heart:
*Oh, I am supremely pleased at your words, sympathiaing with the boy.
How could it possibly have ended, if Your Majesty had been affected

| with deep anger¹? .

, So let your favour toward him continue - let this just serve as a

meritorious deed.

*1


–w-

saa Ṭext, Canto 4ĕ

12 kunang pwa maliha ng wuwus rasana de narapati manahi nghulun | Ñ– |
é Ñ

ri rehnya kasalah ri Matsyapati wehana nira tanayân huwus pajöng 3 |

a tamuhara kepwan i ngwanĕ i hadenya tulusakĕna len syapâtuhā
Ṭkan ling ira Pārtha Keśawa sahur nira winatĕk i śāpa san Ītñṭ v

b wira: Ŋ nita.
c -tuha D -tuta.
d ira: BD nira.

13 aringku laki sang Dhanañjaya huwus wruh aku ri kita n atwang î |

nghulun –
- pwa bapa haywa kepwan akun anggĕha niki sang anāma n

Uttarī |
anat i widhi ning yayah marika rehnya tulusa warangĕnta ta pwa yâ
rikâdya tanayangku gantyakĕna tan hali-halina manahku laryakĕn

b aku n anggâhr B aku nggēha, COH¹ aku anggêha, F aku anggaha; niki Ṭ nika. \ ³¹

|
j tH : ra; ta: Ñ
anat i widhi: Ŋ anŪta widhi, Ṭ anuta wadhana: warika: F rwa ri; rehnya: arehnya
c ¹

kana.
d -halina: F hal ini.

ndan ewĕh atêki sang dyah awĕdi n lwir amapasa ri jong Janardana
kunang pwa haji yan kĕdö ndan anganugrahana ta sira ahna ṅia r
ikang tumuluyâwĕkânulada reh nira juga palakun ling ings X

i ; £: F katĕkêng.

. F naham; nṛpati: Ĕ omu kat²kê: F

: wa ewḍua: B dine wihanga; atâki: Aē atêkaisang dyah: A sa dyah.

c kunang: Ṭ kunĕng:ṅ anganugrahana: Ŋ angahugrahana; rĕsñp: B pasĕp.

15 nda mangkana ta rakwa panghyanṣ ira san narapatiduhitā n Keśawa Ŋ
arum inupacara ring lĕpihan apênĕd araras adulur sĕkar kaki Ñ
sinêmbahakĕn ing puyang mwanṣ iña yatna umatur i sirângusap

14 na ling nṛpati Keśawâmagĕhi yukti hinayu katêkê dalĕm purī
manah nṛpati denya kenāĕr akĕtĕr karĕnan i wuwuś ing priyambada

a panghyag ira: Epahyanṣ nira.

b inupacâra: Ĕ n inupacarāi ring: F ri.
c sinânbahakân: ĕCDF sinambahakĕn.
d karânan ii A karaṇa īi.

Ṭranslation, Canto 4 283

12 However, to change the subject, may Your Majesty refect on something
very much on my mind,
In view of the fact that an undertaking was made to Matsyapati that he
would be given my son, and so it was agreed.
This is causing me to be concerned about whether it would be wrong to
go ahead with it, and who would be senior¹

This is what Partha said, and Keśawa replied, forced by the power of the
sage¹s curse:

13 My younger brother Dhanañjaya, I already know that you are devoted
to me.

See, old chap, you must not have a problem if the one called Uttarī is
acknowledgcd in this position.

The way will be to follow the ducree of her father, and let her be married
to him,

And so let my daughter be replaced as first - I would have no worries if
this were done¹'

4 Thus spoke Keśawa, confirming the correctness of it, approved as right
even inside the palace,

But the young lady had a difficulty, fearful that she might appear to be
going counter to Janārdana.

But if the king insisted, then he should grant her a favour as a sign of the
depth of his feelings:

TṬhat if she went on to have a son, he would just resemble him - that was
her reḍuest, according to her confidante.

15 So such was the prayer of the princess to Keśawa,

Sweetly set down in a lovely letter, charmingly accompanied by kaki
flowers.

It was offered with an obeisance by the puyang and iña, who attentively
presented it to him, wiping his feet;

The king¹s heart was moved by it and he trembled, grateful for the
words uf endearment.


Ṭranslation, Canto 48 285
284 Ṭext, Canto ṭê

Although he was visibly bewildered, nevertheless he confirmed his
faithfulness to his word,

And for this reason went ahead and agreed to everything that the
princess asked for.

Not long after that her wedding finally went ahead, amamingly ātting,

And it was as if the whole of heaven would be completely empty,
wanting to join in watching, as far as the corners of the world.

16 yayan mara katon wirangrwang ira kintu pinagĕhan i satya ning wu
ya kāraṇa nirâlaris mubhayanî sapinalaku narendraputrikā
samantara tulus ta rakwa wĕkasan kawarangan ira kâdbhutâhalĕp
rasâradina tang sakendran aharĕp milu mulata tĕkêng digântara

b mubkayan: D mubhayaning, B mubhawanṅ É nubhayani.


CANTO 49

gaaahuai - - - 1 ww-lw-wlwwluwwulwwwlo-walws

1

ndah sampun gati ning wiwāha pariparṇa ginaway i Wirāta kāadbhuta
ngka śrr Kṛṣṇa gumantyakĕn swatanayā nira winarang irê purī nira
mwang Matsyâadhipa Pañṅca-Pâṇḍawa marângatĕrakĕn i
D3Dhanañjayâtmaja
hĕntî dṛwya sarājya de nṛpati h angdaśaguṇa halĕp ing sajî harĕp .
a ginauway ii Cī ginawaya; Wirdṭa: F wiratha,
b suw-: F pwa.
d ṅantī Ĕ hĕnti ng ing: Ṭi.

sangsiptan ri huwusnya Pārthasuta rāmya wayuh angĕnani twas ing
priyâ

marmâtwang ri sang Uttarī tumut i bhakti nira n abapa tan wĕnang .
wihang

ndan ri dyah Kṣiti Sundarī ri kĕna śapa sira n amĕwĕhî ngrĕs ing hati

têkwan rowang irêki ngani kabhayasmara karaṇa ni de nirâwĕlas s.

b ri sang: F sirang; n abapa: Fi bapa.
c udan ri: D ring; Kṣiti: F Śiti.

nantĕn sakṣma lĕkas nirânglĕwihakĕn smara turida ri Rukmiṇīsuta

ring weweh sumilib lawan ri tĕkan ing prĕman inamĕr irêng karâsi

yapwan lĕnglĕng acangkramêng pasisi parwata paḍa hinalimbang ing
langĕ

ndan ring puṣpa dinum kinapryakĕn irêng smita saha liring esi

manmatha .

b tāan ing: ñ tĕkan i ; inamĕr: B anamĕr ; irêng: ŊH irê.
c -krameng: A -kramê; dimbang ing: Ṭ lingghana.
d kinapryak²n: B kinaptyakĕn, Ĕ kinaprayakĕn; irêng: irê.

CANTO 49

Mow when the wedding had been celebrated in Wirāṭa with the full
ceremonies, a marvellous sight,

Then the illustrious Kṛṣṇa replaced the bride with his own daughter and
married her off in his palace,

And Matsyadhipa and the Rive Pāṇḍawas came to escort
Dhanañjayātmaja -

The property of the whole kingdom was used up by the king, as he
multiplied tenfold the fitting oîferings for the ceremonies before them.

ln short, following this, when Pārthasuta was happy with his two wives
and fulfilled the wishes of his loved ones,

Because he was respectful of Uttarī he joined her in being devoted to her
father and did not dare to refuse,

But as for Lady Kṣiti Sundarī, the fact that she had been struck by the
curse increased the sharp pain in his heart,

And furthermore he had been her campanion before in a dangerous love
affair, and for this reason he felt sorry for her.

In this way the manner in which he gave priority to his love and passion
for Rukmiṇmsutâa was subtle:

Whaen giving gifts he did it stealthily, and when coming to bed he
treated her to the delights of love;

If they went to enjoy themselves on a trip to the seashore and mountains
they were treated eḍually in admiring the beauties of nature,

But when the flowers were shared out he showed her that she was his
beloved with lus smile and with his glances filled with amorous
feelings.


2sa Ṭext, Canto 49

4 tanngeh yan caritan lawas nira sukhângracana sih amagantakĕn raras
śrr Pāṇḍwatmaja digjayêng raṇa tĕlas maluy i pura nirâmulh prajâ
ring swargastha nira pwa tan hana waneh ratu kumalilir r Yudhiṣṭhira
tan len putra sang Uttarī haji Parikṣit awĕka Janamejayaprabhu

b -watmaja: -utmaja; maluy: A waluy, Ŋ aluy.
c r Aing.

Ṭranslation, Canto 4ḍ 289

| 4 It would take tao long to tell how they happily gawe form to their love

and explored its charms;

The noble Pāṇḍwatmaja were all-conḍuering in battle, and having
returned to their kingdom they restored the realm,

But after their ascent to Heaven there was no other king to succeed
Yudhiṣṭhira

Than the son of Uttarī, King Parikṣit, who had as son King Janamejaya.


BBddtddBf1 0

CANTO 5Ū

x
Widyutîara: |o w lv-wlwwolwuwwlwwwlawalwwwl
– -w -

I sāmpun kekĕtan ing kathâtita Ghaṭotkacaśaraṇa ngaranya tan paracana

tan makweh akikuk tunêng rasa tutuk mpu Panuluh amurul-murul
gurulaghu
antuknyêmrih amöh manah mara silunglunga niki mulihêng
Ananggabhawana -
ri nglihnya n lĕwas ing langö lilu mangö lali lumihat i lĕnglĕng ing
pangalusan
-śaraṇa: AH -êraya.
tunêng: Ĕ tuna ng; mpu: F sira mpu; amurul-murul: F angamuru.
amöh: F apĕh; -bhawana: B nawana.
tai: Ŋ laling; pangalusan: Ĕ pangalasan.

a m u¹ m

sis ndi n wānya kari n tatākĕna ri sang kawinagara widagdha ring

kalĕngĕngan

yan tan śrī Madaharṣa kĕdw amidhi rîlwa niki mawijila pralāpitakathā |

molih ta pwa manah nirâpti mulatângguyu-guyu ri hatur nirângidan-

idan Ṭ-
ndatan jrih linalunya lamlam ira dhalya lamun abalikê wĕlas nira jĕm
a sis: D lis; tatîkĕna: F taha kĕna.

c mulatângguyu: Ṭ mulatengguyu.
d tlinalunya: D pinalunya; ira dhalya: irudul.

Ghatṭotkacāśraya samāpta

CANTO 5Ū

The composition of the tale is already done - Ghaṭotkacaśaraṇa is its
name, without literary adornment.

It is not much, awkward and lacking in feeling are the words from the
mouth of Mpu Panuluh, offending against the rules of the metres.

May these results of attempting to sḍueeae out his thoughts be a vehicle
for caruying him home to the Abode of Anangga,

Seeing that he is weak from being worn out in poetry and decrepit in
musing, forgetful when looking at the beauties of secluded hermitages.

Fie, who would possibly dare to place himself on a par with the Court
Poet, skilled in things of beauty,

If the illustrious Madaharṣa had not insisted on issuing the instruction to
join him in producing a story in kakawin form²

But he succeeded in his wish to sec it, and laughed at how he drove me
to distraction -

Iam not afraid to accept his whims and be ground to dust, providing I
can go back to enjoying his sympathy in times to come.

a

Ṭhe Ghaṭotkacāśraya is finished


